Authors
Robin Clifford
Number of Reviews
142

Title
Review for Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within (2001)
Aliens beings have taken over the Earth. The great cities are deserted and
precious few humans remain to repel the invaders and reclaim the world for
mankind. Aki Ross (voice of Ming-Na) and her mentor Dr. Sid (voice of
Donald Sutherland) must develop their "wave theory," the only antidote to
counter the alien phantoms in this latest video game to become a feature
length movie in "Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within."
It was inevitable. Ever since Pixar Animation brought "The Tin Toy" to life
in 1988 as the first all-computer generated (and Oscar-winning) short, the
animation industry has been striving to create a realistic world using CGI
ever since. A few years later "Toy Story" wowed us and, most recently,
"Shrek" bowled the world over. Now, video game master Hironobu Sakaguchi
takes his own, popular game series, Final Fantasy, and brings his animated
video world to the big screen.
Live action films from video games have been around for a while. Super
Mario Brothers, Teenaged Mutant Ninja Turtles and Might Morphin Power
Rangers were all fodder for the video-game-turned-movie market. The latest
of the live makeovers, "Lara Croft: Tomb Raider," is currently having a
successful run at theaters everywhere. But the video game to video film
niche has not, until "Final Fantasy," been tapped. Vid king Sakaguchi is
the first to make the leap from creating his own popular gaming software to
crafting a big-screen CGI version of his brainchild.
The brief description at the beginning of this review lays out the basic
story. Aliens, in this case amorphous monsters that live just on the edge
of human vision, are able to tear the spirit out of their victims, leaving
their bodies an empty shell. The military, led by General Hein (James
Woods), is gung ho against the invaders and, because they killed his
family, the general will stop at nothing to stop the alien invaders. Of
course, the misguided military mogul does not see the danger of this
stop-at-nothing-to-win ideology and it is up to the scientists, in the
"persona" of Aki and Dr. Sid (with the help of heroic Captain Gray Edwards
(Alec Baldwin) and his loyal Deep Eyes SWAT team) to save the world.
"Final Fantasy" is a traditional action/adventure flick with the
exceptional difference that there is, technically, little of tradition in
the filmmaking. Much like "Atlantis: The Lost Empire," we get a rousing
adventure that is made up with a series of high-tech battles that pit man
against monster. The CGI used here is outstanding, with the action
realistic and human movements and expressions genuine. The looks of the
younger characters still has a smooth artificiality to it that keeps it
just a step away from being "real" (though I think this is a move by the
filmmakers to keep from spooking the audience by being too realistic).
There are a couple of problems with this technical tour de force, though.
The main one I have is the same one that I have with many films. It is too
darn long to sustain the story line. The makers, here, are so taken with
the state-of-the-art technology that they feel they must sacrifice good
pacing with extra F/X - action scenes are carried too long and the story
meanders through its last 30 minutes with multiple logical endings,
preventing the film from being tight and to the point. 15 minutes of
judicious editing would have made this a terrific sci-fi adventure instead
of just a good one.
The other problem is the melding of CGI with the look and feel of reality.
We have entered the realm where the vid techies can create a
realistic-looking human being by manipulating the bits and bytes. Giving
voice to these new beings is going to create problems. It's one thing to
have Charlton Heston doing the voice of a dog. It's another thing entirely
giving that voice to a human, albeit a CGI one, that does not look like the
actor. I found it distracting to hear Donald Sutherland's voice coming out
of balding, bearded Dr. Sid. My mind kept visualizing the actor, instead.
Non-stars and unknown vocal talents would be less distracting when giving
voice to the characters in this reality-based animation world.
The real draw for "Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within" is to the many fans
of the video game series (over 33 million copies sold world-wide) and those
who are curious to see the first hyper-realistic, computer-generated action
feature. It is a formidable effort, despite the problems, and I give it a
B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back (2001)
Things take off from here with a stolen orangutan, pilfered jewels, loony
Federal Wildlife Marshal Wilenholly, a national manhunt and crashing a
major studio production. I won't spoil things for the fans and the curious,
so I'll stop here with any further description. What "Jay and Silent Bob
Strike Back" really amounts to is a self-indulgent, buddy fest that brings
together all of the Friends of Kevin and others into a goofball journey
across the USA. It has its fun moments, but is aimed squarely at the fans
of Jay and Silent Bob. It has some laughs along the way, but fewer than I
expected.
The cast of cameo perfs and bit parts abounds with all manner of young,
not-so-old, and the occasional icon player. Matt Damon and Ben Affleck poke
humor at their own celebrity status, particularly Affleck's notorious
hedonism. (Shortly after the screening I saw, Affleck admitted himself for
detox. Fact parallels fiction, I guess.) Joining these "big name" stars are
Smith alumnus Chris Rock, Alanis Morissette, Jason Lee and Joey Lauren
Adams and a myriad of others names that is too long to list. Everyone,
especially Mark Hamill as super bad guy Cock-Knocker (we has a huge right
hand) and foe to Bluntman and Chronic, are having one hell of a good time.
There isn't a bad bone in the body of "Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back" but
the film is too loaded with inside jokes and mutual admiration and
camaraderie to draw in the audience. I felt, and I should never feel this
way, like an outsider looking in and I am privy to all the inside humor.
The film is a paean to Smith's dynamic duo and has the feel that he is
putting his long-time characters to bed - probably until someone gives him
a bunch of money to resurrect the guys once again. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
Filmmaker Ang Lee's varied career began with his Taiwan family films ("Eat,
Drink, Man, Woman") and went on to period ("Sense and Sensibilities") and
modern ("The Ice Storm") drama. He returns to his Chinese roots, this time
with a tale of legends and love in "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon."
Slick martial arts and high tech action sequences alone do not make a film.
They may raise the interest bar some for a mediocre film and story, but
they cannot make a move "good" by themselves. Director Ang Lee understands
this and uses these film tools, along with solid story, acting and techs,
to create an above average work in "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon."
Set in the early 19th China, Wudan martial arts master Li Mu Bai (Chow
Yun-Fat) is about to retire to a life of meditation, even though the death
of his master at the hands of the infamous Jade Fox (Cheng Pei-Pei) goes
unavenged. He gives his fabled, 400-year old sword, known as Green Destiny,
to fellow master and unrequited love, Yu Shu Lien (Michelle Yeoh), to be
delivered to his master's closest friend in Beijing. En route to the city,
Yu meets the beautiful, willful niece, Jen (Zhang Ziyi), of the local
governor. Later, a masked thief steals Green Destiny and escapes with Yu in
hot pursuit.
The sword undergoes an almost comic disappearing/appearing act while Li
journeys to Beijing. Yu thinks he has come for the remarkable blade, but
soon learns that Li's devotion is to her, not some possession. Li has
learned, through his meditation, that true love is the most important thing
as he opens up his heart to Shu Lien. Meanwhile, he finds out that the
young thief - as suspected, it is Jen - is a secret devotee to the Wudan
discipline and he offers to school the girl in his warrior skills. She
rebukes him and Li soon discovers that Jen has links to his nemesis, Jade
Fox. Revenge is imminent.
"Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" is a loving creation by Ang Lee that pays
homage on different levels. It permits the helmer to explore the past
legends of China with his depiction of larger than life characters that
have mystical powers beyond the realm of us mere mortals. Ang gives praise
to the valuable contribution of martial arts in the visual world of action
film. He also delves into the realm of unrequited love between his star
characters, a coming of age story with the beautiful Jen, and her romance
with a wild, desert nomad prince, Lo (Chang Cheng). Interspersed with these
dramatic stories are some light, comic moments that temper the overall
serious tone.
These varied stories are interwoven into a rich film tapestry that brings
us into a world where martial discipline and super-human powers are a way
of life. This premise leads to some remarkable, choreographed fight scenes
that are second to none. Yen Woo-Ping, the fights choreographer who made
"The Matrix" such an appealing blockbuster, pushes the envelop with wire
F/X that sometimes dazzle (and sometimes don't). The most affective fight
sequences are the ones where the wire stunts are kept to a minimum. When Yu
and Jen are pitted against each other, it is one of the best action
sequences of the film. In contrast, when the wire stunts are in full gear,
they look artificial - fun, but artificial.
The wire-based special F/X give the players the ability to defy gravity
and, quite literally, climb walls with a single bound and float across
rooftops. When Li and Jen do battle on the top limbs of a bamboo forest,
the look is, at once, exciting and a little funny in the awkwardness the
actors have in performing the state of the art stunts. The traditional
fight sequences do not fall into the quagmire of more of the same, though.
Each battle is unique and exciting in its own way. A fight between Jen and
Lo, on horseback and at top speed, rivals the best of America's western
action.
The love stories that are woven into the tale take two paths  - old and
new. Li and Yu have been longtime allies in arms and have respected each
other for many years. Li, who was never aware of Yu as a woman before his
meditations, comes to realize that she is his one, true love. The
melancholy romance takes on a bittersweet tone as we hope the couple is
together at the finish. On the other end of the spectrum of love is the
confrontational attraction between Jen and Lo. Like Li and Yu, the young
couple is well matched in temper and physical ability and their romance
takes on an urgency as Jen looks to Lo as her escape from a mundane
arranged marriage.
 Chow Yun-Fat was a last minute replacement as Li Mu Bai. Prior to his
signing on, action star Jet Li was slotted to play Li, but other
obligations forced the younger action star to bow out of the production.
Chow brings a maturity and dignity to his role as a Wudan master that
reminds me of John Steed in the old "Avenger" TV series. When Li does
battle with the athletic Jen, his movement is minimal and his physical
control total. The action star, best known for fighting his opponents with
blazing guns, takes to the wire stunts quite well. There is an exception,
though, when Li first flies after the fleeing Jen, he points to the sky
before lifting off. I half expected him to declare, "I'm Superman!"
Otherwise, the performer provides a quiet, strong character that garners
respect from all.
Michelle Yeoh does a wonderful, understated job of portraying the
intelligent, capable Yu Shu Lien. There is real pain in her face as she
explains to the young Jen that independence has its price - a life full of
loneliness. Yeoh is intriguing to watch in her action work, but she also
garners sympathy with her sad acceptance of the cost of her independence.
Zhang Ziyi, as Jen, steals the show with her beauty, grace and physical
ability. I was struck, the first time seeing the young actress appears on
the screen, with her resemblance to the great Chinese actress Gong Li. That
is, until I found out that Zhang is also the discovery of premier Chinese
director Zhang Yimou, just like Gong Li. Zhang has such presence on the
screen that she stands toe-to-toe with her more seasoned costars. She is a
pleasure to watch with her kung fu moves and poise and reps the next
generation of action star. Chang Cheng, as Lo, gives a spirited performance
opposite Zhang and comes across as a likable brigand who is head over heels
in love with Jen.
Other supporting cast members are full-fledged characters, especially Cheng
Pei-Pei with her wicked malevolence as Jade Fox. Ang uses his minor
characters to introduce the necessary comic relief that helps give depth to
the film and flesh out the support into real people.
The multiplicity of stories is handled deftly by helmer Lee and translates
to the screen nicely,   especially due to the film's fine technical
qualities. Set in the Forbidden City, "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon"
captures both the look and period feel in its 19th century backdrop.
Costume, too, fits the bill from Li's austere, almost monkish attire to
Jen's beautiful wardrobe and ninja-like rags. Photography by Peter Pau,
particularly for the action scenes, is exemplary.
The artificial look of the more ambitious fighting F/X detracts from the
overall quality of "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon." This is especially
distracting when compared with the more traditional action, which is
brilliantly done at times. But, a good story, attractive and likable stars,
and great action do make this one of the season's best entertainment
values. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for AntiTrust (2001)
Gary Winston (Tim Robbins) is a Bill Gates style entrepreneur on the brink
of deploying a vast, satellite-based communications system that will change
the world. He recruits a brilliant young computer nerd, Milo Hoffman (Ryan
Phillippe), to implement the final piece of software and bring the system
on line. But, Milo soon finds out that his benevolent mentor is no Mr. Nice
Guy in "AntiTrust"
You can tell when the movies of the New Year begin showing up at theaters.
We go from the sublime work with year-end films like "Traffic" and
"Thirteen Days," to the ridiculous dreck of the likes of "AntiTrust." The
sophomore effort by director Peter Howitt ("Sliding Doors") is a ho-hum,
routine action thriller that lacks any thrills, is badly paced and poorly
written.
The premise surrounding "AntiTrust" is a typical David versus the corporate
Goliath. The good guys, Milo and his friends, are on the verge of creating
a startup company that could shake things up in worldwide communications.
Winston, with his billions of dollars, is the main competition for the
lads. He uses his money and kind and friendly demeanor to tempt Milo to
come on board his precious project. The temptation is too much for the
young genius and Milo, with the encouragement of his girlfriend Alice
(Claire Foleri), goes over to the enemy, shirking his friends.
Things look bright and perky for Milo as Gary acts as his mentor and
provides for all his worldly needs. But, things aren't what they seem.
Winston, miraculously, can always "find" the software that Milo needs to
complete his piece of the project, called Synapse. Recent reports of the
bizarre deaths of some of the area's top programmers don't sink into Milo's
head until he learns of a supposed hate crime - the brutal murder of his
best friend and startup crony, Teddy (Yee Jee Tso). As the pieces fall into
place in his mind, Milo sees that Winston is the root of the corporate evil
that threatens to rule the world's communications system.
This David and Goliath yarn incorporates stock suspense items like racing
against the clock and risking capture to break into the company computer -
not once, but twice. We get the cheap, jump out of the dark scares that are
a trademark for a lack of imagination in writing. There are also twists and
turns in who is on Milo's side and who wants him dead, so not all the
characters, like his girlfriend Alice and co-worker Lisa (Rachel Leigh
Cook) are not who they seem to be. All these gyrations do not make the
story more interesting, just confusing.
I'm not a fan of Ryan Phillippe, finding the actor too mannered and wooden.
He is just that in "AntiTrust," evoking neither sympathy nor empathy for
Milo. Tim Robbins' Gary Winston is a near carbon copy of the role he played
in "Arlington Road" a year or two ago. The difference is, Robbins had a
well-developed character to play in the older movie. Here, he is given
virtually nothing to do. Supporting cast is nondescript.
Production values are decent, but, without a good story or characters to
hang them upon, they are a wasted effort. Let's hope that "AntiTrust" isn't
the new standard for Hollywood filmmaking. I give it a D-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for You Can Count on Me (2000)
Sammy and Terry Prescott (Laura Linney and Mark Ruffalo) were orphaned as
kids when their mother and father were killed in a car accident. Since
then, the siblings have drifted apart. Sammy put down roots in the small,
upstate New York town of Scottsville with her young son Rudy (Rory Culkin).
Terry is a troubled wanderer who ekes out an existence and not much more.
When he abruptly leaves his pregnant girlfriend, he heads for Scottsville
and his sister to borrow some money. Terry's arrival disrupts Sammy's
quiet, stable life in tyro director Kenneth Lonergan's "You Can Count On
Me."
Terry's unexpected arrival in Scottsville coincides with Sammy getting a
new boss at the bank where she works. Brian Everett (Matthew Broderick) is
a martinet, of sorts, whose first actions are to restrict the colors his
employees use on their computer screens and put a halt to Sammy's work day
excursions to pick up Rudy at school and ferry him to his sitter's home.
Sammy protests Brian's decision to no avail. "You'll have to make other
arrangements," he says, or else. With no other option, the distraught
mother calls upon Terry to fill in for her with the daily pickup.
The temporary solution to the problem goes bad from the start when Terry
forgets to pick up Rudy at school one time and takes him to a bar to play
pool another. When Sammy finds out about the pool game from the town
sheriff and confronts Terry with the fact, he immediately blames innocent
Rudy for tattling on him. The relationship between Sammy and Terry begins
to change from that of sister and brother to one of scolding mother and
petulant, troublesome son. Terry and Rudy draw closer together, too, at
this time. As expected, by the end of the movie, everyone loves everyone
and a hopeful finale ensues.
While the brother/sister conflict boils, Sammy and Brian get into an
adversarial battle between the boss man's penchant for bureaucratic BS and
Sammy's desire to have the workplace be happy and cooperative. The fight
soon changes as Sammy and Brian get to know and like each other. His
unhappy marriage and her uncommitted situation drive the pair into each
other's arms and a romance begins. Of course, a boss/worker relationship is
destined to disaster and this one is no exception.
"You Can Count On Me" is straightforward story-telling about what happens
to a brother and sister as they grow older and apart. Laura Linney has not
had the opportunity to get the lead for a movie, until now, and holds up
her end of the bargain pretty well. Mark Ruffalo is OK as the brooding,
selfish, nomadic Terry and shows the most personal change by the film's
end. Unfortunately, Linney and Ruffalo look as much like siblings as Gore
and Bush look like brothers. This is a notable distraction. Matthew
Broderick is fine as the anal retentive bureaucratic boss. Rory Culkin is
nondescript as Sammy's little boy.
Kenneth Lonergan makes a sound debut effort, showing an ability to tell a
story while getting convincing performances out of the principle cast, if
not so the supporting players.
Tech credits, like the directing and writing, get the job done, though
nothing about the film knocks my socks off.
Hollywood doesn't usually make films about brothers and sisters and I can
understand why. Who would want to watch a story about me bickering with my
sister? I wouldn't.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Rat Race (2001)
Six ordinary people, one eccentric gambling entrepreneur, $2 million
stashed in a train station locker in Silver City, New Mexico. This is the
formula for a cross-country chase (the only rule is there are no rules)
that pits the contestants against each other as they all gallop for the
gold in Jerry Zucker's "Rat Race."
In 1963, Stanley Kramer created a comic throwback to the old Keystone Kop
Kapers with his "It's a Mad, Mad, Mad, Mad World," putting together a cast
of classic comedians in a wild and wacky race to find ill-gotten booty. Sid
Caesar, Milton Berle, Jimmy Durante, Phil Silvers, Buddy Hackett, Mickey
Rooney, Dick Shawn, Terry-Thomas, Jonathan Winters, Buster Keaton, The
Three Stooges and other comic icons joined the ailing Spencer Tracy in the
3+ hour comic chase caper that took a look a the greed that drives men's
souls.
Comedy maven Zucker ("Airplane," "Naked Gun"), using Andy Breckman's
original script, assembles a group of comedians and actors and revisits the
silent-era slapstick style mined so well by Kramer decades ago. With "Rat
Race" we have Rowan Atkinson, John Cleese, Whoopi Goldberg and Cuba
Gooding, Jr. leading the cast as a disparate group who, for one reason or
another, arrive at the casino owned by wealthy Donald Sinclair (Cleese).
All play the slot machines and each receives a special gold token that
gains them entrance to the casino penthouse. Once there, Sinclair informs
the crew that he has gathered them together to make them an offer they
can't refuse.
Here's the deal: in a locker at the train station in Silver City sits a
duffel bag containing millions. Each contestant is given a key to the
locker and they must use whatever means they can find to get to the station
and, first come, win the loot. Along the way, the various pairings beg,
borrow and steal any means of transport to get to the final destination. A
gambit by two of the players, brothers Duane and Blaine Cody (Seth Green
and Vince Vieluf), shuts down the Las Vegas airport, forcing everyone to
search for ground transport, evening the odds.
Gambling addict Randy Pear (Jon Lovitz) dupes his wife (Kathy Najimy) and
kids that he's on his way to get a job, not yet another get-rich-quick
scheme. The kids spot, along the highway, a sign for the Barbie Museum and
insist that, against their dad's protests, they stop for the exhibit. Much
to their chagrin, the museum turns out to be a skinhead hangout honoring
the notorious Nazi war criminal Klaus Barbie. The Jewish family beat feet
and steal Hitler's Mercedes, an exhibit at the museum, to make their
getaway and head to Silver City.
The Cody brothers lose their key to an unscrupulous guy at a hardware store
and have to get it back before they can continue on their way, resulting in
a chase involving a hot air balloon and an extremely unhappy cow.
Mother/daughter team of Vera and Merrill (Whoopi Goldberg and Lanai
Chapman) run into a nutty squirrel lady (Kathy Bates) and their car gets
wrecked, forcing them to steal a rocket car. Narcoleptic Enrico Pollini
(Rowan Atkinson) shags a ride with inept Zack (Wayne Knight), an ambulance
driver tasked with delivering a human heart to El Paso for a transplant.
Owen Templeton (Cuba Gooding, Jr.), a pro football referee who screwed up a
big game, hijacks a busload of "I Love Lucy" look-alikes in his quest for
the money. Breckin Meyer and Amy Smart pair up as the most normal in this
abnormal lot, but they, too, are drawn in to the crazy race. Unbeknownst to
this unlikely crew of treasure hunters, Donald Sinclair is using the race
to amuse his high stakes gamblers as they watch and bet on the contestants.
"Rat Race," while not as complex as "Mad, Mad World," is goofy fun that may
not always work well, but has enough laughs and silly stunts to keep amused
a summer audience trying to beat the heat. All of the actors, most of who
are on screen alone or in pairs most of the time, give a yeoman's effort in
providing the appropriate dose of low-brow comedy to their characters.
Rowan Atkinson, as Senor Pollini, puts on the oddest Italian accent I have
ever heard but delivers his typical brand of offbeat physical comedy. Jon
Lovitz is manically obsessed as the loser father who just wants a big piece
of the pie. Cuba Gooding, Jr. puts the right spin on his out of favor
referee who just wants to forget his gaff that caused many to lose their
bets on the big game. Seth Green and Vince Vieluf have some of the funniest
moments as the Cody brother when they destroy an airport radar tower or
invade a monster truck rally. Everyone in this film pays their dues and
each has fun in the process
The visual comedy, much of it very absurdist, works on the lowest common
denominator to tickle the funny bone, something that Jerry Zucker has done
since his "Kentucky Fried Movie." The gags don't come as fast and furious
as they did in "Airplane!" but the set up for the more elaborate jokes is
done with style and a solid sense of comedy.
"Rat Race" is "It's a Mad, Mad, Mad, Mad World"-lite. It doesn't have the
plethora of comic stars as the earlier film, but the cast and crew are
every bit as dedicated in providing a light-hearted, politically correct
comedy that won't earn high praise, but won't be derided either. The
audience laughed at all the right places and even I laughed aloud a few
times. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Spring Forward (1999)
Paul (Live Schreiber) is a young ex-con making a fresh start with the Parks
and Recreation department in a small New England town. He is teamed with
Murphy (Ned Beatty), an old hand at the job and approaching retirement. The
duo gets to know each other and become close friend over a year's time in
writer/director Tom Gilroy's feature film debut, "Spring Forward."
Newcomer Gilroy shows his stage-bound roots in his first attempt at making
a movie. The stagy nature of the film's structure - seven episodes,
chronologically over the course of a year, bridged by idyllic sequence of
small town life in the Northeast - could have been painful to watch in the
small budget film. Except for a pair of big-budget performances by Beatty
and Schreiber.
The trite little story of the once fallen and now found Paul, whose
criminal past stemmed from financial desperation and not a mean streak,
coming into the life of the near-retirement Murphy. As each talky episode
unfolds, we learn more and more about the two, who they are, what their
desires and needs are (Paul, early on, declares his "need" to get laid),
and just what makes 'em tick. There's talk about being a better person as
Paul floats his newly learned ideas of karma and religion before Murphy.
Murph tells his young colleague about his gay son, Bobby, who, off camera,
is dying of an undisclosed disease. (You figure it out.) They even smoke a
joint together in a cross-generational bonding ceremony. There is
philosophy enough for three plays here.
You can overlook the amateur filmmaking of "Spring Forward" as you watch
the two fine performances by the leads. Ned Beatty has had a long career
portraying a variety of characters from his "squeal like a pig" victim in
"Deliverance" to Otis, the sidekick of Lex Luthor (Gene Hackman) in
"Superman," and Sheriff Lester Banks in "Cookie's Fortune." He gives Murphy
the depth you expect from the actor and portrays the man as truly good and
kind in a small-town way. Live Schreiber is also proving himself to be able
to play a variety of types and he makes Paul a real person. He has a past,
but it does not dictate how he will be in the future. His deference to and
respect for Murphy are genuine as the older man's kindness helps to temper
Paul's youthful exuberance and sometimes-foul mouth.
Gilroy brings other characters into the mix, but they seem superfluous in
what is mainly a two-person play, a la "My Dinner With Andre." Campbell
Scott, Ian Hart, Peri Gilpin and others are each brought, briefly, into
some of the episodes to flesh out the background. Their appearances,
mostly, take the attention away from the leads without moving the story
much ahead. Each appearance is so brief that none of the actors are given a
chance to put substance into their stick figure roles.
Techs are all right, especially the soft, nicely lighted lensing by Terry
Stacey which captures the look and feel of small town USA. Although the
bucolic bridging sequences of folks mowing lawns, stringing Christmas
lights and burning leaves kept bringing to mind the TV spots for
Country-time Lemonade.
"Spring Forward" won't be high on any best lists come year's end, but the
two performances by Beatty and Schreiber make this worthwhile fare - at
least on the small screen. Because of the acting, I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Musíme si pomáhat (2000)
Another comedy about the Holocaust? It took some the film-going populace a
while to accept the popularity of Roberto Benigni's heartwarming tale about
a father and son in a Nazi concentration camp in "Life Is Beautiful." Now,
Czech filmmakers Jan Hrebejk and Petr Jarchovsky take a similar theme and
go the black comedy route in a story about a couple in a small, occupied
town who make the dangerous decision to hide an escaped Jewish prisoner in
"Divided We Fall."
Josef (Boleslav Polivka) and Marie Cizek (Anna Siskova) are a childless
couple who are trying to live a normal life in the face of his sterility
and the occupation of their small town by the German army. One night, Josef
meets the son, David Weiner (Csonger Kassai), of his former, Jewish
employer and learns that the young man is the sole survivor of his family.
He escaped from a concentration camp and returned home to collect some
hidden jewelry before trying to escape his own certain death.
Josef makes the snap decision to hide the frightened refugee, opening
himself and Marie up to danger as they try to balance their humanitarian
deed with survival under the Nazis. Complicating matters are the frequent,
unexpected visits by Josef's former colleague and, now, Nazi collaborator,
Horst Prohazka (Jaroslav Dusek), a slimy toady who openly lusts after
Marie. The couple must maintain a semblance of normalcy to keep their
secret hidden and Josef decides to go to work for Horst to cover their
tracks.
This doesn't sound like comedy and "Divided We Fall" is far from being a
ha-ha funny film, but the dark humor the filmmakers inject into this
survival tale help to take the edge off the subject dourness. Think of this
as the reverse of "The Diary of Anne Frank," where the focus is on the
couple hiding the refugee. David is symbolic in several ways: as a friend
and neighbor in need; as the child the couple could never have; and, he is
the Christ-figure as he "sacrifices" himself to father a child with Marie,
an act that will, in the end, save them all.
While Boleslav Polivka and Anna Siskova are fine as the couple, and Csonger
Kassai looks the part of the repressed, innocent Jew, there is one perf
that surpasses them all. Jaroslav Dusek stands out as Horst, the oily,
overbearing Nazi collaborator who hitches his future on the tail of the
conquerors. With his severely clipped moustache and the little hair he has
on his balding pate combed over, a la Adolph himself, and his pudgy body,
he personifies the collaborating bureaucrat - he is, at once, menacing and
comical. His is an outstanding perf.
The look of the film, with slight sepia overtones, is in keeping with the
period it depicts. The budget is obviously small and the filmmakers make do
with limited use of props and costumes - there are no marching hordes or
massive air raids shown here. Sets and costume are simple and to the point.
"Divide We Fall" doesn't have the impact of "Life Is Beautiful" or the
power of "The Diary of Anne Frank." It is an interesting character study
and gives us a glimpse into the limbo world of an occupied town during war,
but it never grabs your heart like those other movies. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Veuve de Saint-Pierre, La (2000)
One night, on the remote French-owned island of St. Pierre, a senseless
murder takes place during a drunken quarrel. The repentant killer, Neel
Auguste (Emir Kusturica), is sentenced to death - but there is no
guillotine on the island needed to carry out the execution. During the
months that follow, the island's intelligent military commandant (Daniel
Auteuil) treats his prisoner with dignity. The captain's wife, Madame Lo
(Juliette Binoche), questions the justice of the death penalty and is
convinced that Neel will be redeemed by his good deeds in "The Widow of St.
Pierre."
Master French filmmaker Patrice Leconte tackles the based-on-a-true-story
period tale about a murderer who, through the kind attentions of the
beautiful wife of the island's commandant, is not only fully rehabilitated,
he becomes a local hero. There is mystery, though, in this tale of
redemption as Madame Lo takes on an obsessive zeal as she first convinces
her husband, the Captain, to allow Neel to build her a greenhouse in cold,
windswept St. Pierre. As the prisoner gets over the drinking that was at
the bottom of his crime, he becomes a stolid member of the community. But,
the threat from Madame Guillotine never leaves as the island's
administrators plead with the French government to provide the deadly
machine.
"The Widow of St. Pierre" is a narrative story, taking a definite
anti-death penalty stance, with complex character studies provided by the
principals. The lead subjects are symbolic, but, with a great cast giving
solid performances, these symbols are three-dimensional and complete, if
almost unbelievably noble, people.
The story, by Claude Faraldo, begins in a brutal fashion with the drunken
murder of a local man by Neel and a crony. The friend gets life in prison
and Auguste gets an appointment with death. But, there is no requisite
guillotine on the island and long distance negotiations begin with the
leaders of the strife torn French Republic. Since the process will likely
take months, the island military commander allows his ward the freedom of
St. Pierre at Madame Lo's behest. The Captain's wife shows an inordinate,
though chaste, concern for the health and well being of Neel and curiosity
is piqued by the mystery.
As the months drag on without word from the home government, life grows
complacent on the island and Neel becomes part of the fabric of life on St.
Pierre, even marrying a local widow. He also becomes invaluable to the
community at large and, at one point, saves a young woman from certain
death during a house moving. The man's obvious rehabilitation should save
him, but time is his enemy and even the fouled up French government
eventually sends a guillotine. The problem then becomes finding an
executioner, a job that no islander will take. But, the elders resolve the
final stumbling block when a hapless immigrant is coerced into taking the
deadly job.
Patrice Lucent has been making films in France for decades. Unfortunately
for us in the US, only a few of this master's work has shown on these
shores. Most exemplary (and my favorite Leconte film to date) is his
black-and-white masterpiece, "Girl on the Bridge." That work was an
extraordinary, stylish work that showcased its stars, Daniel Auteuil and
Vanessa Paradis. The film was an intense character study that had a love
story beneath the surface. With "The Widow of St. Pierre," Leconte moves
into a period piece depicting the harsh life on the remote French colony
while making a strong statement against the death penalty. With the likes
of Auteuil and Binoche in the leads, he also can't help having rich
characterizations, too. Then, too, there's the striking looks and strong,
quiet character provided by director Emir Kusturica as Neel Auguste.
Leconte uses his tried and trusted behind-the-camera crew to put, once
again, a striking image on the screen. His long-time cinematographer
Eduardo Serra captures the cold desolation of St. Pierre while giving it a
stark, photo-quality beauty. This complements both set design, by Ivan
Maussion, and the fine costumes, by Christian Gasc, that firmly place the
viewer right on that cold, cruel island in the mid 1800's.
"The Widow of St. Pierre" is another example of quality filmmaking by a
master. Leconte is an expert at his craft and, with his fine cast and crew,
continues to please. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sexy Beast (2000)
Gary "Gel" Dove (Ray Winstone) lives in quiet complacency on the sunny
coast of southern Spain. To all appearances, he is a normal middle-aged guy
who opted for early retirement. When friends tell him that he is about to
have a visit from Don Logan (Ben Kingsley), fear strikes the hearts of all
in "Sexy Beast."
One thing that "Sexy Beast" definitely is, is an enigma. It is, as far as I
can tell, a one of a kind, dazzlingly colorful gangster film noir. Music
vid and commercial director Jonathan Glazer does make quite a splash (and
not just at the film's funny, offbeat rolling stone opening) with a
gangster film that is long on talk and brief, even terse, on caper.
Gal has done time for his gangland deeds and is now blissfully retired to a
villa on the Costa del Sol with his mutually adoring wife, Deedee (Amanda
Redman). Aside from a near miss by a huge, mysteriously rolling stone, life
on the sunny Spanish shoreline could not be better. Until he learns that he
is about to have a visit by the sinister Don Logan (Ben Kingsley), a blast
from his gangster past. Just when Gal had himself convinced that he was out
of the crime game for good, Logan arrives to drag him back in, whether he
wants to or not. Gal is convinced that if he tells Don to his face, "I'm
not gonna do it," all will be well. But, it won't and the violent,
unpredictable Logan will not take "no" for an answer.
This scenario, with snippets of the setup for the upcoming London caper
mixed in, takes up the first two-thirds of the film, and precedes the heist
itself with a violent confrontation with Don. Gal arrives in London, sans
Logan, and wholeheartedly does his bit to pull off the grand theft and take
attention away from the missing Don. Crime boss and mastermind of the
break-in into an ultra secure vault, Teddy Best (Ian McShane), smells a rat
in Gal and does not believe his underling's story on the whereabouts of
Logan. After the heist and a pointedly insulting payoff to Gal, the
ultra-sinister Teddy promises that he might pay a visit to Gal in Spain,
just to see how he's doing. Once in, never out.
Ray Winstone does a fine job as the troubled Gal. The retired criminal's
particular talent (though this is not made clear in one of the movie's
ambiguities) earned him a good enough living, but after being busted and
doing time, he lost his taste for crime, seeking the solitude of Spain to
spend his days with Deedee. Ray doesn't have the gonads to stand up to Don
and weakens under his violent colleague's constant badgering. Winstone ably
displays Gal's tumble into insecurity and fear.
Ben Kingsley earns point as a violent, uncontrollable monster, but his
character is one-note sinister and doesn't rise above his symbol of Ray's
past evils. More effective in being a full-fledged bad guy is Ian McShane.
His Teddy Best conveys a violent, unbridled power capable of snuffing out
life in the blink of the eye. In a much smaller role than Kingsley's, he
develops into a three-D person, though one you would not want to cross.
Amanda Redman's Deedee puts depth into Deedee, making her the obviously
strong member of the couple. The rest of the supporting cast is capable,
but are mainly there to flesh things out. James Fox appears, in little more
than a cameo, as Teddy's ex, in more ways than one.
There is a bigger film here and it's unfortunate that the makers saw to
keep it short and sweet. While "Sexy Beast" is fun in its psychedelic noir,
there should have been more to it. I never thought I would willingly say
that a film should be longer than it is, but that is what is needed here.
The caper sequence is handled so quickly and stylishly, with an underwater
break-in as the linchpin, I wanted to see more, particularly of Teddy Best.
There could have been a great ruthless bad guy performance if McShane had
more screen time.
The techs, from camera, by Ivan Bird, to sets and locales and costumes, are
of a mind with the color-saturated eye of helmer Glazer. Frequent surreal
scenes, with Gal's nightmares prominent, also lend to the noir nature of
this modern gangster parable. At first, I compared "Sexy Beast" to the
classic Brit gangster flick, "The Long Good Friday," but comparison falls
apart pretty quickly, and in the end, it feels more akin to "The Hit" with
a dollop of "The Godfather 3" thrown on top. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pledge, The (2001)
Jerry Black (Jack Nicholson) is only hours away from retirement with the
Reno, Nevada police department when he learns of the brutal murder and rape
of a little girl in a nearby town. Drawn to the case like a firehouse horse
to flame, Jerry helps with the investigation and volunteers to tell the
girl's parents of her death. He opens a Pandora's box of problems for
himself, though, when he vows to find the murderer in Sean Penn's "The
Pledge."
Director Penn, from the start of his helming career with "Indian Runner"
through "The Crossing Guard" and now with "The Pledge," has proven to be a
serious filmmaker who knows his craft, but fails to give a range of emotion
to his work. He explores the darker side of life in all of his
behind-the-camera efforts and provides a good character showcase for his
stars, but he is too earnest in his efforts. As such, there is a relentless
quality to "The Pledge" as we see Jerry vow, on his mortal soul, to find
the killer of little Ginny.
The stage is set within minutes that this is the story of a man, a cop for
a lifetime, facing the unknowns of retirement. Like an old bloodhound too
tired to continue but too proud to quit, Jerry, in his waning hours as a
police detective, latches on to his last case - the brutal murder of the
little girl. The case becomes an obsession for the ex-cop when he pledges
to the girl's mother, on a cross Ginny made herself, to solve the case, no
matter what. It's a character study by Nicholson that falters only a little
along the way and is a nice departure from his usual "Jack."
Joining Nicholson is a collection of actors who settle nicely into the film
tapestry created by Penn and his companions. Robin Wright Penn goes out on
a limb, forgoing glamour for gritty in her perf as a bruised and battered
woman and mother who accepts Jerry's offer of protection from further
abuse. Wright Penn gives an arc to her role as Lori, who trusts Jerry
implicitly only to have that trust tested by his obsessive dedication to
fulfill his pledge to another. When Lori sees that Jerry put her daughter,
Chrissy (Pauline Roberts), in harms way to honor his promise, she, too,
sees the depth of his obsession. Aaron Eckhart is serviceable as Jerry's
former partner, Stan Krolak). Benicio Del Toro gives yet another different
performance to his growing resume of character roles.
It's amusing to see the star power of someone like Sean Penn when he builds
a project like "The Pledge." Besides his second time collaboration with
Nicholson, the helmer attracts a bevy of name actors who fill in the small
and cameo roles in a who's who of Hollywood. Vanessa Redgrave lends her
grand dame personage to the touching performances as little Ginny's
grandma. Also appearing are Sam Shepard, Mickey Rourke, Harry Dean Stanton,
Tom Noonan and Helen Mirren in a variety of small perfs that help flesh out
the background of "The Pledge."
The story is adapted by Jerzy Kromolowski and Mary Olson-Kromolowski from
the novel by Friedrich Duerrenmatt. The tale is many things, besides its
character study by Nicholson, including investigation of murder and the
search for a child killer. There is an obviousness to the story, not unlike
Jerry's own, that make the unraveling of false leads and would-be killers a
device used to misdirect the viewer from the real killer. The ambiguity of
the ending and Jerry's plunge into mental collapse make "The Pledge" more
interesting as a character study than a murder yarn.
The techs behind the camera are outstanding. Chris Menges provides
unconventional photography that pulls you in close to the action, using the
camera to give very different points of view. Production design is
striking, at times, especially when Jerry goes the turkey ranch owned by
Ginny's parents. In a brief moment of humor, the turkeys appear to be
gathered to hear Jerry's bad news, holding on to his every word. It's a
striking image.
Helmer Penn knows his craft and how to get good perfs from his actors. His
unrelenting stalwartness as a director is keeping him from infusing
humanity into his directing work, though, and he keeps the viewer at arm's
length throughout his telling. Good acting, especially from Jack Nicholson,
helps save the day and I give "The Pledge" a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Glaneurs et la glaneuse, Les (2000)
The gleaners of yesteryear were peasant women who rummaged for the bits of 
wheat left over from the harvest. Documentary filmmaker Agnes Varda studies 
the modern day foragers of France who now glean (or, gather) everything 
from grapes to garbage to clocks without hands in "The Gleaners & I." 
This is an uneven little documentary that benefits, greatly, from its 
untapped subject matter. As far as I know, there has not been another film 
to cover the lifestyle of the gleaners of the world, and the grandma of 
French New Wave cinema, Varda, gives us a unique view into an unusual 
world. 
The original gleaners had been such a presence in the old agrarian culture 
of France that it eventually became the institutionalized right of the 
practitioners of the gathering art. Today, legal statutes guarantee that 
the traditional rights of the gleaner continue, unfettered, following the 
harvests throughout the country. We learn about the differences between the 
gleaners, who turn the earth to find their treasures, and the pickers, who 
invade the vineyards and orchards after the harvest. There is even a 
subculture that reserves the right to glean oysters following that harvest. 
Varda goes on to compare the nature of gleaning and the similar methods 
that the urban homeless use to garner enough to eat and live, without 
money, in the cities. The marketplaces that carry the fresh produce for the 
urban areas, at the end of the day, become the place for the scavengers to 
go to search for anything that is left behind. Fresh fruit and veggies, 
cheese, meat and fish are gathered to feed those who take the time to live 
off of the land. 
Varda's roving video camera follows other modern gleaners who choose to 
collect the cast-asides of society, like TV's, refrigerators and stoves, to 
repair and sell to survive. Still other foragers use the public's detritus 
for more esoteric uses, like artistic expression. Today, gleaning is not 
just for wheat gatherers anymore. 
Agnes Varda captures some fascinating moments during the course of "The 
Gleaners & I," but as I said earlier, the effort is uneven. Some of the 
more interesting stories and styles are given short shrift, while other, 
less interesting, subjects are given far too much air time. Varda also 
intrudes herself in the film (the "& I" of the title) in an effort to show 
that she, with her video camera, is simply another gleaner let loose on the 
world. When the documentarian chooses to be a subject and not just an 
observer, attention is taken from the real subject. She indulges, in one 
far too long a scene, in taping a dangling lens cap from a camera left 
running. The dance of the cap reps Varda's own gleaning of the images she 
captures, accidentally or not. Mostly, her intruding is an annoyance in 
what is otherwise an interesting documentary. 
I give a qualified recommendation for "The Gleaners & I" since it offers a 
view into a world unknown to us. In fact, with the American obsession with 
rights of privacy and property, the gleaner could not even exist here, but 
continues to thrive in France. I give it a C+. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Invisible Circus, The (2001)
18-year old Phoebe O'Connor (Jordanna Brewster) spent her teen years
possessed by the memory of her older sister Faith (Cameron Diaz). Faith
left home years before to go to Europe to "do something important." She
died. Phoebe has always questioned the death and finally leaves home,
herself, to find the truth in "The Invisible Circus."
Adapting the novel by Jennifer Egan, Adam Brooks scripts and directs this
road journey/coming-of-age story about a young woman growing up in the
70's. By the beginning of that decade, the hippie philosophy of changing
the world through peace and love had mutated into change-through-terror. In
Europe, radical factions like the Bader-Meinhoff Gang were using guns and
bombs to affect change, attracting revolutionaries from around the world.
Faith and her boyfriend, Wolf (Christopher Eccleston), leave the staid
safety of San Francisco to check out what's happening in Europe. After
wandering the continent to find themselves, Faith is drawn to the
excitement of the Red Army and joins the terrorist group, leaving Wolf
behind. Faith's fails to prove herself as a revolutionary and is abandoned
by the gang. She joins a splinter faction and, when she delivers a bomb to
the offices of a prominent industrialist one night, an innocent man is
killed. Faith is changed forever by the incident.
Years later, after Faith's death in Portugal, Phoebe takes the postcards
that her sister faithfully sent her, kisses her mom (Blythe Danner)
goodbye, and heads to the Continent. Once there, she traces Faith's
movements from Amsterdam to Berlin to Paris where she finds Wolf. Her
appearance at his doorstep and her mission cause the expatriated American
to join Phoebe on her quest. A romance ensues. During the journey Phoebe
convinces Wolf to tell her the truth about her sister and this truth is to
change Phoebe forever.
"The Invisible Circus" is throwback film that feels like it was made in the
70's. There is an innocence to both the story and its telling that is
rather refreshing. It does not try to recreate events of the day. Instead,
it shows the essence of the idealism the young possessed at the time. Faith
personifies the free spirit that sees herself as the vehicle of change for
the whole world. When her ideals are dashed by the results of her violent
actions, it reps the loss of innocence for both Faith and the radical youth
movement.
The focus of the story is on young Phoebe as she struggles with the loss of
her sister without understanding why she died. Phoebe lived, vicariously,
through the postcards from Faith, seeing the world from her sister's eyes.
Faith's death and Phoebe's newfound independence cause the young woman to
follow in her sister's steps. The ensuing journey is both physical and
spiritual for Phoebe as she finds herself, love and, finally, the answers
she seeks. It's an interesting story of a young woman whose experiences and
pain turn her into a wiser, though more melancholy, young adult.
Jordanna Brewster does a solid job as Phoebe. She has to carry the bulk of
the screen time and actually matures as the story progresses. The young
actress acquits herself well. Cameron Diaz has the difficult role of being
the idol of her sister's eye and her character is held at arm's length to
be examined by her sister (and the viewer). Christopher Eccleston is
believable as Wolf. He, too, has a tough role and walks a fine line between
weakness and strength. Blythe Danner's is little more than a cameo
performance, but she does do a good mom. Patrick Bergin appears in
flashback as the girls' father.
Production is well done with beautifully selected European locations. It's
almost a travelogue as we journey to the canals of Amsterdam, the streets
of Paris and the lush scenery of Portugal. It looks good, too, with the
photography Henry Braham and costumes by Donna Zakowska lending to the feel
of the 70's. There is also a surreal element, nicely handled, when Phoebe
meets the members of the title troupe in a display of magic, juggling and
dance.
"The Invisible Circus" is a good coming-of-age tale that has a sensible arc
to its story. It should have an attraction for more mature teens and young
adults, though I doubt if it will set any fires. I give it a C+.
For more Reeing reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
The Vice President of the United States is dead and President Jackson Evans
(Jeff Bridges) is being pressed from all sides to replace the deceased politico.
Governor Jack Hathaway (William Petersen) seems like a shoe-in for the nations
number two spot, especially after he performs a heroic rescue attempt while on a
fishing holiday. But, the president has different plans and unceremoniously
rejects Hathaway in favor of Senator Laine Billings Hanson (Joan Allen), who
could be the first female vice president, ever, in "The Contender."
Writer/director Rod Lurie takes on a subject that is reminiscent of the
political films of the 60's, especially Otto Preminger's "Advise and Consent."
The older film also dealt with a political appointment to a powerful government
post - Henry Fonda vying for the Secretary of State, then, versus Joan Allen
shooting for the VP slot now. The 1962 film was made at the height of the Red
Scare, so the plot revolved around the political morality of right against left,
with a strong, almost preachy, moral message. "The Contender" brings us into the
new millennium with a very different kind of political tale, but with a hint of
the ethics of a bygone era.
Lurie's screenplay cuts right to the chase from the start. Governor Hathaway's
vain but brave attempt to save a young woman from drowning makes him appear to
be the perfect nominee for VP. He's surprised, even shocked, when White House
Chief of Staff Kermit Newman declares that the rescue effort would be compared,
by the public, to Ted Kennedy and Chappaquidic. The president thanks him,
declares the governor "the future of the party," and nearly boots him out of the
Oval Office. Evans says, "I need a VP" and demands that Laine Hanson get the
nomination.
A woman vice president is a hard pill to swallow for those - men - in power.
Newman questions his boss's stubbornly held decision to back Hanson. Even more
formidable, senior Congressman Sheldon Runyon (Gary Oldman), who heads the
committee tasked to investigate the nominee, has his own agenda. Shelly knows,
in his heart, that Hanson is not the right person for the job that is a
heartbeat away from the presidency. He is joined by a freshman congressman,
Reginald Webster (Christian Slater), who is looking to make the right
connections and sees the senior politician as his means to an end. The search
for the dirt that will bury Laine's chances for VP begins in earnest.
Runyon's investigation of Hanson's past uncovers some sordid evidence from her
college days. The photos that come to the surface show a young woman who looks
like Laine performing sex with two men. Even as the photos are entered into the
official records of the committee hearing, they are leaked onto the Internet in
an effort to gain public opposition to Hanson's appointment. Sen. Hanson refuses
to even bother denying the accusations as they are beneath her dignity. As the
committee continues its inquisition of Hanson, Runyon tries to build upon his
accusation of sexual deviance by introducing questions about Laine's positions
on birth control, adultery, abortion and switching political parties. Hanson
maintains her unshakable dignity throughout as the political intrigues build
around her.
It's not just hearings and smutty pictures, though, as Lurie builds his
characters into complex people. Good and bad are not simple concepts and there
is complexity in the minds and hearts of the characters. Actually, the talented
cast puts flesh on the bones of his characters, giving each a nuance that make
them unique individual. This is not a film that draws its images and people in
black and white.
Joan Allen, for the first time in all of her respectable career, is the center
of attention in "The Contender" and she proves her capability as a first rate
actor quite able to control the center stage. Even though there is "proof" of
her sexual indiscretions, Laine maintains her stand on her record, not on
denying some foggy accusations. Allen gives her role the dignity that befits the
honest senator. You know she knows that she has what it takes to do the job, she
just has to get past the sordid side of politics to get that job. Allen is
forceful and dynamic in her performance as a woman who grew up in politics (her
father, played by Philip Baker Hall, is a highly respected ex-governor) and
gained her own respect in the Senate. If anyone is going to break in to the male
dominated Executive Branch, Laine Hanson is the one to do it. There aren't many
"best actress" perfs so far this year. Allen's is one of them.
Allen's fine performance is supplemented by some terrifically effective
supporting characters. Jeff Bridges is a wonderful enigma as the president.
Jackson Evans is in the waning years of his successful, two-term presidency and
is comfortable as can be in his position as world leader. Bridges gives a
relaxed, confident performance and comes across as very presidential, indeed.
Evans is in charge of a smooth running government machine and has the best
running it. The president can even partake in a bit of frivolity as he has a
ongoing challenge to try and stump the White House chef by asking for shark
steak sandwiches or walnut pudding with nary a moment's notice. Bridges also
gives a touch of elegance to the role, especially when decked out in his
splendid custom wardrobe, which I'll get to later.
Gary Oldman, whom I think is one of the great character actors alive today, is
simply superb as the outwardly slimy Sheldon Runyon. The powerful congressman
comes across as unscrupulous in his diligent attacks on Sen. Hanson. But, Oldman
gives Shelly a level of complexity that makes you understand his motivations. He
is not a bad man and his opposition of the nomination is based on firmly held
political convictions. He believes, as he puts it, "this nomination is the
cancer of affirmative action" and this is his motivation in opposing the
president's wishes. Oldman, with some really bad hair and an equally bad
wardrobe, also gives a dead-on Midwestern accent and makes you forget that
you're watching an actor.
Sam Elliot is executive office material as the president's chief of staff. He is
the Greek chorus in the White House and openly opposes his boss on his selection
for VP. But, he is loyal above all and, when the die is cast, he stands firmly
behind President Evans. Christian Slater has a small, pivotal role as the frosh
rep Webster. When we meet the ambitious young man, he aligns himself with
Runyon, looking only for political advancement. As the truth, and Laine's
integrity, comes to the surface, Webster changes and grows to support the
President. It's a nice touch showing a newly elected politician learning the
importance of personal honor.
The first rate production shows artistic imagination. Costuming by Matthew
Jacobsen provides the right tailoring for the president and gives Allen an
elegant look in business suits and evening gowns. Production designer Alexander
Hammond does a beautiful job in recreating the Oval Office and the floor of
Congress. Denis Maloney's crisp lensing adds another plus to the proceedings.
One problem, kind of a big one, with the script is an important development
concerning Governor Hathaway. I won't give it away, but suspension of disbelief
is required of us to accept an out-of-nowhere plot twist. It detracts from the
overall quality of the story. Nonetheless, "The Contender" is a solid political
thriller with old-fashioned concepts packaged in a slick, well-made container. I
give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for When Brendan Met Trudy (2000)
Brendan (Peter McDonald) is a Dublin high school teacher that loves music
and movies, but hates teaching. When an extraordinary young woman named
Trudy (Flora Montgomery) enters his life, he soon learns that there is more
to living than Bogart and Brahms in "When Brendan Met Trudy."
The movie begins a la "Sunset Boulevard" with a body lying motionless in
the gutter and a voice over explaining how he, Brendan, could arrive at
such a nadir of life. As the story unfolds and more film references are
mentioned and shown, we begin to understand that our hero is a tormented
individual who is in desperate need of a change. His profession, teaching
history and English at a Dublin high school, is unfulfilling, to say the
least, and he seeks solace in his movies and his passion for song. This
changes when Trudy enters the picture.
Trudy, Brendan learns, is a professional burglar and he, at first, is
energized by the excitement of her crimes. Things are looking up for the
teacher until he makes a big mistake and introduces his new girlfriend to
his family, especially Nuala (Pauline McLynn), the sister from hell.
Brendan succumbs to family pressure and, soon after, he and Trudy are no
longer an item. This is when he ends up in the gutter, shown in the
beginning of the film, pretending to have been hit by a car in a vain cry
for sympathy from Trudy. It takes an act of selfless bravery, later, by
Brendan to impress Trudy and she agrees to take him back - if he helps her
rob Nuala's home. The excitement of the deed drives Brendan to an even
grander criminal plan - steal all of the hated computers from his school.
But, things go awry and Trudy ends up in jail, shielding Brendan from
arrest.
 When Trudy is sentenced to two years in prison, Brendan mopes around,
guilt-ridden and lonely over his loss of love. Even the heroes in his
movies, his only comfort in the past, seem to mock him for letting the love
of his life take the rap for him. He musters the courage to visit Trudy in
prison and finds she has forgiven him. He unabashedly breaks out in a song
that is both joy and redemption.
"When Brendan Met Trudy" is a nice idea for a film, but is less than it
could be in the hands of first time feature director Kieron J. Walsh. The
helmer hales from advertising and TV and it shows in the two-dimensional
nature of the story and its protagonists. The tale focuses on Brendan and
his passion for film and music is an integral part of his makeup. Peter
McDonald doesn't take us far below the surface of the feckless Brendan, but
the offbeat love story, music and film references are entertaining.
Flora Montgomery has the harder role as the self-assured, criminally minded
Trudy. Her toughness opposite Brendan's milquetoast character is supposed
to be a turning of the tables with the couple reversing conventional roles
of tough guy, subservient gal. Trudy is too bubbly to come across as a
tough-as-nails thief, but Montgomery does her best to breathe life into her
role.
There is little going on to distract the viewer from the central story.
Wacky and weird family members make up the background, but they, too, fail
to come across as real people, though Brendan's speak-her-mind mom (Marie
Mullen) gets some shock value out of her foul-mouthed judgements.
"When Brendan Met Trudy" tries to be a romantic comedy with the leads
reversing conventional roles. There isn't a firm enough hand behind the
camera to control the bland script by Roddy Doyle. As such, it moves along
OK and has some kitschy film references with snippets of such classics as
"The Quiet Man," "Africa Queen," "The Producers" and more but fails to
satisfy the film buff in me. I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Session 9 (2001)
Gordon Fleming (Peter Mullan) is in a bind. He has a new, unexpected baby
and his business, hazardous material removal, is in danger of going under.
When he and his crew get a job opportunity at the long-abandoned Danvers
State Hospital, he underbids the competition to secure the contract and
promises to get the three-week job done in one. It will prove to be a
fateful week for them all in "Session 9."
Gordo gets the job to remove asbestos and other hazardous materials from
the spooky old mental hospital in preparation for relocating town offices
there. Their guided tour of the facility by a local official, Bill Giggs
(Paul Guilfoyle), brings them through some of the creepier parts of the
former asylum. But, a job is a job and, if they finish in a week, as
promised, there is a $10000 bonus in store.
As they get down to their work, things, normal and not so normal, begin to
happen. Gordon hears a disembodied voice beckoning him. Phil (David Caruso)
is conflicted working with a guy, Hank (Josh Lucas), who is seeing his old
girlfriend. Mike (co-screenwriter Steven Gevedon) has discovered a cache of
audiotapes and transcripts from old psychiatric sessions (hence, the title)
with inmate Mary Hobbs, a multi-personality patient with a dark secret.
Gordo's nephew, Jeff (Brendan Sexton III), suffers from night phobia and is
afraid to venture into the dark bowels of the hospital. As the agreed upon
week draws to an end, Hank mysteriously disappears from the workplace after
a nocturnal confrontation with someone (something?) in the hospital.
Tensions mount and distrust build among the rest as they watch their chance
for the bonus start to slip away. But, there is more, much more, at stake
as the hospital and its history of insanity weigh on them all.
I don't want to give away too much of the story of "Session 9," so I'll
stop there. What we have here is a spooky horror flick that uses none of
the jump-out-at-you-from-the-dark cheap shots that have become part and
parcel with horror films since the advent of "Halloween" and "Friday the
Thirteenth." There is no cat leaping out of the dark or the shock of
suddenly seeing oneself in a strategically placed mirror. With the
exception of one shadowy and chilling image at one point spooky interlude
in the film, there is little that you can get your arms around as far as
what, specifically, is "frightening."
As I watched "Session 9" I became aware of the subtle things that built up
during the story that make it a true horror movie. The striking
high-definition video camera work by Uta Briesewitz (who worked with the
director, Brad Anderson, on his "Next Stop Wonderland")
helps to build up tension with close-ups, fluid camera movement and odd
angles in a way that would make Alfred Hitchcock proud. Music, too, is used
to intense effect, joining with the camera to make simple scenes
frightening, even horrifying. Couple these tech feats with an intelligent
story that uses elements of "The Shining," "The Blair Witch Project" and,
even "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" and you get a decent, intriguing horror
flick. Additionally, the brilliant decision to shoot at Danvers State
Hospital gives the film another starring character, the institution itself,
which lends even more chills to the equation.
Acting is another factor that raises "Session 9" above the usual dreck
presented in recent horror hits like "Scream," "I Know What You Did Last
Summer" and their sequels. Those films took good-looking, though generic,
young actors and actresses and put them to use to build up a body count,
substituting mayhem for real horror. Anderson opted, instead, to use
mature, experienced actors like Peter Mullan and David Caruso to fill his
characters' shoes and the difference in casting quality is notable. Mullan,
in particular, puts an arc on his character, Gordon, as the troubled guy
who slowly and inexorably falls under the pressures of family, job and,
finally, Danvers State Hospital.
The rest of the small cast fit the bill as people, not just fodder for the
mayhem. David Caruso, as Gordo's senior man and near equal in the business,
shows just how good an actor he is. He made the jump from TV's "NYPD Blue"
to film far too soon and his decisions in the roles he took (I'll never
forget the horrendous "Jade") were less than star making. He rolls his
sleeves up and does the job well here. Gevedon, Lucas and Sexton are more
than fodder, too.
The only problem with "Session 9" lay in the uninspired ending. It takes on
a fairly conventional finale that covers old ground and is a bit of a
disappointment after the terrific (and inspired) build up. The pleasure is
getting there and I wish that Anderson and Gevedon had kept up the steam
they had so ably built during the bulk of the film
"Session 9" is an unusual feat. It is scary, doesn't use cheap tricks and
raises goose bumps with its intelligently rendered, subtle horror. Because
of the local interest of Danvers, it should do well with the Northeast
crowd. I hope it gets the national distribution it deserves. I give it a
B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
"Think of an idea to change our world - and put it into action" - that is the
first assignment posed by Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) to his new seventh grade
social studies class. One young boy, Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel Osment), takes
the assignment to heart and begins a cycle of good deeds that may really change
the world in "Pay It Forward."
Pay it forward. What is it? If someone does you a decent turn, don't repay it,
pay it forward. Do something good for three other people. Then, if they do three
good turns and so on and so on. Before you know it, the world is a better place
for everyone.
Trevor begins his own campaign to "pay it forward" when he befriends a homeless
junkie named Jerry (James Caviezal) and brings him home, much to the chagrin and
fright of Arlene McKinney (Helen Hunt), Trevor's mom. Arlene, a cocktail
waitress in Las Vegas, is a single mom fighting her own demon - alcohol. She was
married to an abusive drunkard (Jon Bon Jovi) who beat her regularly before she
split for Vegas with Trevor.
When her son's attempt to save Jerry fails, the boy selects his teacher, the
fire-scarred Mr. Simonet, as his next pay it forward target. The lonely Eugene
is drawn to the troubled, pretty Arlene and the couple begins to form an
emotional bond when her ex suddenly shows up - triggering one of Trevor's
greatest fears. The chivalrous Eugene bows out of his  budding relationship with
Arlene without a word, leaving Trevor with another failed attempt to pay it
forward. The boy's last effort, to help a meek kid at school stave off bullies,
ends up being the one action that does, in fact, make the world a better place,
even if the cost is fatally high.
Concurrent with this tale about Trevor is the search, by reporter Chris Chandler
(Jay Mohr), to find the source of the idea of paying it forward. While trying to
get a scoop on a hostage story, Chris's vintage Ford Mustang is wrecked by the
fleeing perpetrator. A stranger who happens by hands the puzzled reporter the
keys to a brand new Jaguar and leaves with just the words that he'll be in
touch. When they get together later, the man tells Chris the true story of a
street hood who did him a kindness, in a hospital emergency room, that helped
his daughter, maybe saving her life. The gangster's word to the man, instead of
accepting thanks, is to just pay the favor forward. Now, Chris is required to
fulfill his own pay it forward obligation and becomes obsessed with finding the
source of this remarkable philosophy. His search is the twine that binds his
quest to Trevor's own story.
Director Mimi Leder takes a turn from her first, action feature entries, "The
Peacemaker" and "Deep Impact," with the much more character driven material of
Leslie Dixon's ("The Thomas Crown Affair" remake) original screenplay. The
helmer benefits from the acting talents of the key players and is able to give
some life to the preachy script. The idea of "pay it forward" is repeated so
many times in the course of the film, even an extraordinarily obtuse person
would get the point. The fairly economical film tries to cover too much
territory as it delves into Trevor's attempts to save the world, the multiple
relations of those around the boy, and the reporter's quest for the truth. It's
a bit too ambitious a job and may have been better handled by a director with
more experience dealing with character, rather than plot. Certainly a tighter
screenplay would have befitted the efforts of the cast and crew.
The talented cast is led by two Oscar winners and one nominee, with Spacey, Hunt
and Osment playing the challenged protagonists of the tale. All three show they
deserve the acclaim gained in their recent efforts, though Spacey has proven his
greatness as a superb character actor many times before. Made up as a burn
victim of many years before, Spacey bears the heavy, uglifying makeup with
dignity, showing Eugene as a complex, mostly dour character who has an inherent
kindness that just wants to pop out and let him love Arlene and Trevor as his
own family. When he is rejected, by his own sense of honor, your heart goes out
to the man. Spacey makes you want Eugene to be happy.
Haley Joel Osment proves that he is not a one shot wonder for his perf in "The
Sixth Sense" (although I am glad to say I noted the kid in the otherwise mundane
1996 Whoopi Goldberg/Gerard Depardieu comedy "Bogus"). In his portrayal of the
right-minded Trevor the inherent intelligence and dedication of the boy is a
significant force in the development of the story and Osment meets the need with
a professionalism that belies his years.
Helen Hunt does fine as the put upon, alcoholic Arlene who doesn't see that
Eugene is true salvation when her handsome, apologetic (and declared sober) ex
returns. Unfortunately, Hunt developed her character as too sympathetic toward
Eugene, so her sudden acceptance of the old ways doesn't play true. Especially
since she doesn't consult Trevor, who is profoundly impacted by her decision.
Unfortunately for Hunt, her character, Arlene, is not much different from her
previous, Oscar-garnering perf in "As Good As It Gets." She's a working class,
single Mom, struggling with adversity (ill kid versus alcohol) and meeting Mr.
Right.
Jay Mohr does yeoman work as the smart-ass reporter digging for the story. Jim
Caviezel isn't given much time as the recipient of Trevor's pay it forward, but
his story gets a nice little coda of redemption when he save a young lady from
self destruction. Angie Dickinson (unrecognized to me, though not others) plays
Trevor's homeless - by choice - grandmother who has a late-breaking influence on
things.
Techs are solid throughout. It's not the acting or the behind-the-camera work
that is the problem. Dixon's overly ambition screenplay tries to cover too much
ground in the allotted time and harps on its theme of "pay it forward." I got
the idea early on, so the subsequent 20 or 30 references fell on deaf ears.
"Pay It Forward" is an odd mix of good acting talent and an under-achieving
script that hampers the overall effort. Leder makes the transition from action
to character study with more than a few bumps, but practice will make perfect, I
suppose. With the credentials of the talent involved in this effort, I would
have expected more, much more. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Crew, The (2000)
Bobby (Richard Dreyfuss), Bats (Burt Reynolds), The Brick (Dan Hedaya) and Mouth
(Seymour Cassel) are four retired wise guys from New York who retired a while
back to the sunny comfort of Miami Beach. But, inflation and rising real estate
values have put their golden years in jeopardy when they find out their hotel,
the Raj Mahal, is being "renewed" and they are about to be put out on the
street. They hatch a plot involving a corpse and a faked mob hit to save their
homestead, but things do not go as planned in "The Crew."
Director Michael ("The Wonder Years") show his TV chops in the breezy little
comedy about an over the hill gang of wise guys who refuse to let the system
push them around. When their hotel is about to be yanked from beneath them, they
realize that they need to do something pretty quick or else. Mike "The Brick"
Donatelli, it so happens, works at a mortician's as a hobby, making up the
deceased for display to friends and family. The four goombas decide to steal one
of the bodies - an unclaimed one - put it in the lobby of their hotel and shoot
it to make it look like a mob job. Great idea. One problem. The body turns out
to be the missing elderly father of a prominent drug lord in Miami.
The pat set up for the twisty, turny tale that ensues has the look and feel of
an hour long TV sit com. Problems are presented to the four former Mafioso
musketeers and they use the knowledge gained during their shady pasts to over
come each one. In true situation comedy style, new troubles balloon out from the
old and the guys have to dig deeper into their pasts to overcome each new
obstacle. It comes as no surprise when the fab four wins in the end. There is
some good fun in watching them get there, though.
The large cast works in true ensemble fashion, with no one stealing the show and
all getting a chance to showcase their stuff. Richard Dreyfuss as Bobby "I never
got a nickname" Bartellemeo, also doing double duty as the narrator, is the
hinge pin of the film, playing the smarter of the quartet and, if you can call
it that, the voice of reason for the four. Burt Reynolds gets to reprise his
tough guy persona as Joey "Bats" Pistella. The "Bats" nickname suits him for two
reasons - it was (and is) his favorite tool of his former trade and he is a
little loopy (bats in the belfry). He's the muscle for the crew.
Dan Hedaya is sweetly goofy and a little simple as the Brick. He may not be the
brightest bulb in the circuit, but he is a good and loyal friend to the others.
Seymour Cassel rounds out the little gang of elderly mobsters as Tony "Mouth"
Donato. Years ago, Mouth decided that he had nothing to say and has remained
silent since - until his libido gets the better of him and he beds
stripper/hooker Ferris Lowenstein (Jennifer Tilly, "Bound"). Mouth, it turns
out, does like talk after sex and he spills the beans to Ferris about their
clever plot to keep their home. The sexy stripper uses the info to blackmail the
crew to whack her mother-in-law Pepper Lowenstein (Lainie Kazan). This new
challenge to the fearless four is met in amusing ways, resulting in further
trouble for drug lord Raul Ventana (Miguel Sandoval) when they accidentally burn
his palatial house down.
There are subplots, mostly unnecessary, that involve Bobby searching for his
long lost daughter after years of separation and a broken romance between two
cops investigating the guys' capers. The tagged on feel of Bobby's search and
the romance between Det. Olivia Neal (Carrie-Anne Moss ("The Matrix") and her
partner Steve Menteer (Jeremy Piven, "Very Bad Things") detracts from the main
plot, only clouding the picture with too much going on. The screenplay, by Barry
Fanaro ("Kingpin"), tries to pack way too much into the under 90 minute flick,
diluting the premier portion of the yarn.
The steady downward spiral of one event upon another threatening the four are
all met with humor and energy that belies their aged status. (Not once did one
of them need a nap or complain about his prostate.) There is a lot of pro-senior
citizen philosophy contained in the story that empowers the aged. The "you can
do it" attitude for seniors is a message that came up in the recent "Space
Cowboys" and is readily prevalent in "The Crew." All in all, not a bad thing.
The tech credits - photography by Juan Ruiz-Anchia ("Mr. Jones), costume by
Betsy Cox ("The Muse"), production design, by Peter Larkin ("Get Shorty"),
direction by Dinner and the work of rest of the production crew - help give the
Miami and Miami Beach locales an energy that complements the bright colors,
beautiful people and dazzling sunshine of the area.
"The Crew" is like good popcorn. You're satisfied while you are stuffing your
face, but, a little later, you're still hungry. This aging "Goodfellas"
satisfies while your there, but it doesn't stick with you like a real meal. I
give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Yi yi (2000)
NJ Jian (Wu Nienjen) is at a mid-life crossroads but doesn't know it. His
family suffers through one crisis after another and his business,
prosperous only a year ago, is on the brink of bankruptcy. He is beginning
to question the direction his life has taken when he has a chance encounter
with Sherry (Ke Suyun), his first love and the girl he left behind, without
a word, decades ago. But, this is just the beginning of the stories of the
people who populate the family drama from Taiwan, director Edward Yang's
"Yi-Yi."
The "normal" problems of NJ's existence are further complicated on the day
(a fortuitous one according to the almanac) his debt-ridden brother-in-law,
A-Di (Chen Xisheng), gets married to the very pregnant Xiao Yan (Xiao
Shushen). The wedding, a raucous affair, is disrupted with the appearance
of Yun-Yun (Zeng Xinyi), A-Di's jilted girlfriend. NJ and his wife, Min-Min
(Elaine Jin), are suddenly called away from the reception when they learn
that Min-Min's mother collapsed and was rushed to the hospital.
Grandma (Tang Ruyun) is sent home, in a coma, to be cared for by her
family. Although it is unlikely that she will recover, the doctor
encourages the other family members to talk to the unconscious grandmother
because, maybe, she can hear them. Min-Min can't take the strain as she
comes to realize that her life is wasted - "I tell grandma about my day and
it only takes a minute," she bemoans as she runs off to seek the guidance
of her spiritual teacher, the Master. Her children, Ting-Ting (Kelly Lee)
and Yang-Yang (Jonathan Chang), also have problems talking to the silent
grandma. Ting-Ting blames herself for grandma's mishap, while Yang-Yang
refuses to talk to his grandmother at all.
Meanwhile, NJ is trying to save his stagnant company and it is suggested
that he and his partners team up with a brilliant Japanese games designer,
Ota (Issey Ogata). NJ is chosen to wine and dine the innovator and a fast
friendship develops between the two men. But, the plans they make are soon
subverted by NJ's partners who make a deal with a Taiwan tycoon, Boss
Huang, and opt to use pirated software rather than the quality product that
Ota can provide.
While all this is going on, Ting-Ting begins a romance with Fatty after he
tells her he is no longer dating Lili (Adrian Lin), Ting-Ting's new
neighbor and friend. Eight year old Yang-Yang gets in trouble at school and
has no one to turn to with mom in the mountains and dad trying to save his
business. Little Yang-Yang also harbors a crush on a pretty classmate who
swims. A-Di's investment manager has gone broke and fled the country,
leaving the luckless A-Di with nothing. Yun-Yun still feels she has control
over A-Di and crashes the couple's baby shower. Xiao Yan later finds A-Di
unconscious in a gas filled bathroom. Is it by accident or by design?
NJ, thinking the deal with Ota is genuine, heads to Tokyo for more
discussion and, coincidentally, to meet Sherry. His jilted lover still
carries a torch for the handsome, taciturn NJ, but he tells her, during a
private interlude, that he does not have those feelings anymore. He left
her, decades before, because he could not tell her, then, that she and her
mother were stifling him and forcing him down a path not wanted. Ongoing,
also, are the underhanded dealings of NJ's partners as Boss Huang forms an
"alliance" with the sexy owner of the knock off company and drives NJ's
business further down. On the home front, Ting-Ting is summoned from school
and learns that Fatty has attacked and brutally murdered a tutor who has
been having an affair with Fatty's old lover, Lili, and her mother.
There is even more going on in this epic-scoped soap opera of the life of
an extended family than what I have already described. The complex story,
written by helmer Yang, is a rich mining of the emotions, needs and desires
of normal people. Far from creating larger-than-life beings whose problems
are loftier than those for us mere mortals, the world of "Yi-Yi" teams with
average folk with very human flaws. At the center is NJ, a quiet,
intelligent man who is comfortable in his reserve. He learned, early in his
life, to go after what he wanted, not what was expected of him. As his
family faces their own crises, NJ, from the time he spent with the
deep-thinking Ota, relearns the lessons of life, once again taking matters
into his own hands.
With NJ as the anchor of "Yi-Yi" (English title is "A One and a Two?"), the
rest of the players are given free reign on their individual tales of love,
sadness, pain and pleasure. Some stories, like NJ and Ota and NJ and
Sherry, are more compelling than the others, but they are all intriguing in
their own way. This is one of those rare films, with a run-time of 173
minutes, which you beg to continue when the credits start to roll. Edward
Yang ties things up nicely at the end, but his storytelling is so masterful
that you want to see what happens next in this elegant family drama.
Capitalizing on the rich screenplay is the textured, beautifully composed
photography by Yang Weihan who frames every shot like a gorgeous
photograph. Helmer Yang uses the extended, near silent photography to allow
us to linger on the images up on the screen. It's almost like a leisurely
stroll in an art gallery to gander at the works of a master. The languid
pace afforded the wonderful cinematography pads the running time
considerably, but is such a visual pleasure you don't notice the time. The
visual impact of the film is key to its overall high quality. Of course,
production design, costume, the brilliant use of colors to change the films
mood and the rest of the techs all contribute to this superior work.
The vast ensemble cast revolves around Wu Nienjen as NJ. The screenwriter
turned actor/director plays the strong, silent type here, but a man with a
great deal of emotion and feeling under his inscrutable surface. The
terrific cast around him is too numerous to catalogue, but they all give
solid performances right down to little Yang-Yang, whose final speech over
grandma's casket tells it all. From the mouths of babes?.
"Yi-Yi" is a true universal film that has appeal across cultural and racial
boundaries as it tells its stories of the day-to-day lives and plights of
normal people in normal, and sometimes not-so-normal, times as they cope
with life's difficulties, both large and small. Kudos to Edward Yang with
his Taiwan-contender for Best Foreign Film this year. I give it an A.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
"Pearl Harbor." We have been hearing about this event film for over a year
and finally, like a plague of locusts, it has descended on theaters
everywhere. Director Michael Bay has parleyed his estimated $135 million
budget into a 3-hour tome that, I have to say, I could have done without.
Don't get me wrong. I knew that the draw for "Pearl Harbor" would be the
much-discussed special F/X and computer graphics used to depict the
Japanese sneak attack on the slumbering battleship fleet of the US Navy
stationed at the Pearl. I expected that Bay and "Braveheart" scripter
Randall Wallace would shoot for an old-fashioned romantic yarn to wrap
around the action that we're there to see. They do this but, unfortunately,
the tale we get is bland and insipid, with little dimension given to the
players in what amounts to a romantic triangle with a backdrop of war.
I'll get to the kick-ass F/X in a minute, but I really want to complain
about the story and its inherent silliness. I knew things were going to be
cliched and little more when, early in the film, fighter pilot Rafe
McCaully (Ben Affleck) gives his beau, Evelyn (Kate Beckinsale), an origami
bird to remember him by. My immediate thought was, "An origami bird? That's
stupid!" It turned out to be the kick off gesture of the contrived yarn
that is to come.
The huge cast is lost in the turmoil of the telling of the story as the
setup is made for the pending attack while the individual stories of the
stars unfold. Cocky Rafe, on the verge of love and war in the Pacific,
takes an offer by the British to join the American Eagle squadron to do
battle with the Nazis in Europe. He becomes missing-in-action and his best
friend, Danny (Josh Hartnet), must break the bad news to Evelyn. Danny
can't help being smitten with the beautiful Evelyn, but propriety and the
memory of Rafe keeps him from acting hasty. As the months pass, the two
can't help but fall in love. Then, Rafe miraculously appears on the scene
and the triangular romantic angst surfaces. The lack of life given to the
characters keeps this core story from ever getting off the ground.
If you are patient, though, and don't mind spending your movie-going
dollars on the 35-minute long extravaganza of the attack on Pearl, you will
have a visual treat, at least for a little while. From the moment that the
Japanese lead pilot signals "tora, tora, tora," you are in for some of the
most action packed, violent eye-candy we have seen since the opening of
"Saving Private Ryan." As a matter of fact, there is more than passing
borrowing from that Spielberg film, James Cameron's "Titanic," "From Here
to Eternity" and a myriad of Hollywood war movies from the 40's and 50's.
Too bad Bay garners the most mediocre of these contributing elements.
Historical accuracy has never been high on the list of things-to-do for
Hollywood filmmakers and that tradition continues with "Pearl Harbor."
History mavens will be, gleefully, all over this movie like ugly on an ape.
Details like the paint jobs on the Japanese Zeroes, the types of ships
anchored in the harbor, the kinds of uniforms and more will be scrutinized,
closely. Erroneous details like the presence of Admiral Yamamoto aboard the
attacking carriers or President Roosevelt rising out of his wheelchair
unassisted will make some cringe. But, it's about what I expect from the
man that brought us "Armageddon." Oh, yeah. I almost forgot that it's not
just about the attack on Pearl. Once that is over, the makers tack on an
extended sequence depicting Jimmy Doolittle's daring raid on Japan, a la
Mervyn LeRoy's "Thirty Seconds Over Tokyo." With a few more bucks added to
the budget, Bay could have added the Korean War, too.
Special F/X and a bunch of money do not make a good movie. There has to be
a story, a believable one at least, to attach everything to and that does
not happen here. "Pearl Harbor" bombs and I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Town & Country (2001)
Warren Beatty, Diane Keaton, Goldie Hawn and Gary Shandling star as a pair 
of married couples whose complacent lives are about to be shaken up in 
director Peter Chelsom's version of the classic romantic, screwball comedy 
in "Town & Country." 
The drawing room farce of the 30's dealt with sexual innuendo and relied on 
wit and a great deal of commotion and noise to place the viewer in the 
thick of the duplicitous romantic action. Back then, impossibly wealthy 
scions of society, with too much free time, would get themselves wrapped up 
in all sorts of sexual peccadilloes with spouses and lovers, only to have 
everything come out all right in the end - see "The Philadelphia Story" for 
a great farce. "Town & Country" has the impossibly wealthy protagonists 
with too much free time - the kind of people that have jobs but never seem 
to work - and sexual misconduct on several levels. But, there is almost no 
life to original script by Michael Laughlin and Buck Henry and this is 
"T&C's" downfall. 
There is, obviously, a great deal of Hollywood talent, in front of and 
behind the camera, involved in "Town & Country," but, without a likable or, 
at least, interesting story to carry through their efforts, it is all for 
naught. And, that's what we get here - naught. 
Porter Stoddard (Beatty) is a high-powered New York architect with a very 
good life indeed. His 25-year marriage to Ellie (Diane Keaton) appears, on 
the surface, to be perfect. But, there are cracks just below this pristine 
surface. His wife is suspicious of his whereabouts, his kids don't need him 
and his best friends, Griffin (Garry Shandling) and Mona (Goldie Hawn), are 
in the midst of a divorce. Porter tries to get control of his life before 
it is too late, but like a man fighting against quicksand, his struggle 
just sinks him deeper. 
At the 90-minute mark of "Town & Country" I asked myself, "What's the 
point?" I wasn't entertained, I laughed three times - over silly little 
pratfalls - and spent most of the film marking time 'til the end. Warren 
Beatty wanders around with his character in a bewildered fog, making 
problems for himself by thinking with a part of his anatomy other than his 
head. Keaton's Ellie is an empty headed flake who can't see the obvious as 
Porter screws around on her. And, as you get to know them, who would want 
friends like Griffin and Mona? 
The supporting cast is given nothing to do and, sometimes, does harm to the 
film, given the material they are forced to use.  Nastassja Kinski plays a 
cellist with whom Porter has a fling. The actress, who has, eerily, failed 
to age over the years, is miscast as the air-headed musician and the 
character doesn't belong, anyway. Jenna Elfman is a sweet, but smart, ditz 
who joins Porter and Griffin on one of their tacked on misadventures. Andie 
MacDowell is absolutely painful to watch as a wealthy heiress (is there any 
other kind in this movie?) who comes on to Porter.  The saving grace is a 
pair of quirky perf's by Charlton Heston and Marian Seldes as MacDowell's 
very strange parents. 
Glib rationalization of infidelity, like, "If he doesn't speak English, it 
doesn't count," are a staple for the screenplay. The morality of the film 
seems to be, if you can get away with it, go for it. The cast of characters 
are mostly people you wouldn't want to know, never mind befriend. The 
actors do their best, but are hamstrung by the weak material. Helmer 
Chelsom, who made the outstanding, offbeat comedy "Funny Bones," is mired 
in the mess of a script and never puts his imprint on "Town & Country." 
The production values are high, as one expects from a big budget Hollywood 
film. But, the opulent sets by Caroline Hanania, lavish wardrobes by Molly 
Maginnis and top-notch photography by William Fraker cannot save "Town & 
Country." The film has had a long list of production and distribution 
problems and it might have been better, for me anyway, if Hollywood just 
said no to this movie. I give it a D. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
Runnulph Junuh (Matt Damon) had it all. He was a golf prodigy with a
promising future and a beautiful, wealthy young wife, Adele (Charlize
Theron), whom he loved madly. Then, the world was plunged into the Great
War and Runnulph went overseas to do his patriotic duty. The horrors of WWI
and the gruesome loss of his entire command drove Junuh to disappear from
all he knew and the life he loved in Savannah. He reappears unexpectedly
over a decade later to find that Adele is facing bankruptcy. She arranges
"the greatest golf exhibition on the best course" and Junuh is reluctantly
recruited as Savannah's favorite son in "The Legend of Bagger Vance."
Director Robert Redford, from the very start with his Oscar winning
"Ordinary People" through "A River Runs Through It" and "The Horse
Whisperer," has given his films a uniquely atmospheric feel that is his
signature. He continues to show his individual auteur with "The Legend of
Bagger Vance," this time taking on the fantasy story about a fairy
godfather who arrives on the scene at just the time when our hero needs
help the most. It's a trite, near overdone tale that benefits from the
strong performances of the leads, solid supporting cast and high-grade
techs. Redford isn't a shabby director, either.
While Bagger Vance (Will Smith) is an obvious Zen master, he, fortunately,
isn't forced to recite such homilies as "be one with the ball," but
screenwriter Jeremy Leven comes close. "It's you, that ball and that flag,"
says Bagger to the troubled Runnulph after the mysterious man appears out
of nowhere and offers to caddy for Junuh for "five dollars guaranteed." It
does get a bit cliched as Bagger gives his homey advice and observations,
like: "You lost your swing. We gotta find it," and "Let it [the shot]
choose you." Smith's wry demeanor and likable presence helps the filmmakers
get away with such obvious Yoda-isms.
While Smith revels in his down home rendition of Junuh's mentor and trainer
- he's a mix of the aforementioned Yoda, Mickey for "Rocky" and a little
bit of "E.T." - Matt Damon gives the most complex arc to his performance as
the insecure, troubled Runnulph. It's a subtle perf by Damon that
effectively uses facial expression to build his character, showing both
angst and determination.
When young Hardy Greaves (J. Michael Montcrief) spots Junuh returning to
Savannah after many years, he immediately starts campaigning to get the
former golf genius as the local contender in Adele's $10,000 purse
tournament. Against his will, Junuh agrees to play and picks up his sticks
to learn the game again (and, maybe, rekindle something with Adele). Out of
the darkness comes Bagger Vance who immediately starts to rag on Junuh
good-naturedly, helps him find his game again and gets an agreement to be
caddy for the big match.
Once the fairy tale is established, the film gets down to the game.
Runnulph is playing two of the best in the business - Bobby Jones (Joel
Gretsch) and Walter Hagan (Bruce McGill) - and they are more than a match
for the insecure Junuh. He immediately falls behind and it looks like the
citizens of Savannah are about to have their hopes of a victorious local
dashed. Bagger doesn't perform any magic except to open Junuh's eyes with
the help of Hardy, who absolutely idolizes Runnulph. The golf play is
nicely done as the game becomes a metaphor for life. Junuh finds his
original swing.
The story shows its literary roots (the novel is by Steven Pressfield) with
plot threads that are separate from the main yarn. There is a nice little
subplot involving Hardy and his dad. Because of the catastrophe of the
Depression, Hardy's father, Frank Greaves (Trip Hamilton), is forced to
take a job as streetsweeper in Savannah. This is a point of humiliation for
the boy who is ashamed of the lowly job his father takes. Junuh helps Hardy
learn the truth about his father, a truth that turns the boy's eyes from
admonishing to admiring, making the small side story a nicely sentimental
one.
Backing up Damon and Smith are several good performances, especially an
endearing one by young Montcrief. The debut perf is an assured and varied
one as Hardy exhibits expressions of wonder, shame, happiness and sadness.
Joel Gretsch and Bruce McGill flesh out their characters of Jones and
Hagan. Bobby Jones is elegance in motion and Gretsch captures this
gracefulness perfectly, while Walter Hagan represents raw power and
endurance, also captured well by McGill. Both men display the honor of fair
play and giving the game their best. The two actors get past the symbolism
of their characters and make them real people. Charlize Theron is only OK
as Adele, but hers is the toughest kind of role - the neglected/abandoned
wife.
Tech credits, as you would expect in a Robert Redford film, are of the
highest caliber. Michael Ballhaus, who collaborated with Redford on "Quiz
Show," gives the film an atmospheric look that captures the sultry warmth
of Savannah. The lush photography is coupled with an outstanding period
production design by Academy Award winner Stuart Craig and stunning
costume, especially for Theron, by Judianna Makovsky. Musical score, by
Rachel Portman, and songs of the time help to carry forth the period feel.
The fairy tale nature of "The Legend of Bagger Vance'" (though the "legend"
is never discussed) has been done many times before, but the good natured
outlook and mysticism of Bagger makes this an entertaining film that has no
golf prerequisite. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hedwig and the Angry Inch (2000)
Hedwig (John Cameron Mitchell) was born a boy named Hansel in East Berlin.
As a teen seeking his "other half," he reluctantly agrees to a sex change
operation in order to marry American G.I. Luther (Maurice Dean Wint). The
operation, performed by a hack surgeon, is botched, and the "angry inch" is
all that's left. Now a "she", Hedwig comes to America, is abandoned by
Luther, forms a rock band and falls for her 17-year old lover/protégé,
Tommy, only to be rejected by him later, too. She and her band, The Angry
Inch, shadows the now-famous Tommy Gnosis across the US (for revenge?), but
Hedwig is really in search of her lost other half in "Hedwig and the Angry
Inch."
First time helmer John Cameron Mitchell, along with composer/lyricist
Stephen Trask, created and starred in their acclaimed off-Broadway
production that has become the movie. And quite a movie it is in its
eclectic variety of songs, outrageous costumes, sets and makeup and,
especially, a riveting performance by Mitchell as the title character.
Mitchell and Trask have reinvented the movie musical and couple it with the
underlying story of just whom Hedwig is and what she is looking for.
I am, by far, not a big fan of musicals. Sure, there are exceptions, like
Bob Fosse's "All That Jazz" and "Cabaret," but, for the most part, they are
just not my cup of tea. "Hedwig and the Angry Inch" is an exception,
though, with its combination of humor, wit and a collection of tunes that
covers musical styles ranging from "The Rocky Horror Picture Show" and
Meatloaf to David Bowie to The Sex Pistols. The original songs, by Stephen
Trask (also appearing as one of the members of the band The Angry Inch),
are full of energy and variety and, even though it's not my kind of music,
I found every one entertaining and fun. The audience I saw "Hedwig" with
thought so, too.
The main attraction to this one-man/woman show is the presence of its star.
John Cameron Mitchell gives a solid, sometimes fun, sometimes angry
performance as a person searching for self-enlightenment and love. As a
young boy growing up in East Berlin, Hansel is abused by his G.I. father
and raised by his German mother in a tiny flat so small that "mother would
make me play in the oven" where he listened to pop music on Armed Forces
Radio. Later, as a young man, he meets Luther, another G.I. and is swept
off of his feet. The ensuing Angry Inch incident comes soon after.
Flash forward to a trailer park in Junction City, Kansas, and Luther is
leaving Hedwig for another boy. Frustrated and broke, she takes on
baby-sitting and the odd "job" to make ends meet. She also forms a band
with four Korean housewives and the musical talent of Hedwig is born. She
meets, falls for and loses young Tommy, who steals her songs and goes off
to become a rock sensation. Jealous and angry, Hedwig and her new band
begins a campaign to shadow Tommy's tours and, with the help of her
manager, Phyllis Stein (Andrea Martin), is trying get a law suit going
against the star for stealing her songs. Hedwig and The Angry Inch get
gigs, not coincidentally, at a chain of seafood restaurants that just
happen to be next to the forums where Tommy Gnosis is playing. Things
finally come to a head, so to speak, in New York City.
The popularity of the off-Broadway musical and its offshoots have garnered
a ready-made audience base for "Hedwig." The wit, humor, music and search
for identity has great appeal to young adults, but the charismatic presence
of Mitchell makes this a cut above what it could have been. It is this
one-man/woman show that casts its spotlight on its "internationally
ignored" rock star and Mitchell is outstanding in the role. There isn't a
lot going on with other characters, though there are amusing little
sidebars, like Hedwig's backup singer/lover, Yitzak (Miriam Shor), deciding
to break away from the band to join a Polynesian road show of "Rent" as a
Puerto Rican drag queen.
The low budget that the moviemakers have for the production belies the
quality of the film. Attention to details - Hedwig's costumes and
outrageous "Cabaret"-like makeup; the seedy trailer park setting; and, the
kitschy seafood restaurants - are loads of fun to watch and lend the
appropriate air to the proceeds, all on what has to be a beer budget.
"Hedwig and the Angry Inch" may not be for everybody, but the energy of the
effort, the songs, the imaginative sets and costumes and a fast steady pace
make it a pleasure to watch. If you're a fan of contemporary, edgy music,
it is an even bigger draw. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Split Decision (2000)
Gabriel Jesus Sandoval Chavez was as an American kid as you can get. He got
by okay at school, showed talent as an amateur boxer and worked at
McDonald's. When he decided to go along with his new gang friends on an
armed robbery, he didn't know that it would end in a 3˝-year prison stint.
Since his release in 1994, he started a new life and went professional as a
fighter, but his struggles weren't over in Marcy Garriott's first
documentary feature, "Split Decision."
Documentary films have been making some inroads into the mainstream of
American movies these days, what with such docs as "Sound and Fury," "Keep
the River On Your Right: A Modern Cannibal Tale," and "The Girl Next Door."
It's a real pleasure to see a newcomer to the documentary film field come
along and show a solid understanding of this underrated craft.
Docu-maker Garriott takes an interesting subject - Mexican boxer Jesus
Chavez - and builds a story based on the young man's legal plight of
deportation while he slowly, steadily assembles a career for himself as a
professional pugilist. The documentary style is simple and straightforward
- talking head interview footage combined with views of Jesus's day-to-day
life and his family, cutaway scenes of his different neighborhoods and,
finally, a look at his many boxing matches. Garriott is a woman who takes
her craft seriously and has paid close attention to the construction of her
work.
There are other aspects that make this 75-minute tome a tight, interesting
work. There is a lot of information conveyed about Jesus's life and his
battle with the Immigration and Naturalization service that make this more
than just a rags-to-riches story. While Jesus may be American to his core,
his family came to Chicago, illegally from Mexico, when he was a small boy.
Because of his criminal record and a 1996 Federal law that mandates that
convicted illegal immigrants will be deported for their crime - regardless
whether they are rehabilitated or not - he is deported to Mexico, where he
is a stranger in a strange land. Jesus, his managers and, as his prominence
in the ring built up, his big-time promoters, spent years trying to reverse
the government's unbending position. It's a bout that Jesus is still
fighting.
Other aspects of Jesus's story are told by use of title cards to convey
important supplementary information to the viewer in a succinct and simple
way that progress the film nicely. Music that fits the various locales is
also a plus.
I know there are a lot of boxing fans out there and it's nice to be able to
promote (pun intended) a movie about a young fighter on his way up the
ladder. That "Split Decision" is a straightforward, unadorned documentary
about an honest, hard-working young man trying to make it - successfully
here - in one of the world's toughest, most violent sports is a major plus
for these fans, and others, too. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Last Resort (2000)
Tanya (Dina Korzun) is a pretty Russian émigré who came to England with her
10-year old son, Artiom (Artiom Strelnikov) on the promise of marriage to a
British citizen. She is shocked to learn that her would be fiancé has
stranded her and the boy and a happy life in London is nothing but a
vanished dream. She and Artiom find themselves stuck in a desolate holding
center for refugees with no passport, no money and no rights in "Last
Resort."
Documentary filmmaker Pawel Pawlikowski makes his first inroad into feature
length fiction with a tale (co-written by Rowan Joffe) about a naďve young
mother who digs up her Moscow roots with the hope of planting them in
prosperous London. Tanya's plans are dashed at the outset, when stranded by
the unseen fiancé, and she and Artiom are left in the hands of the
immigration authorities. She seeks asylum in England, not knowing it means
internment in the rundown, former resort town of Stonehaven - for 12 to 16
months!
Alfie (Paddy Considine), an ex-con who runs the local video arcade, takes a
liking to Tanya and Artiom and helps them out with food, a TV and
friendship. He even fixes up their dreary flat with a lick of paint here
and there. But, it is obvious to Alfie that the penniless woman is
desperate to break out of her prison and escape her humiliation. When Tanya
agrees to take a job with a cyberspace pornographer named Les (Britain's
most famous real life porno king, Lindsay Honey), Alfie realizes this as a
frantic cry for help. He makes it his mission to help Tanya and Artiom
escape, even as he falls in love with the pretty Russian.
"Last Resort" is a little gem of a movie that captures a world not known to
most - a refugee-inhabited land without hope of escape from its daily,
desolate grind. But, this setting is a backdrop for the real tale about
Tanya and Artiom and the misguided naivete that lands them in the bleak
gray hell of Stonehaven. When Alfie comes into their life, things change
for the better, but a prison is still a prison and escape is her only hope.
Dina Korzun, who looks like a Slavic Emily Watson, is perfect as Tanya. She
is protective of her son, but is at the mercy of the authorities that
interned her. Her one failed escape attempt is met with the threat of real
incarceration, driving Tanya to even deeper frustration. Korzun gives a
subtle performance as she realizes that her choices have put her and Artiom
in such dire straits. Complementing Korzun is a truly likable performance
by Paddy Considine as Alfie. The affection he feels for Tanya and Artiom is
palpable and naturally rendered. Young Artiom Strelnikov makes an
impressive debut as the savvy son with his own share of problems coping
with the situation.
Helmer Pawlikowski, using a combination of static and hand held camera (by
lenser Ryszard Lenczewski), creates a vision that is both cold and
intimate. The backdrop of Stonehaven depicts a bleak, unforgiving world
where security surveillance camera monitor every corner of the confined
world, making escape near impossible. This changes when the film
concentrates on the three principles and takes on a warmth that reflects
the trio's respective feelings and mood. All in all, "Last Resort" is a
little treat of a quality film at a time when Hollywood is releasing mostly
dreck.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
It's the time of mankind's distant future and all the worries and concerns
over global warming have come to a disastrous head. Much of Earth is
underwater and the governments have restricted the allowed human birthrate.
Robotics has taken a quantum leap in development and man has created a
replicant that can love. But, has man gone too far playing God? Find out in
Steven Spielberg's long awaited "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence."
There has been a hush, for months, over details about Spielberg's
involvement in what had been a longtime Stanley Kubrick project. The
reclusive Kubrick was taken by the concepts introduced in the 1969 sci-fi
short story by Brian Aldiss, Super Toys Last All Summer Long, and had been
developing his film treatment for some time prior to his death last year.
Friend and colleague Spielberg took over the mantle of the production,
developing the screenplay (from the screen story by Ian Watson) and
directing the effort. What we get is a mix of intents as the helmer tries
to be true to Kubrick's vision while deriving many parts of the film from
his own (Spielberg's) body of work.
A little boy, the son of Monica and Henry Swinton (Frances O'Connor and Sam
Robards), is in a coma and there is little hope that he'll awaken. Monica
is despondent and growing increasingly withdrawn, forcing Henry to act
quickly and decisively. A brilliant robotics professor, Allen Hobby, has
developed his theory that robots, or Mechas, can be made to love and Henry
gets the first model, named David (Halley Joel Osment). When David is
brought into the Swinton household, Monica greats him with a scared
reluctance. As she grows used to the robo-boy, she invokes the imprint that
triggers his program to love. A semblance of normalcy comes back to their
home and all is well - for a while.
The miracle of modern science eventually finds a cure for the Swinton's
son, Martin (Jake Thomas), and he returns as the family alpha boy. While
Monica treats David as a real child, Martin understands that the Mecha is
little more than a super toy. The wily Martin soon figures out how to
confuse David into doing things he shouldn't, making his parents think that
the little robot is a danger to the family. Monica, instead of returning
David to the factory for destruction, decides the best course is to abandon
the boy in a spooky forest to fend for himself.
Part two of the tale shifts from family life to survival as David searches
for the one thing that he real wants - to be a real boy. This "Pinocchio"
theme drives David into the scrap heap world of discarded robots. He meets
Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), a pleasure Mecha that can be anything a woman (and,
presumably, a man) wants him to be. Joe is very cool and takes David under
his wing. This part turns into a world straight out of "Mad Max Beyond
Thunderdome" where robots, instead of men, are ravaged for public
entertainment. The final leg of David's journey takes on religious
overtones of resurrection and spiritual freedom as the little boy 'bot
finds "himself."
"A.I." is a complex film that strives to say a great deal. Messages of
love, loyalty, friendship and more are coupled with David's relentless
search, after his abandonment, for the Blue Fairy, who will change him into
a flesh and blood boy. Joining him in his quest is a present given by his
mom, a robotic bear named Teddy, as the stand-in for Jiminy Cricket. The
constant "Pinocchio" references and David's continued pleas to be a real
boy gives the film a derivative, rather than original, feel.
The F/X that animate Teddy and the rest of the robots (by Stan Winston
Studios) are very slick, as one can only expect in a Steven Spielberg
movie. But, as with "Close Encounters of the Third Kind," "A.I." gets too
full of itself and meaningfully meanders along, first in one direction,
then another until the until we get to the spiritually satisfying (for
Spielberg) end. For me, by the time the film was over, I had simply had
enough.
Robot movies have been around since "Metropolis" and the
robot-with-feelings concept has been with us from as far back as
"Pinocchio" - if you take that fairytale as a kind of low-tech robot story.
The idea also spawned such flicks as "Short Circuit," "Terminator 2" and,
one of my favorites, "Android," with Klaus Kinski chewing the scenery with
gusto. "A.I." represents a highbrow entry into the genre, with Spielberg's
typical rank sentimentality at its core.
On the acting front, the film belongs to young Osment, who is the single
point of focus throughout this unnecessarily long flick. Haley Joel is a
talented kid and does his best, building on the emotions that David
develops over time, but there is little arc to the development of the
character. Jude Law, in his limited time on screen, steals the show as the
sexy, pleasure-oriented Joe. With a hint of plasticity to his makeup,
giving him an artificial look, and his hip dance moves, the robotic gigolo
seems to be having a grand time. Brendan Gleeson offers little to his
character, Lord Johnson-Johnson, a kind of robotic gladiator owner/manager.
O'Connor, as the confused mom, is fine, but the rest of the cast, including
Robards and Hurt, are filling space and marking time.
Production values are commensurate with the obviously large budget that
Spielberg and company had to play with. Frequent Spielberg cinematographer,
Janusz Kaminski provides his deft camera talents effectively to the
challenging variety of film moods. John Williams does not, for once,
intrude his musical interpretations on the film, but you don't get anything
like the "Jaws" theme song either. Production design, by Rick Carter, comes
out of Spielberg's own body of work and others with direct takes from
"E.T.," "Close Encounters" and "Jaws," as well as the aforementioned "Mad
Max 3" and, frequently, "The Wizard of Oz."
"A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" is an anticipated event film that fails to
meet expectations. It's too long, by 20 minutes or more, and the story
meanders far too much to keep the viewer's interest. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Billy Elliot (2000)
The coal miners may be in the midst of a tense strike in the northern English
mining town of Durham, but young Billy Elliot still has to take the boxing
lessons his father insists on. Billy would rather dance than fight, so when Mrs.
Wilkinson's all girl ballet class has to share the gym space with the boxers, he
sheds his gloves for ballet slippers in "Billy Elliot."
The simplistic script by first-timer Lee Hall runs a routine path with its
inspirational story about going after what you love to do regardless of the odds
and obstacles. Young Billy has a natural desire to dance and, with the help of
the obligatory muse Mrs. Wilkinson (Julie Walters, "Educating Rita"), overcomes
every obstacle - principally the prejudice his father has toward dancers, who
must be poofters. Inexplicably, dad's fears that his son is becoming a flaming
homosexual are shoved aside with little fanfare and, suddenly, pop is crying,
saying, "Let's give the boy a #$%&* chance!"
Most everything is handled in this perfunctory manner. Mrs. Wilkinson is intro'd
as a dance dynamo and teacher - tough on the outside, but extremely
compassionate inside. She pushes Billy to develop his talent and love for dance,
encouraging him to apply to the Royal Ballet School in London. Mrs. Wilkinson
then drops out of the movie, not even mentioned again, except for a brief coda
when Billy goes off to fame and fortune.
Another problem, maybe with the script or maybe with the film's budget, is the
sparseness of the supporting cast. Billy is a likable kid, but the movie only
shows him having one friend, an obviously closeted Michael (Stuart Wells) whom
likes to dress up in his mother's clothes. Michael heavy-handedly represents the
"gay" lifestyle, but the kid doesn't dance, so I don't get it. The short shrift
given to such background considerations gives the film a shallowness that the
energetic performance by Jamie Bell as Billy can't overcome. Gary Lewis, as
Billy's dad, also has a considerable presence, but is hamstrung by the banal
development of his character's abrupt change of heart.
There is a good deal of visual imagination provided by the camera of Brian
Tufano ("Trainspotting") with tightly shot, energetic dance numbers and tense
movement when the action joins the coal mine strikers. One amusing tracking shot
has Billy's little friend, Debbie, absently dragging a stick along a wall that
suddenly becomes a phalanx of police shields. She continues to drag her stick as
if along a picket fence, without so much as a glance at the heavily armored cops
guarding the strike.
Jamie Bell's Billy is fun to watch as he tramps around in combinations of step
dancing, tap, ballet and plain old foot stompin'. There's a lot of energy in his
performance, making him the reason for seeing the film. The music selected,
especially the nicely used overture from "Swan Lake," complements the story and
the dance. Unfortunately, the earthy language negates the inspirational aspect
of the yarn that might appeal to younger auds and frequent use of the "F" word
may be a turn off. A silly epilogue that features the premier dance of an older
Billy doesn't help. I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
Federal Express troubleshooter Chuck Noland (Tom Hanks) travels the world
to spread the word to the growing number of FedEx employees that "we live
or die by the clock." Time is everything to Chuck and even the Christmas
celebration with his fiancée, Kelly Frears (Helen Hunt), is measured in
minutes as he is called away, yet again, to deal with some new company
crisis. On the way to his latest emergency an unexpected problem forces his
jet to ditch in the middle of the Pacific Ocean, leaving Chuck alone to
survive or die on a deserted isle in Roger Zemeckis's latest, "Cast Away."
Chuck is a true workaholic who lives his life by his tenets of time. When
we first meet him he is lecturing a group of Muscovite FedEx workers (with
a translator) on the time criticality of delivering their packages around
"the world on time." In a whirlwind, Chuck finishes one job, joins his
family for Christmas dinner, proposes to Kelly and is off again on his next
corporate disaster. This time, though, things go drastically wrong, his
plane crashes and Chuck finds himself stranded, alone, on a small, isolated
tropical island.
Without food or water, the castaway has to find the means to survive. He
learns, quickly, to find fresh water. He then harvests coconuts, after
almost getting conked by one, and extracts their milk and meat. Fishing is
next and Chuck learns the rudiments of fashioning tools and making fire.
It's a Robinson Crusoe tale sans Friday and evil pirates as he learns to
survive and live one day at a time. Time itself, ironically, changes as
Chuck starts thinking in terms of days, months and years instead of minutes
and seconds.
Chuck is trapped on the island by a powerful breakwater that hurls him and
his rubber raft back to the beach whenever he tries to get past. One day, a
fortunate piece of flotsam, the remains of a port-a-potty, washes up on the
island. It is perfect to make a sturdy sail that may just push him through
the waves of the breakers. As in any survivor flick, you're rooting for the
stranded hero every step of the way as he learns the ropes of survival and
escape.
"Cast Away" is, except for the requisite special F/X of the jet crash and
sinking into the depths of the Pacific (a chilling moment), a survival
flick, pure and very simple. Once the disaster of the crash is behind him,
Chuck has to face the prospects of no food, no water and no companions,
except for a picture in an antique watch given to him by Kelly. It is his
one link to sanity and civilization and, as the days drag on to months then
years, is one of the two things that keep him sane on the tiny island. I'll
get to the other in a moment.
Immediately after the crash and through much of his stay on the island,
FedEx packages keep washing ashore. Chuck very neatly sorts them all and
puts them aside for future delivery. After a while it becomes obvious to
Chuck that he should open them up to see if there is anything useful. He
finds, among other things, a volleyball, a pair of figure skates and a
fancy dress. The always thinking Chuck puts everything to use, Including
the volleyball. An accident causes him to smear the ball with his own
blood. The handprint becomes the basis for a face. The face takes on a name
- Wilson (what did you expect, Spaulding?) - and a companion is born. (This
companion device smacks of another survival film, 1971's "Omega Man," where
Charlton Heston anthropomorphizes a bust of Julius Caesar into a
conversation buddy.) Wilson becomes such a close friend that, when Chuck
gets separated from "him," you feel the man's loss of his friend.
The bulk of the film is about Chuck's survival and, with a masterful
one-man performance by Hanks, is a compelling tale told in straightforward
terms. There is no man Friday, no marauding pirates and no shark or giant
octopus attacks. It's all about living and surviving, both physically and
emotionally, from day to day without giving up or losing hope. There is
ample foreshadowing of events and changes to Chuck early on in the film as
he, as an aside, tells Kelly he has to get a tooth taken care of. You know
that pesky tooth is going to plague him later, but the script, by William
Boyle, Jr., makes such certainties a surprise.
The last part of the flick, its weakest, has Chuck, rescued, returning home
to find the object of his emotional survival, Kelly, married to another.
She is still his true love, but not his to have anymore. His angst is soon
wrapped up in a cute little coda that has Chuck delivering the one package
he saved. The final scene takes place, literally, at a crossroads where we
hope Chuck will make the right decision and gets on with his life. It's all
very feel good and positive but a disappointment after living with Chuck
through his four years of lonely isolation. With little time spent to
develop ancillary characters, in particular Hunt as Kelly, there is little
to the film beyond Hanks.
The best moments in "Cast Away" are sometime melancholy and sometimes
exciting. Chuck's obsession with escape takes on the same manic proportions
as Steve McQueen in "Papillon" and, when he finally breaks free, you feel
his thrill. A quiet, nighttime interlude has Chuck sail through a pod of
whales and one of them looks the man right in the eye, as if to comfort
him, that all will be well. And, of course, there are the conversations
with Wilson as the ball takes on more and more human characteristics in the
eyes of Chuck.
The production team, led by helmer Zemeckis, does a superb, understated job
in creating the lonely, island prison that holds Chuck captive. Lensing, by
Don Burgess, is in keeping with the island environment, putting you in the
middle of Chuck's day to day existence. Costume and makeup take almost a
comedic turn, at one point later in the film, where Chuck rises from the
water holding a trident to spear fish. The image of Neptune smacks you
right in the face, I hope intentionally by the makers. Kudos must go to
Hanks for the tremendous physical effort he underwent, gaining weight to
portray the pre-castaway Chuck, then losing 50 pounds to become the new,
sleek Chuck. The contrast is striking.
One thing is bound to come out of "Cast Away" - a deserved best actor
nomination for Hanks. It's a good, not great, film and a terrific character
study. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Swordfish (2001)
Gabriel Shear (John Travolta) is a renegade spy who wants to finance his 
own brand of patriotic anti-terrorism. Years ago, the DEA established a 
secret slush fund to launder money used to seize and destroy illegal drugs. 
Now, with interest, the fund is worth $9.5 billion and Gabriel will do 
anything to grab it all in "Swordfish." 
Producer Joel Silver, the driving force behind "Swordfish," takes an 
intriguing idea of a high tech super heist, mixes the talents of Travolta, 
Hugh Jackman ("X-Men") and Halle Berry (also "X-Men") and comes up with a 
mediocre thriller that moves briskly but goes no where. 
Travolta's super spy Gabriel is an enigma. We first meet him as he 
pontificates over the plusses and minuses of the movie "Dog Day Afternoon." 
As he drinks his coffee, he tells his colleagues that Al Pacino's character 
didn't go far enough. If he started popping hostages, Gabriel explains, he 
could have gotten away Scott free - and get his boyfriend that sex change 
operation. We leave the confines of the coffee klatch and, in a whirlwind 
of activity, we find ourselves amidst an even grander hostage situation. 
The action goes, literally, ballistic as the police screw up the situation 
and force Gabriel and his crew to explode a bomb-laden hostage, to 
devastating effect. 
This slickly explosive beginning turns to flashback as we go back to four 
days before. The vivacious Ginger (Halle Berry) pays a visit to 
down-on-his-luck Stanley (Hugh Jackman), a former computer hacker whose 
life was ruined when he was caught wreaking havoc on a secret FBI 
cyberspace surveillance operation. Ginger, as Gabriel's intermediary, 
offers Stanley $100,000 - and the hope of getting his daughter, Holly 
(Carmyn Grimes), back - just to talk to the man. 
Stanley eventually agrees to take the job, for $10 million and his 
daughter, and begins to design the complicated worm program that will 
burrow into the banking system and disperse the billions to Gabriel's own 
secret accounts. Gabriel has a separate agenda, though, and isn't content 
with a covert break-in. The action comes back around to the opening hostage 
situation and Stanley faces death, destruction and the permanent loss of 
Holly. 
"Swordfish" - I can only believe that the filmmakers selected the title 
from the old Marx brothers' speakeasy skit, as in "Whatsa da passaword?" - 
covers some new ground with it's high-tech heist, but mainly borrows from 
other actioners for its substance. "Die Hard" came to mind often, 
especially as the villain, Gabriel, declares his plan to get what he wants, 
then escape using a Houdini-like misdirection. It's another slick Joel 
Silver production that will make money, but keeps the viewer at arm's 
length. 
A leaner looking John Travolta leads the cast of "Swordfish" and adds 
nothing special here. (At least, he avoids a repeat of his perf in 
"Battlefield Earth," thankfully.) Hugh Jackman, too, does not put much of a 
personality spin on his Stanley Jobson persona. Both actors are so closely 
tied to the various subplots they are never able to rise above the shallow 
surface of the story. Halle Berry looks pretty and sexy as Ginger, but has 
little to do but look good. (when she flashes the camera, topless, one of 
the members of the screening audience yelled out, "Thank you!") Most wasted 
is Vinnie Jones ("Snatch," "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels") as 
Gabriel's chief henchman, Marco. The soccer star-turned-actor has a great 
presence and, with his working-class English accent, can chew dialogue with 
the best. He is almost mute in "Swordfish," but for a brief moment toward 
the end which gave me unfounded hope. Don Cheadle is fine as the avenging 
FBI agent Roberts. Carmyn Grimes is notable as Stanley's daughter, Holly, 
while Sam Shepard does nothing as a corrupt, powerful senator. 
Production values are first rate. The makers avoided using hackneyed 
computer effects, though the super high-tech workstation that Stanley uses 
reminds me, strangely, of the extremely low-tech set design in Terry 
Gilliam's "Brazil." Photography, particularly the action stuff, is ably 
handled by lenser Paul Cameron, who first joined director Dominic Sena on 
"Gone in 60 Seconds." Production designer Jeff Mann, another Sena 
collaborator, gives a slick, glitzy look to the sets. 
The screenplay, by newcomer Skip Wood, has an incomplete feel to it. There 
is sparseness to the story that makes it seem bloated in trying to fill 90+ 
minutes of screen time. Of course, this could also be a product of slash 
and burn editing that left a good deal of the film on the cutting room 
floor. It's hard to tell, but the results are the same. I give "Swordfish" 
a C. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Trolösa (2000)
Legendary filmmaker Ingmar Bergman gets introspective with his
autobiographical story of marriage, infidelity and betrayal, "Faithless,"
directed by his protégé, actress-turned-director Liv Ullmann and starring
Lena Endre as the fickle Marianne.
The story begins with an old man, Bergman (Erland Josephson), struggling
with his script about marriage and fidelity. He has trouble breathing life
into his personal tale and calls upon an actress, Marianne (Endre), to help
him with the task. The beautiful actress may be real or she may be just a
figment of the elderly Bergman's imagination as she helps the writer and
tells him her story.
Marianne is married to Marcus (Thomas Hanzon), a much sought after
orchestra director who spends much of the time away on tour. David (Krister
Henriksson), a family friend and filmmaker (Bergman's alter ego), decides
to fill the void and spends his time with Marianne. An affair soon begins.
David's hair trigger temper and lack of regard for those around him are the
catalyst that will lead to a broken marriage and, especially, grief for
Marianne and Marcus's young daughter Isabelle (Michelle Gylemo)
Ingmar Bergman is known for his moody, reflective work as both director and
writer and "Faithless" is no exception. His story of infidelity and jealous
starts off innocently enough with Marianne reacting to an offhanded
proposition by drunken David with a declaration that they are like brother
and sister, rebuffing the advance. Thinking it all a bit of platonic
flirting, she begins to plan an affair that lands her in Paris with David
while Marcus is, again, on tour. As the passion builds so does her
realization that David is selfish, demanding and doesn't really care about
anyone but himself. Things come to a head when Marcus catches his wife and
best friend in bed. The cuckolded husband vows to get a divorce and take
the one thing away from Marianne that means anything to her - Isabelle.
This long, talky Swedish language film benefits from several levels of
influence. Bergman's biographic tale takes on the proportions of an
accident happening before your eyes - you know, as you watch, that there is
a whole bunch off hurt coming up, but it's too fascinating to turn away
from. You know that Marianne's decision is going to cause pain for her,
Marcus and, especially, Isabelle, but she can't stop it from happening any
more than you can stop her. Your fears, you realize, are going to be met by
the little family and disaster is apparent.
The fascinating drama of jealousy and betrayal is coupled with some
exemplary acting, especially by Lena Endre. The Bergman-favored actress
gives an enigmatic air to Marianne as she moves from innocent playfulness
to a full-blown affair and damn the consequences. Marianne is beautiful
enough to believe that she can control the flirting between her and David.
When they go to Paris, leaving Isabelle with her grandma and Marcus touring
the wilds of America, it is still under the misguided belief that there is
nothing wrong in what they are doing. When David ingenuously asks about her
past affairs, she doesn't see the horns of jealousy sprout. When their
affair ends in anger and confrontation with Marcus, she also doesn't see
that she is going to lose Isabelle, too. Endre gives a powerful, subtle
performance as a woman who makes an irreversible decision and must suffer
the consequences.
The men in her life are more mundane than Marianne. Each is well regarded
in their respective fields - Marcus and music, David and film - but they
are emotionally stilted. They understand that they both love Marianne, but
neither knows the woman or her needs. In the end, everyone loses, with
little Isabelle being the most profoundly affected victim of the adult
decisions. Endre anchors the rest of the small cast.
Liv Ullmann lends an assured hand to her direction, showing the inspiration
acquired from her mentor, Bergman. She is influenced, strongly, by the
elder director, but has developed her own intimate filmmaking stance.
"Faithless," actually feels more French than Swedish, the interlude in
Paris notwithstanding. The close, almost stagy production plays it close to
the chest as the intimacy approaches claustrophobic as Marianne's once
happy life goes down the tubes.
"Faithless" is the kind of film that the buffs love, but is far too
dialogue intensive to attract the more casual filmgoer. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
There has been a hype preceding Baz Luhrmann's latest opus that has helped
to infuse interest in the budding Australian film industry. Fox Studios,
Sydney has bellied up to the bar in a big way to bring us the director's
own vision of turn-of-the-century Parisian nightlife in "Moulin Rouge."
"Moulin Rouge" is a jam-packed musical extravaganza utilizing brilliantly
conceived, complexly produced sets providing the viewer with a visual
cornucopia of images. There is so much going on during the high-octane
musical numbers, I could only think of Peter Greenaway's stunning sets in
"Prospero's Books" by way of comparison. The numerous, imaginative dance
routines are done with the director's patented hyperkinetic editing, giving
the film the feel of Gilbert and Sullivan on acid.
Luhrmann's frenzied form of filmmaking was evident in his stylish and fun
"Strictly Ballroom." He took it a step further (and faltered horribly) with
his annoying "William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet" that must have had the
Bard rolling in his grave. The helmer continues to follow his own vision in
his best work to date. Not that "Moulin Rouge" is a great film, mind you.
The are cracks in the kitsch that keeps this extravagant musical from
greatness.
The story, by Luhrmann and Craig Pearce, covers no new ground with poor,
struggling poet, Christian (Ewan MacGregor), attracted to the big city
lights of circa-1900 gay Paris where the diminutive artiste, Henri de
Toulouse-Lautrec (John Leguizamo), and his cronies befriend him. The gang
soon introduces the naďve Christian to the pleasures and debauchery of the
infamous Moulin Rouge, a notorious nightclub owned by a surrealistic emcee,
Zidler (Jim Broadbent). There the gullible budding poet is introduced to
the charms of the beautiful star of the show, Satine (Nicole Kidman), the
most famous courtesan in Paris.
Zidler wants to make the change from nightclub shill to legitimate theater
owner and uses Satine to lure the wealthy Duke of Worcester (Richard
Roxburgh) to invest in his venture. The selfish, arrogant aristocrat lusts
after the beautiful chanteuse and agrees to pay for the business transition
- if he gets Satine in the bargain. The deluded Zidler and ambitious
Satine, who hungers to be a legit actress and no longer a highly paid
whore, agree, but overlook one major snag. Christian falls for Satine and
vice versa. Oh, yeah. Satine suffers from consumption. You take it from
there, keeping in mind this is a romantic tragedy.
Luhrmann almost overwhelms you with his frenetic dance numbers that utilize
a plethora of pop music songs delivered in operatic-style. The list is long
and starts with "The Sound of Music" begun, first, as narrative but soon
breaking into song as Christian conceives the heart of the musical play
that will launch the new Moulin Rouge. This is where the flick is both at
its best and its worst (though "worst" is a bit harsh).
There is a Bob Fosse influence to Luhrmann's proceedings as he combines
1900 Can Can burlesque with the modern musical poetry of "Roxanne," "Like a
Virgin" and "Smells Like Teen Spirit." Elton John's "Your Song" is the
flagship tune that epitomizes the romance between Christian and Satine.
"Diamonds Are a Girl's Best Friend," a string of "love" songs (that's
song's with "love" in the title, Alex) - "In the Name of Love," "Silly Love
Songs," "All You Need Is Love" - "Up Where We Belong" (from "An Officer and
a Gentleman) and David Bowie's "Heroes" all get attention to varying
degrees. The all male "Like a Virgin," led by Broadbent, is good fun.
The myriad of musical numbers and references are, as I said, overwhelming
with the cleverness and single-minded wit of its auteur. For Luhrmann, more
is better as he batters you with a visual bombardment that weaves the
varied of songs into the fabric of the film.
There are actors up there on the screen and credit must be given to Kidman
and MacGregor for terrific musical performances. Each did their own singing
and both are first-rate, especially MacGregor, whose pipes could earn him a
living as a crooner. Jim Broadbent gives a wild and colorful perf as
Zidler, while Richard Roxburgh puts a Simon Legree spin on his sinister and
dispicable Duke. The rest of the cast provides a "Cabaret" level of
choreographic splendor to the striking dance numbers.
More is not always better and, sometimes, it is best to give the audience a
little time to chew on things a bit. The frenetic pace of "Moulin Rouge" is
a blessing and a bane, but it is certainly the vision of its maker. I give
it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Knight's Tale, A (2001)
In the days of yore only those of noble birth were allowed the honor of 
knighthood. The superstar athlete of his day, the knight would compete in 
mock battle at staged tournaments for the pleasure of the masses. One young 
man, lowborn William Thatcher (Heath Ledger), defies convention when he 
impersonates his now-dead liege lord and goes for the gold in "A Knight's 
Tale." 
Writer/director Brian Helgeland delved into film noire, and earned a 
screenplay Oscar in the process, with his period crime thriller, "L.A. 
Confidential." He takes a sharp turn from mayhem to mirth with his latest 
oeuvre, covering territories that range from medieval fairytale adventure 
to contemporary pop culture. Mixing period and pop is a hard task that 
rarely meets with success, though there are exceptions, most involving 
Shakespeare. 
There is an obvious hip ness to the material that is the crux of the 
juggling act the writer/director is trying to perform. Throughout the film 
he intersperses modern music and readily identifiable contemporary film and 
social references that meld the modern with the medieval. We're greeted, at 
the start of a jousting tournament, with the raucous refrains of Queen's 
"We Will Rock You" and the Middle Ages crowd of onlookers clapping and 
stomping and doing waves. It's slick and amusing, though the disparity in 
periods brings attention to itself as the film plays on. 
The routine, oft-told tale of a young commoner striving to be something 
beyond his birthright, to "change his stars," is a staple for modern 
storytelling. Helgeland doesn't screw around with the rags to riches 
structure and concentrates on the exciting action of the tournament events 
- particularly the high-profile jousting matches - and his characters. 
Heath Ledger is the first among equals in an ensemble effort that gives the 
young actor a chance to showcase himself while others get their chance at 
the limelight, too. The young Australian made a likable debut in "10 Things 
I Hate About You" and continues to build upon his good looks and easygoing 
charm as the ambitious Will Thatcher. Ledger handles the gamut of tasks put 
before him and acquits himself quite well riding, singing, dancing, sword 
fighting, and in comedy and stunt work. 
The band of misfits accompanying William on his quest are an eclectic 
collection of affable rogues who are reluctantly drawn in to the young 
squire's hair-brained, and potentially deadly, scheme. Mark Addy ("The Full 
Monty") is solid as the serious-minded best friend, Roland. Alan Tudyk 
plays William's enforcer, Wat, a carrot-topped vassal whose hot-headedness 
is tempered by his loyalty to his friends. Rounding out William's merry men 
is a young poet and story-teller named Geoff Chaucer (Paul Bettany), who 
acts as Williams press agent, promoter and ring announcer, and a pretty 
blacksmith named Kate (Laura Fraser), a real master of metals. The only 
problem with these characters and their performances is you don't get 
enough of them. The rest of the cast is adequate, though Shannyn Sossamon 
as the love interest, Jocelyn, is pretty but little more than an object of 
affection - no sparks fly between her and William. 
The production is first-class with great attention paid to medieval period 
details, but with a contempo feel throughout. The big tournie scenes 
maintain a Super Bowl atmosphere with the audience hyped to a fever pitch 
as the jousting action mounts. The jousts tend to be repetitive, as 
expected when two guys try to knock each other off their horses with a big 
stick, but slickly edited and visually exciting. The behind-the-camera tech 
team members providing the visuals for "A Knight's Tale" are equal to the 
director's talent and vision. Cinematographer Richard Greatrex, production 
designer Tony Burrough, and costumer and armor designer Caroline Harris 
contribute to the modern/medieval look that Helgeland seeks. 
The use of modern pop and rock music is handled in an amusing and 
interesting way, with each tune selected to appropriately fit the scene in 
which it is used. David Bowie's "Golden Years" is used over a Middle Ages 
line dance; Bachman-Turner Overdrive's "Takin' Care of Business" plays as 
William establishes himself as the leader and true friend of his little 
band; The World Series of tournaments, London, has the dream team come into 
town under Thin Lizzy's "The Boys Are Back In Town." Each tune works and 
will please the hipsters in the audience. 
Brian Helgeland picked a tough nut in his combo of "Rocky" meets the 
knights of old yarn and, while not a great film, "A Knight's Tale" does a 
sound job in putting together the combination. The attractive, likable cast 
and excellent production values overcome the sometimes overly hip 
screenplay. I give it a B. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
In 1999 "The Blair Witch Project" created a movie-going tempest as one of
the most profitable films in history. Because of the enormous publicity and
hype, tourists flocked to the tiny Maryland town of Burkittsville to learn
more about the truth and legend of the Blair Witch. Jeff Patterson (Jeffrey
Donovan), a local resident with a questionable past, is taking advantage of
the phenomenon with his Blair Witch store and the newly inaugurated Blair
Witch Hunt tour. Four people from Boston sign up for the tour and they
spend the night on the sight of the house of the notorious child murderer,
Rustin Parr. But, something happens during the night and five hours of
their lives are missing. They soon realize that they encountered something
evil in the woods and it is bent on vengeance in "The Book of Shadows:
Blair Witch 2"
Sequels to popular horror films usually fall far short of the expectations
raised by the original flick. The seminal horror films, "The Exorcist" and
"The Omen," were both followed with mediocre, is not outright bad, sequels
that paled in comparison to their originals. When I saw "The Blair Witch
Project" last year, I found the student film-like qualities - shaky camera
and amateur feel - were tempered by the intelligence and imagination of the
mock documentary's story idea. I liked the film, but didn't understand why
huge numbers of people declared it the greatest horror flick ever. It was
an interesting effort, maybe even good, but not great.
"Blair Witch 2" fares a bit better than the other sequels I mentioned. The
second entry in the Blair Witch series (BW3 is in the works) benefits from
a bigger budget, an experienced (albeit, in documentaries) director and a
script that has intelligence (by director Joe Berlinger and Dick Beebe).
There are some confusing moments as the tale cuts between the live action,
images on video and flash (forwards or backs? It's hard to tell sometimes
in the context of the story). But, overall, it is a linear telling as the
five protagonists head off into the woods near Burkittsville to uncover the
truth about the Blair Witch.
Jeff loads his guests into his camouflage painted van with ample quantities
of beer, booze and weed for their stay in the woods. They camp on the site
of the child murders, decades before, and set up a variety of video gear to
try to capture taped evidence of the Blair Witch. Then the group gets down
to doing some hearty partying. Kim (Kim Director) is a member of the Wicken
faith and is out to clear the tainted name of witches everywhere. Erica
(Erica Leerhsen) is a mega-Goth chick who joins the tour because she
"thought the movie was cool." Tristine (Tristine Skyler) and Stephen
(Stephen Baker Turner) are a couple of researchers on the hunt to garner
material for their grad school work, The Blair Witch: History or Hysteria.
Their revelries are interrupted, at one point, when a competing group, The
Blair Witch Tour (made up of Japanese and German tourists), tries to crash
the campsite. The interlopers are turned away and they head to the infamous
site called Coffin Rock, where ritual murders were done years ago. The Hunt
gang continues to party until they all eventually pass out. The next
morning, they are horrified to find that, while they were asleep, someone
trashed the camp, destroying all the video equipment and shredding the
volumes of research brought by Tristine and Stephen. Tristine,
inexplicably, tells the rest that the tapes from the camera are buried
under the foundation of the murder ruins (as were the tapes in the original
BW). They find the tapes, pack up and head back to Jeffrey's digs to use
his elaborate video gear to check out what was recorded. They find, while
watching, that the time stamp on one of the videos has an abrupt jump in
the middle that shows a glitch cover the five hours when all were thought
to be asleep.
Things start to blur, at this point, as the action jumps around. Dreams and
daydreams mix with reality and the video surveillance cameras around
Jeffrey's place record something quite different from the live action. As
they continue to try to unravel the mystery of the missing hours, it
becomes apparent that something wicked has this way come. Kim goes missing
and the local sheriff calls Jeff on the phone to investigate the brutal,
ritualistic murders of the Blair Witch Tour group at Coffin Rock. Reality
and the fantastical merge together as the confused and frightened campers
learn what really happened during that crucial five-hour lapse.
The helmer and co-scripter for BW2, Berlinger, as I said, hails from a
documentary background. (I recommend his "Paradise Lost: The Child Murders
at Robin Hood Hills.") This is his first outing in film fiction and he does
a yeoman's job of marshalling his actors to the effort. The young actors in
the sequel are a generic collection of unknowns who don't really give any
dimension to their characters. Kim Director is quite photogenic, but looks
more like a model posing than a thespian. Erica Leershen gets some mileage
out of her cynical Goth chic persona. Skyler and Turner are merely OK as
the researchers. Jeff Donovan does the goofy doper well enough but, again,
none of the perfs, except for the very funny comic relief by the town
sheriff (whose name, unfortunately, I have yet to find), are remarkable.
Suspense driven, rather than horror, the story contains very few chilling
moments. One, where the spirit of a murdered child from the distant past
appears before the Hunt crew, actual brought a shiver to my spine, but the
rest of this horror sequel isn't really horrific, just shocking at times.
There is some confusion in the way the events are portrayed, which has
caused some negative buzz for BW2. It does require your attention and some
contemplation afterwards, but, as sequels go, I've seen worse, much worse.
(Did I mention "The Exorcist 2" and "The Omen 2"?) I give "The Book of
Shadows: Blair Witch 2" a C+.
For more Reeling Reviews visit www. reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Apocalypse Now (1979)
Everyone knows about the Oscar-winning 1979 film "Apocalypse Now" and, if
you're a film nut like me, also about the trials and tribulations of that
problem plagued production. Years in the making, the film was released, to
both critical and popular acclaim, in a 150 minute version. It is a film
that is easily a member of the top 100 films of all times club. But, as
with anything that has dollar signs attached to it, the filmmakers decided
to re-cut the film, restoring footage that fell to the cutting room floor
more than two decades ago and, like the phoenix rising from the ashes,
giving Francis Ford Coppola the chance to show us his "real vision" in
"Apocalypse Now Redux."
Longer does not necessarily make better and, sometimes, there is a reason
for scenes to be dropped in the editing process of a film that is an
artistic achievement like "Apocalypse Now." The original movie  - which, by
the way, ended with a B52 strike, an ending the was deleted after the
film's first run, a decision by the director because he felt the audience
would not understand his intent. I, personally, preferred the original
original - was not a perfect movie. The flaw lay in the theatricality when
Colonel Kurtz (the notorious Marlon Brando) enters the picture. Prior to
that, the road trip (well, river trip) that brings Captain Willard (Martin
Sheen) to the renegade colonel's lair is a varied, violent journey that
uses the backdrop of the failing American effort to stop Communism in
Vietnam.
The film, even the '79 version, is made up of a series of interludes
involving Willard and the crew of the Navy motor patrol boat assigned to
his secret mission, the kind of heavily-armed, plastic-bottomed boat that
prowled the rivers in search of Charlie on Vietnam's massive Mekong Delta.
We all remember the unforgettable Colonel Kilgore (Robert Duvall) and his
Ride of the Valkyrie attack on the heavily-armed Viet Cong compound - "I
love the smell of napalm in the morning...it smells of victory" is a movie
line that is up there with "In all the gin joints in all the towns in all
the world she had to come into mine." Then there's the Playboy Bunny bit
and the last outpost scene and sampan sequence and more. So, with this
wealth of well done, beautifully shot (cinematography by Vittorio Storaro)
scenes that put a unique spin on the Joseph Conrad story, "Hearts of
Darkness," can it be made better? In a word, no.
The makers, led by Coppola and long-time collaborator, editor Walter Murch,
have reassembled the film from original unedited raw footage and included
not only missing scenes, but reedited and repositioned existing scenes, as
well. In my honest opinion, I liked the restructuring of the original movie
scenes the makers made. They give the individual sequences more clarity.
But the added, previously unseen, scenes do not work. The Colonel Kilgore
sequence is extended with Willard and company stealing the mad commander's
favored surfboard, introducing a mirth in Willard that doesn't fit the
character. The much-discussed French plantation sequence resolves some
things that were at loose ends in the original, but, overall, the added
footage is completely out of context to the rest of the film except to
narrate the past, war-ridden history of Vietnam and its colonization by the
French. Most of it feels like a personal travelogue that belongs in an
another film entirely.
An expanded Playboy playmate sequence that has Willard trading diesel fuel
for sexual favors for his crew goes against the grain and is introduced, I
think, because they had the T&A, so why not use it now? Otherwise, the
scene does not belong. An additional progression with Kurtz reading a Time
magazine to the captive Captain Willard helps to show the "normal" side of
the colonel following an insane, brutal act and it fits well.
Coppola and company have made a bigger, but not better, movie that does
have to be seen, especially on the big screen. If you extract the bloated,
additional stuff and keep the restructuring you might come up with
something that really is an improvement over the original. This version
isn't. The '79 "Apocalypse Now" gets an A and "Redux" diminishes with a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Double Take (2001)
When successful New York City investment banker Daryl Chase (Orlando Jones)
is framed for laundering Mexican drug money, he is forced to go on the lam
to find the one man who can clear his name. When he switches identities
with a petty thief, Freddy Tiffany (Eddie Griffin), he figures he's home
free, until he learns that his new alias is in even bigger trouble in
"Double Take."
In the tradition of "Silver Streak," "The In-Laws" and "Trading Places,"
"Double Take" is a likable entry in the buddy, road-trip, beat-the-bad-guy,
save-the-girl action flick with two equally likable perfs by the leads. The
flick doesn't cover any new territory, but tries to be imaginative in the
telling Daryl's tale and his adventures, but is mainly a launch pad for
it's stars.
Orlando Jones, you'll remember, was the player who broke out in song in
last year's good-natured footballer, "The Replacements." It was a one-note
performance, but one that made you notice him. As Daryl Chase, Jones starts
out as the straight straightman for a big-time banking firm headed by
Charles Allsworth (Edward Herrmann). Their key client, a Mexican
"businessman" named Minty Gutierrez (Shawn Elliott), has just deposited a
whopping $106 million in their bank and Daryl smells a rat. He is pondering
what to do as he is leaving the office when he is mugged, only to be saved
by a fast-talking, street-smart rogue named Freddy Tiffany.
Intrigue builds around Daryl when he and his girlfriend Chloe (Garcelle
Beauvais) are attacked in their apartment and rescued by Agent McCready
(Gary Grubbs) and his men from the CIA. The spook tells Daryl that he must
get to Mexico to clear his name and help stop the drug cartel operating
there. As the scared banker heads south, he repeatedly crosses paths with
the tenacious Freddy, who helps him along his way. The story drives along
until its inevitable big shootout finale, which is predicated by the
Freddy's declaration, "It's payback time."
"Double Take" is mostly a cliché of the other films mentioned, but it is a
good showcase for Griffin and Jones. Eddie Griffin is best known as a
comedian and he provides a good deal of stand-up schtick along the way. The
good news is that, though his performance consists of a series of skits,
dances and fast-talking jive, it is funny! The diminutive Griffin has a
screen presence that is going to generate a lot of work for the actor.
Jones gets the opportunity to put variety into his perf as he goes from a
staid, conservative banker to a street-smart, hip-hopper who fast-talks his
way out of trouble. There are times when the actor mimics his costar to
perfection, showing his range and ability. Like Griffin, Jones should stay
employed for some time to come.
The supporting cast, though large in number, is definitely left in the
background. With the spotlight on the stars, no one else has the chance to
thesp, especially with the fast pace of the under 90 minute flick. Edward
Herrmann is there to lend his name to the credits and collect a check,
only.
The original screenplay, by director George Gallo, combines bits and pieces
from other movies of the same ilk. There are definite bad guys, like the
drug lord, but there is also a plethora of ambiguous loyalties as the story
uses movie sleight of hand to keep you guessing who are the bad guys and
who are the good guys. In this case, the CIA, once again, is used as an
evil scapegoat as corruption personified. The constant switching of whom is
good and bad gets a bit tedious as the film draws to its conclusion. The
film ends with the obligatory sitting-around-the-pool-on-a-Caribbean-island
scene, but it is used to tie up the last of the story threads.
Production is straightforward with good photography, varied settings and,
for Jones and Griffin, some funky costuming.
"Double Take" is a popcorn comedy/actioner that actually supplies both
elements. The lead characters are fun and funny and there is ample gunplay
for the shoot-em-up fans. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)
International Elvis Week in Las Vegas draws a flood of King wannabes in
sequined jumpsuits and mutton chop sideburns. But, five copycats that enter
the Riviera Hotel and Casino have plans of their own - armed robbery with
really big guns. This is just the beginning of a tale of betrayal, murder
and revenge, starring Kurt Russell and Kevin Costner, in "3000 Miles to
Graceland."
It has been a while since we've had a crime caper movie on a visual par
with such films as "Con Air" or "True Romance," and it looked like "3000
Miles to Graceland" would fit the bill. We do get a pair of high-powered,
heavy-ordinance shootouts, one early on and the other the dramatic finale,
that provide the requisite thrills to grab the viewer's attention. But,
these action bits are bridged with a cat-and-mouse chase as the two key
figures, Michael (Kurt Russell) and Murphy (Kevin Costner), vie to take
possession of the $3.2 million stolen from the casino.
Things start off amiably enough when Michael parks his vintage, candy-apple
red, 1959 Cadillac Coupe de Ville convertible at the Last Chance Motel near
Vegas. A local kid, Jessie Waingrow (David Kaye), steals the fancy valve
caps off of the classic car and, to get them back, Michael meets the boy's
mom, Cybil (Courtney Cox). Sparks fly between the lonely ex-con and the
equally lonely Cybil and they have a romantic interlude. Then arrives
Murphy and his three partners - Hanson (Christian Slater), Franklin (Bokeem
Woodbine) and Gus (David Arquette).
Murphy, Michael and the rest, it turns out, are headed to Las Vegas for
International Elvis Week, where thousands of the King's impersonators are
gathering to honor their muse. The plan is, with all of the confusion in
town, to hit one of the big casinos for a fortune. The heavily armed
Elvises pull off the heist but are intercepted by security guards, ending
in a violent shootout right in the middle of the casino. As the guys blast
their way out, one of their number, Franklin, is hit and soon dies. When
the remaining four thieves get together to split the booty, a conflict
arises over Franklin's share. Hanson goes toe-to-toe with Murphy and loses,
making it a team of three. When they head out to get rid of the body in an
isolated place, Murphy tries to make their number just one - him.
Only Michael survives Murphy's attack and he tries to head off the killer
from getting the loot. He teams up with Cybil and Jessie to get the cash
laundered, all the while being relentlessly pursued by Murphy in a chase
that ends with a major confrontation with the law.
I was a little disappointed, part way into the film, when the Elvises in
Las Vegas bit falls by the wayside following the heist. It takes on a more
personal note as Michael, Cybil and Jesse hit the road with Murphy in
pursuit. Murphy has no trouble with killing and a string of bodies is left
along the way as they all head for the Canadian border and freedom. But,
this odd road movie takes on unusual proportions as greed kicks in and, for
awhile, it's every man (or woman) for himself. At one point, Michael and
Jessie are teamed as they chase Cybil who took the money and ran.
My complaint about "3000 Miles to Graceland" is the extended middle where
double cross is met by double cross. While the personality dynamics is
interesting, sometimes violent and sometimes amusing, it meanders along at
times, making me wish for some judicious editing. The bookend violence of
the story is shocking in its brutality and slick in its, no pun intended,
execution. As the heist and subsequent shootout takes place, with fast,
stylish inter-cutting between the violence and scenes from the dance floor
where Elvis clones and beautiful showgirls sing and dance, unaware of the
mayhem that is happening near by. The climactic finale is a Hollywood
example of more bullets is better as Murphy goes out in a blaze of glory
reminiscent of Jimmy Cagney in "White Heat."
Production credits are solid as we are brought into the fantasy world of
Las Vegas and its International Elvis Week. There are Elvises in all shapes
and sizes (there is even a dwarf Elvis who gets it during the heist) and
this has some amusing turns with impersonators who look decidedly unlike
the King. The gonzo gun duels are handled with fast camera work, faster
editing and well choreographed violence. Videomaker Demian Lichenstein
utilizes his music vid chops to infuse a hyperkinetic energy into the big
shootouts.
The perfs are relegated to the four principles once the heist is over and
Murphy thins the herd of contenders for the loot. Slater, Woodbine and
Arquette get some mileage as the other members of the gang and, as they are
offed, you wish there was more of them. But, the cast that's left does OK.
Costner is surprisingly good as the taciturn and murderous Murphy. It is
against his usual good guy persona and reflects one of his better
performances of late. The likable Kurt Russell is the good guy among the
bad and he gets to wear his shining armor to the end. Surprisingly,
Courtney Cox delivers one of her better perfs as the sexy and human Cybil.
Young David Kaye gives a good intro performance as the tough,
self-sufficient Jessie.
"3000 Miles to Graceland" is not just a heist flick as the trailers
reflect. It is that, but there is a larger story of greed, murder, betrayal
and revenge that hones itself to a sharp point before the explosive ending.
The two-hour run time could have been cut for a better film, but I still
give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews vist www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Driven (2001)
At speeds in excess of 240 miles per hour and only inches apart from each 
other, CART (Championship Auto Racing Team) racecar drivers are members of 
the world's most deadly professional sport. When up-and-coming rookie Jimmy 
Bly (Kip Pardue) starts to have doubts about his driving ability, team 
owner Carl Henry (Burt Reynolds) brings back veteran driver Joe Tanto 
(Sylvester Stallone) to mentor the lad and win the champion's laurel in 
Renny Harlin's "Driven." 
As someone who faithfully followed international car racing many years ago, 
I have always had a fondness for racing movies. Unfortunately, for me, only 
two of the many such flicks made, Steve McQueen's "Le Mans" and the 1950 
Clark Gable starrer "To Please a Lady," impressed me. I've watched all the 
rest, from the painfully rendered "Bobby Deerfield" to the lavish melodrama 
"Grand Prix" to the overblown "Days of Thunder," and generally find them 
lacking. There is usually too much talking/romancing and not enough racing. 
"Driven" has ample quantities of moralizing, bickering, romancing and 
racing, but none of it gets below the surface level. There are multiple 
melodramatic stories in the Stallone-scripted flick. The latest leader on 
the racing circuit, Beau Brandenberg (Til Sweiger), is being challenged by 
young Turk, Jimmy Bly, and dumps his longtime girlfriend Sophia (Estella 
Warner) so he can concentrate on his job. Jimmy, pushed into professional 
racing by his ambitious brother DeMille (Robert Sean Leonard), is having 
doubts about his ability to take the pressures of his chosen career. And, 
he wants Sophia. Ambitious and ruthless race team owner Carl Henry dumps 
his second driver, Memo Moreno, and brings on Joe Tanto to whip Jimmy into 
shape. Memo is married to Joe's ex-wife, Cathy (Gina Gershon), who's none 
too happy about Joe's arrival. Joe is conflicted about his return to auto 
racing after a near fatal accident years before. Joe is also having a 
flirtatious professional relationship with beautiful journalist Luc Jones 
(Stacy Edwards). And there's racing, too, in this high tech, high-speed 
soap opera. 
The glue that holds these many stories together is the racing. There is a 
great deal of noise accompanying the fast-paced, music vid-style visuals of 
the racing as the story covers the Indy-style racing circuit. The races 
look good, but the focus rests solely on the principals as the two leaders 
battle for first place in one race after another. The rest of the field, 
which includes a bevy of pro drivers, are left to the background, as if 
there is no other race going on but for those in the lead. If you've ever 
followed car racing, you know that lots of the excitement in the sport 
takes place back in the pack. Not so in "Driven." Also, heavy use of 
computer generated F/X of the many crashes and close calls bring attention 
to what are obvious animated bits. The CGI effects are nowhere near as 
seamless as in, say, "Enemy at the Gates," but are integrated into the 
multi-camera POVs well enough. 
The large ensemble cast goes through the motions but, as seems to be 
typical in a Renny Harlin film, there is no genuine passion in the any of 
the characters. Virtually everyone is a two dimensional symbol ranging from 
ambitious and driven (no pun) to sorrowful and contemplative. Stallone, in 
particular, takes on a guilt-ridden persona as he looks, sadly with his 
puppy-dog eyes, on his past choices and present conflicts. Newcomer Pardue 
("The Replacements") doesn't deliver the chutzpah that a young buck new to 
pro racing should and would have. Gina Gershon is both sexy and venomous as 
Memo's ambitious wife, but because of limited time on-screen, is merely 
unlikable. Burt Reynolds is the only one to come across as a person, albeit 
a ruthless, forceful businessman who only cares about winning at whatever 
the cost in men and materials. 
"Driven" falls in the middle of the pack of racing flicks that have come 
out over the years. There is a lot of auto racing, though with a sameness 
to each race that conveys nothing original - except for some truly 
eye-wincing crashes. There is also lots of melodrama, but nothing delves 
into the psyche of the sport. If you really want to see a great racing 
flick, try to find a copy of "Le Mans." Now that's racing! 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Startup.com (2001)
Only two or three years ago, a few smart guys with a little bit of capital 
could parlay an idea into a multimillion-dollar Internet business and have 
their fortunes made. Docu filmmakers Chris Hegedus and Jehane Noujaim 
rolled their camera at the birth of just such a company and planned to 
follow the meteoric rise of its founders, until the bottom fell out of the 
market in 2000, in "Startup.com." 
In 1998, four young entrepreneurs - Kaleil Isaza Tuzman, Thomas Herman, 
Chieh Cheung and George Fatheree - founded PublicDataSystems, Inc., a firm 
whose goal was to build a government Internet portal that would ease the 
public's pain in dealing with the bureaucracy we have all come to know and 
loath. Longtime documentary filmmaker Hegedus and newcomer Noujaim followed 
their group of web entrepreneurs from the very beginning, at the first 
discussion of the idea of their business to hiring the first folks into the 
company to their almost arrival at the top. The plan was to show the rags 
to riches success of their govWorks.com website and the making of 
20-something multimillionaires. 
But, in true documentary style, things do not go off as planned and a 
variety of circumstances happen that signal the end of the ambitious plans 
for the company. Venture capital dollars are a fickle thing and can dry up 
without a moment's notice. The company offices are broken into and valuable 
documents, outlining business and strategies, are stolen. The volatile 
personalities and differing viewpoints of the founders creates conflict and 
threatens the future of the govWorks.com. Then, in 2000, the bottom fell 
out of the Internet marketplace. The rags-to-riches tale becomes the rise 
and fall of an American dream. 
"Startup.com" is a sometimes-interesting document that suffers from a major 
problem - none of the individuals being followed are likable and, with 
their arrogance, bickering and techno-automaton behavior, create no empathy 
from the viewer. The makers do a decent job of capturing all aspects of the 
making of a startup company but they, unfortunately for the viewer, picked 
the wrong subjects. There is an attempt to introduce humanity into the mix 
by showing Thomas taking care of his young daughter and Kaleil having 
girlfriend troubles, but these are mere distractions and only serve to make 
an overly long film even longer. Perhaps some judicious editing would help, 
but the subjects, themselves, are the real problem. 
"Startup.com" documents the rise and fall of four guys' dreams, but, in the 
end, I don't care, and that's not good for a documentary movie. I give it a 
C. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Too Much Sleep (1997)
Jack Crawford (Marc Palmieri) is a 24-year old night security guard who
lives at home with his mother. One morning, while heading home on the bus,
he's checking out a pretty young woman when his handgun is stolen.
Desperate, Jack enlists the help of a local can-do guy named Eddie
(Pasquale Gaeta) whose advice sends the slacker into a weirdly populated
underworld in "Too Much Sleep."
First-time feature helmer David Maquiling directs his own script in homage
to Martin Scorsese's own nightmare journey, "After Hours." The hapless
schmuck that the story hangs upon, Jack, has one ambition in life - to
sleep. His night watchman job allows him that, but does not prepare him for
the world he is about to enter after his revolver, unregistered, is stolen.
The neighborhood BMOC, Eddie, was deputy county clerk for 19 years and
knows the right people to ask about such things as stolen guns.
Eddie's advice and directions lead Jack into an increasingly bizarre world.
He gets "maced" with Jovan Musk by his principle subject, Judy (Judy Sabo
Podinker), when he confronts her over the gun. Eddie tells him to "go to
145 Wicker?but, I ain't promising anything." Jack does and meets a variety
of weirdoes from a bartender who comes on to him to a psycho male nurse and
a loony philosopher - but, no gun. His continued journey through life's
underbelly bears him nothing more than a string of more strange characters.
It is all about Jack finding himself, in the end, and not the gun.
"Too Much Sleep" starts off amiably enough with its main character, Jack,
looking only to catch the maximum Z's out of life. Marc Palmieri is deadpan
in his delivery of his slacker  Jack persona and it works out for a short
while. As he encounters an increasing number of oddball characters while
searching for the gun, the film loses its quirkiness and just dabbles in
weird behavior. As interest in the revolver is supplanted by other things
in Jack's life, our interest is the film wanes, too.
The cast is made up with a good-natured collection of dedicated amateurs
and semi-pros but none, with one exception, stand out. Pasquale Gaeta cuts
a funny path as the Joe Pesci-like Eddie, spouting his knowing advice and
guiding Jack through the maze of illicit weapons and sleazy people. He is
uniformly amusing as Jack's muse.
The screenplay, by the director, pushes hard to get a rise out of the quirk
meter and succeeds for the first half, but slowly loses its steam in the
second. It's a decent calling card to get the young filmmaker his foot in
the door of bigger budget mainstream film. "Too Much Sleep" is amiable, but
not enough. I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Angel Eyes (2001)
A mysterious man (Jim Caviezel) appears, like a guardian angel, and saves
police officer Sharon Pogue (Jennifer Lopez), from a deadly ambush. Is it
coincidence or fate? The two shall learn the truth about themselves and
each other as they fall in love in "Angel Eyes."
"Angel Eyes" is, first and foremost, a date flick. It has the trappings of
an action-drama, initially, with Lopez saving a car crash victim, then,
later, getting in a shootout with a fleeing felon. But, once the setup is
made - troubled cop, Sharon, meets mysterious drifter, Catch (Caviezel) -
the cop drama falls away and real story, the love story about two troubled
people adrift and alone who find each other, kicks in.
When Catch (Caviezel) comes on the scene, we find a tortured and confused
man who is, at his core, a good Samaritan. When he first sees Sharon, he
recognizes her, but it's left vague as to how and when. (But, if you paid
attention to the action under the credits at the beginning, you'll guess
who Catch is.) All we really know about the stranger is that he is drawn to
drawn to Sharon like a magnet to iron.
Sharon has her own set of hang-ups to deal with, too. She is overly
aggressive at her job - so much so that her partner, Robbie (Terrence
Howard), repeatedly admonishes her to lighten up. Her sudden rescue by
Catch, just when she is about to be capped by a hoodlum with her own gun,
begins a slow-burning romance that increases in heat as each of the two
discard their outer shells - hers of tough anger, his of benign confusion.
As they fall for each other, they both unlock hidden, painful pasts. The
release each experiences, because of their love for each other, allows both
to resolve past problems and learn to love each other unconditionally.
The routine story about two troubled people finding and nurturing each
other is helped by decent, though not great perfs by Lopez and Caviezel. I
have never been a big fan of Jennifer Lopez (though I really liked her
opposite George Clooney in Stephen Soderberg's "Out of Sight"), but found
her angry cop character to have dimension. Caviezel, with those piercing,
expressive eyes and handsome looks, fits the bill as the mysterious Catch.
The actor has to get some roles that give him more to do than look tortured
and pensive. I'd like to see the guy get a chance to thesp once in a while,
instead of just expressing for the camera.
There is little going on below the performances of the two stars. Acclaimed
Brazilian actress Sonia Braga ("The Kiss of the Spider Woman") appears as
Sharon's mother, whose abuse by her husband (Victor Argo) years before led
to the father/daughter estrangement that has lasted for years. Vet actress
Shirley Knight has a small, sensitive role as Catch's caring, former
mother-in-law.
Scripter Gerald DiPego joins, again, with helmer Mandoki (they last
collaborated on the saccharine "Message in a Bottle") in bringing another
romance to the screen. Fortunately, their second time together is better
than their first. Lenser Piotr Sobocinski shifts between dark and brooding
lighting, when things are serious, to warm and soft as the romance
traverses the film story.
"Angel Eyes" will find its audience in the post-teen dating scene. The
angst of the characters and their release from despair won't get the action
fans, but it will get the romantics. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bridget Jones's Diary (2001)
Bridget Jones (Renee Zellweger) is 32 years old, 138 pounds, smokes like a
chimney, drinks too much and, worst of all, is still single. But, after
coping with a particularly nasty hangover following her company Christmas
party, she promises to turn over a new leaf in "Bridget Jones's Diary."
Book adaptations, especially one as narration heavy as Helen Fielding's
tome about a single woman in London, are a tough bet to put up on the big
screen successfully. It's nice to see the case where a good, entertaining
book is translated into a good, entertaining movie and director Sharon
McGuire and company give us exactly that in "Bridget Jones's Diary."
The story spans a year in the life of Bridget Jones, a researcher in a
publishing house who is constantly reminded by her family and friends that
she isn't getting any younger and it's time she found a man and settled
down. But this is not quite as easy as it sounds as the pool of eligible
single men dwindles with every passing year. When her boss, Daniel Cleaver
(Hugh Grant), begins to flirt with her via e-mail, she responds in kind and
a whirlwind romance ensues.
In the meantime, her mother (Gemma Jones) tries to set her up with a
barrister, Mark Darcy (Colin Firth), at Christmas, but he thinks that
Bridget is an unintelligent young woman who smokes and drinks too much. It
doesn't help things when Bridget's mom reminds them that, as a little girl,
Bridget used to run around Mark's yard stark naked. As time passes, Miss
Jones realizes that Daniel is a two-faced liar and Mark is the one she
should be with for the rest of her life. But, will it happen?
You don't have to be a fan of the book to enjoy the movie, but that
familiarity does add an interesting dimension. One always has a critical
eye when it comes to a movie adapted from a book you enjoyed. "Bridget
Jones's Diary" also had some negative publicity over the fact that
Texas-born Zellweger was cast to play the quintessentially British Bridget.
In both cases, adaptation and actor, there is nothing to fear. The
screenplay, by veteran scribes Richard Curtis, Andrew Davies and the author
herself, captures the tone of the book perfectly and brings a sweet
romantic comedy to the screen. The humor is funny throughout and  sometimes
bawdy, but there is virtually no nudity and the sex is almost chaste.
Renee Zellweger does a fabulous job as the weight and bad habit conscious
Bridget who decides that she will change herself and her life and begins
the title diary. Exercise and clean living are the keys to her change and
she makes a valiant stab at following through, but romance screws up her
plans when she falls for her slimy boss. Zellweger is perfect with her
understated London accent and put on weight to flesh out, so to speak, her
character. Within minutes of the start of the film, you see her as Bridget.
And Zellweger is willing to put, quite literally, her butt on the line, to
give a top comedy perf.
Supporting the inspired comic performance by the star are first class
showings by Grant, Firth and the rest of the cast. Hugh Grant does a turn
from his usual awe-shucks, bumbling nice guy and plays Daniel as a conniver
that will say and do anything to get his way. It's a good louse-of-a-guy
role and Grant does it justice. Colin Firth is also fine as the
stiff-as-a-board Mark who is initially turned off by the outspoken, brazen
Bridget. As he gets to know her, you watch his formality soften and he
falls, full smit, for the pretty Miss Jones.
Jim Broadbent and Gemma Jones provide dimension as Bridget's dad and mom
who are in the midst of their own marital crisis when mom leaves dad to
pursue a career as a shill for a sleazy salesman on a shopping channel.
Their side story helps to flesh out the life of Bridget into something that
feels genuine, even in its absurdity. Embeth Davidtz, Shirley Henderson,
Sally Phillips and James Callis, as Bridget's supportive and sometime
critical friends, fit the bill.
Production credits are first rate with crisp, clear lensing by Stuart
Dryburgh complementing Bridget's costuming, by Rachael Fleming, and
production design, by Gemma Jackson.
"Bridget Jones's Diary" is the best date flick to come down the pike in an
awfully long time and may well bring in a new generation of fans to Miss
Jones and her diary. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Crazy/Beautiful (2001)
Rich girl meets poor boy and they fall into star-crossed love. This has
been the staple of movies and song for decades and the question usually is:
is he good enough for her? Director John Stockwell does a 180 on this theme
in a story about rich, troubled Nicole (Kirsten Dunst) and poor,
intelligent and hard-working Carlos who find love together, but now the
question is: is she good enough for him in "crazy/beautiful"?
Nicole Oakley is a pretty, troubled and troublesome 17-year old who is
emotionally estranged from her congressman father and her wealthy
stepmother. She is always getting into one jam after another, disdains her
prestigious Pacific High School and seems destined to self-destruct. Carlos
Nunez is a poor, inner city kid who has enough smarts to want to make
something of his life. He voluntarily busses himself, for two hours each
way, to the same school, works very hard and has plans to attend Annapolis
when he graduates. When the two meet, sparks fly, but Nicole's past and her
present abuses may be too much for Carlos to handle.
"A Place In the Sun" and "Love Story" (and the classic 60's song "Down in
the Boondocks" by Billy Joe Royal) come to minds with the poor boy/girl
looking to the ritzy side of the tracks for love and success.
"crazy/beautiful," from the original script by Phil Hay and Matt Manfredi,
twists the tradition rich/poor concept around from what we normally get,
with the poor kid being warned by his friends, family and, hell, even the
girl's own father, that she's no good and will only drag him down.
I like the idea of distorting the old rich-girl/poor-boy yarn to show that
underprivileged is not necessarily a bad thing and having the lap of luxury
and all its perks is not always good. "crazy/beautiful" starts out with the
first tentative meeting between Nicole and Carlos on a sunny beach as she
picks up trash as punishment for driving under the influence. Nicole is
pretty, in a rather haggard way, and, with her troublemaking attitude, soon
gets Carlos into hot water - repeatedly. Just why he would jeopardize his
ambitious, focused future for someone who causes him nothing but trouble is
a problem I have with the story.
There are other issues, too, as "crazy" Nicole is not all that whacked out.
Sure she has psychological and self-esteem problems. She drinks too much
and acts irresponsibly, but I've known people who I considered "crazy" and
they were a lot worse than Nicole. I kept waiting for the girl to really
flip out but, except for one scene when she is awakened from a drunken
stupor by the cops who pulled Carlos over as he (soberly) drove her home,
this never materialized. By the end, when everything is nicely wrapped up,
I was still waiting for her to explode.
The two leads make a nice looking couple but I never believed in the mutual
attraction. Dunst continues to build her acting credentials and is
developing into a young star. Newcomer Jay Hernandez is personable enough,
but does not stand out as Carlos. The rest of the cast is little more than
background noise. Taryn Manning, as Nicole's best friend Maddy, is cute,
has an effervescent personality and is unceremoniously dropped from the
story entirely by the half way mark. Bruce Davison collects a paycheck as
the congressman dad who disdains and ignores his troubled child until,
perfunctorily, they all live happily ever after in the last few minutes.
The only character that rings true to me is Carlos's mom who expressed
maternal, protective volumes with just a look at her son.
"crazy/beautiful" never gets out of the shallow end of the pool with its
tale of star-crossed love. It doesn't grab me, but maybe it will win over
its female teen target audience. I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
Hollywood invades small town New England when a film production company, 
led by producer Walt Price (William H. Macy), comes to Waterford, Vermont 
to shoot the film, "The Old Mill." The problem is the town's old mill 
burned to the ground three decades ago and that's just the beginning of the 
troubles in a movie about making a movie, David Mamet's "State and Main." 
Playwright/screenwriter/director Mamet has created celebrated and 
controversial tales from "Glengarry Glen Ross" to "Oleana" to "The Winslow 
Boy." Mamet, the writer, has produced an eclectic body of work that often 
delves deeply into the human psyche. With "State and Main," the helmer 
takes on a fast paced comedy in a movie about making a movie in small town 
America. In this one, though, the talented Mamet stumbles. 
When the production team for "The Old Mill" lays siege to the unsuspecting 
Vermont town, it is with a checkered past. A scandal forced the entire 
production crew to be turned out of their previous location in a New 
Hampshire town because of a propensity for young girls by the film's star, 
Bob Barringer (Alec Baldwin). Now, ensconced in their new location, with 
only days to go before principal photography starts and no budget left, 
Walt Price has multiple disasters to contend with. As mentioned before, the 
mill that is the focal point of "The Old Mill" is gone. Barringer's 
co-star, Claire Wellesley (Sarah Jessica Parker), refuses to do her 
contracted nude scene unless she gets a bunch more money. The film's 
lunatic cinematographer wants to destroy a stained glass landmark so he can 
"get the shot." Finally, playwright turned screenwriter Joseph Turner White 
(Philip Seymour Hoffman) is suffering from a monumental case of writer's 
block. 
And these are just some of the problems that must be faced. White falls for 
the pretty fiancée of a local politician while struggling with his changing 
career. Bob Barringer gets in trouble, again, with a local teen girl (Julia 
Stiles), forcing a cover-up to avoid getting everyone tossed out of town. 
And, a replacement still has to be found for the damned Old Mill! 
All of this is fun stuff from the pen of a talented writer and it probably 
looked really good on paper. Especially with the large, talented ensemble 
cast available to breathe life into their characters. Unfortunately, the 
execution of these amusing ideas falls flat with too much going on with too 
many characters. There is also a problem with who is the "bad guy" here. Is 
it the intrusive strangers from Hollywood? Or, is it the town folk who do 
everything they can to take advantage of the bucks that the production crew 
brings to thew town? As the lines of definition blur between the outsiders 
and the residents, the people of Waterford take on the same greedy air as 
the folks from Tinseltown. 
The lack of distinction between the outsiders and insiders is complicated 
by the choice of some of the principle actors. Philip Seymour Hoffman has 
impressed me, considerably, in his past performances - see him as Freddie 
in "The Talented Mr. Ripley" as a marvelous example of his acting ability. 
But, as the sensitive, angst-ridden, romantic figure? It is just not the 
Hoffman's cup of tea. Mamet seems to be using the actor as his own alter 
ego in the film. Sarah Jessica Parker, as the movie star to whom modesty 
has just become an issue in her career, is little more than a pampered 
prima donna that usually gets her way. Alec Baldwin simply has nowhere to 
take his self-center matinee idol. 
There are some good roles coming out of "State and Main," though. William 
H. Macy, one of the finest character actors in the business, plays the 
cocky producer to perfection. He, and David Paymer as the film's 
high-powered "money man," put a good spin on portraying filmmakers used to 
having their way on location. They plead, threaten and pout to get their 
ways with their crew and the town's people. Their perfs only make up a 
portion of the movie and it's not enough. 
Tech credits are adequate, but nothing remarkable. 
I have come to look forward to most of David Mamet's films and, usually, am 
not disappointed. There are exceptions, though, and "State and Main" is 
one. For a movie about making a movie, there isn't enough movie-making 
stuff to the story. I give it a C. 
For more Reeling reviews visist www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Caveman's Valentine, The (2001)
Romulus Ledbetter was a Julliard-trained classical musician and a devoted
family man who lost his mind. He now lives in a cave on the edge of
Manhattan and is haunted by a delusional enemy, Cornelius Gould Stuyvesant,
who manipulates Rom's life from atop the Chrysler building. But, when
Ledbetter finds a frozen corpse outside his home, he must put aside his
dementia and solve the murder in "The Caveman's Valentine."
Kasi Lemmons, an accomplished actress and screenwriter, made quite a splash
with her debut-directing job, "Eve's Bayou," which was the highest grossing
independent film of 1997. With "The Caveman's Valentine," she uses George
Dawes Green's adaptation of his own novel to unfold a murder mystery with
Romulus as a very unlikely homicide detective.
The murder story enveloping Romulus involves a handsome young drifter,
Scotty Gates (Sean MacMahon), found dead atop a tree outside of the old
schizophrenic's cave. When the police, including Rom's cop daughter Lulu
(Aunjanue Ellis), dismiss the transient's death, the former music master
must piece the clues together alone. He becomes convinced that a prominent
Manhattan art photographer, David Leppenraub (Colm Feore), is the murderer.
But, who is going to believe the ranting of a crazy man living in a cave?
The brightest point of "The Caveman's Valentine" is the terrific character
depiction of Romulus Ledbetter by Samuel L. Jackson. In his last three
outings he has played a bad ass private dick in "Shaft," a physically
handicapped mass murderer in search of a hero in "Unbreakable," and, in
"The Caveman's Valentine" a mentally broken artiste who must put aside his
dementia to solve a murder. The actor puts a completely different spin on
each of his characters and Romulus Ledbetter is no exception. Topped with a
head full of dreadlocks and attired in layers of dirty clothing, Ledbetter
is a raving, hallucinating nutcase who is brought back to the sane world,
at least for a little while, to solve the murder placed on his doorstep.
Jackson, as usual, creates a real, three-dimensional person in Romulus.
After Jackson, though, things get a bit sparse as the rest of the cast has
to play off the master actor. This is a fault of the story, not the actors,
as the characters are universally overshadowed by the star. False leads and
fake outs make up the bulk of the tale as Romulus must strip away the lies
and misleading information to finally solve the crime. I don't want to give
the story away, but too much slight of hand is used to lead the viewer down
false paths in the investigation. Colm Feore does put a slick arrogance
into his perf as David Leppenraub and Ann Magnuson, as David's sister and
Rom's love interest, comes across as a really nice lady. Anthony Michael
Hall has a bit of fun as a yuppie lawyer who, through circumstance, becomes
Rom's patron. The rest are there to support Jackson.
Romulus's mental state and delusions are reminiscent of Terry Gilliam's
"The Fisher King," especially his ranting against the invisible Stuyvesant.
One ongoing hallucination is particularly effective as Ledbetter's ex-wife
Sheila (Tamara Tunie), in her younger form, keeps appearing before him as
his muse, dispensing advice and criticism as necessary. The focus upon
Romulus and his mental illness affords Jackson the opportunity to delve
into the character, giving us a terrific study by the actor.
Kasi Lemmons has a tough job topping her debut feature and, without the
incredible talent of Samuel L. Jackson, would not have come close. With
Jackson in the saddle as Romulus Ledbetter, she has the chance, at least,
to successfully get past the sophomore slump. I give "The Caveman's
Valentine" a C+.

Title
Review for Roozi khe zan shodam (2000)
Marzieh Meshkini, the wife and protege of legendary Iranian filmmaker
Mohsen Makmalbaf, makes her entry into the world film market with three
short stories about being a woman in Iran in "The Day I Became a Woman."
Makmalbaf had formed a film school of sorts in his native Iran, attracting
family and friends interested in learning the art and craft of filmmaking.
His daughter, Samira, made a striking international with "Blackboards." His
young wife, Meshkini, provides us with her graduate effort that effects
some near brilliant moments coupled with film student intensity.
Part one, "Hava," reps the simplest, most amateur feeling, of the three
short tales. This is the story of a little girl who enters, at ripe old age
of nine, womanhood. Little Hava is not prepared for this event, which will
stop her from playing with her best friend, Hassan, ever more. When she
learns that she has one hour before officially becoming a woman, she runs
off to steal back the last vestiges of childhood with her boy friend.
Before she leaves to find Hassan, Hava's grandma shows her how to use a
stick as a sundial to tell her when her time as a child is up. It's a swwet
little tale, but the non-actors are called upon to deliver lengthy,
meaningful lines and it works only as an academic exercise.
Better is the second tale, "Ha," about a young woman who takes part in a
bicycle race - forbidden everywhere in Iran except for the island of Kish.
We learn quickly that Ha is racing against her husband's wishes as he
pursues her on horseback. The focus is constantly on Ha and the other
women, swathed head to toe in black, as her husband and a succession of
family, mullahs and village elders ride their horses beside Ha and the
racers and shout at her to stop this madness. The visuals are striking and
this tale about escape.
The last tale, "Hoora," is about an old women who comes into the big city,
hires a boy and entourage of carriers and goes on a shopping spree, buying
everything from a refrigerator and washer/dryer to a bedroom set and, even,
a tea kettle. She then has the whole kit and caboodle delivered to the
beach to be hauled onto a ship. This odd little yarn starts of with light,
comic whimsy, but turns to Fellini-esque surreality, as her booty is set
out on the beach, in room-like arrangement, to await transport to a ship.
Hoora finally has everything she ever needed as her story draws to a close.
I am a strong proponent for Iranian films these past couple of years and I
am always interested to see the crafted film work emerging from that
struggling nation. To date, I have not been disappointed. True, every film
can't be of the caliber and intensity of such works as "The Color of
Paradise" or "A Time for Drunken Horses," but the obvious talents involved
in the creation of "The Day I became a Woman" cannot be dispelled. The
intense imagery and sometimes-silent story telling are very different from
American films and are an interesting challenge for a film buff. I give it
a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
We've had "Sgt. Bilko," "The Addams Family," "McHale's Navy," "The Mod
Squad" and "The Fugitive," all TV shows that became the concept fodder for
movies decades later. This hit or miss proposition has produced such
ridiculous dreck as "Bilko" and "McHale" and well-made big screen
adaptations like "The Fugitive." Columbia Pictures gets on the remake wagon
with the reprise of the 1970's TV babe fest, "Charlie's Angels," with the
update starring Cameron Diaz, Drew Barrymore and Lucy Liu as Charlie's
girls and Bill Murray as the ever loyal lieutenant, Bosley.
The draw for the new, big screen rendition of "Charlie's Angels" is the
built in attraction for the ready-made audience of fans of the TV show.
That and, of course, the showcase for some of Hollywood's hottest female
properties. Just about everyone who sees the movie will know about the
show, its faceless narrator (once again, voiced by John Forsythe) and its
bevy of beautiful, brilliant and bodacious babes. The Angels are three
talented and athletic private eyes working for their mysterious boss and
solving all kinds of complicated crimes and their latest case is no
different.
Eric Knox (Sam Rockwell) is a handsome genius and founder of Knox
Technologies. He has designed a voice-identification software program that
is more accurate than fingerprinting. But, in the wrong hands, it could
prove a worldwide disaster. When the scientist is kidnapped, Knox president
Vivian Wood (Kelly Lynch) turns to the one man - and three women - who can
break the case, Charlie and his Angels.
Natalie (Diaz), Dylan (Barrymore) and Alex (Liu) jump on the case and begin
their investigation with Roger Corwin (Tim Curry). Corwin heads Red Star
Systems, the world's largest telecommunications satellite network, and is
the arch business rival to Knox. The corporate honcho is the Angels' prime
suspect and the team works, first, to free Knox from his kidnappers, then
foil Corwin's plans to steal and use the advanced technology for his own
greedy purposes. But, after they save their client, they discover that all
is not as it seems and the identity of the real bad guy takes a sudden
twist, putting the lives of the Angels, and Charlie, in grave danger.
The screenplay for the new "Charlie's Angels" doesn't make any real attempt
to update the original material of the TV show. Instead, the writers (Ryan
Rowe, Ed Solomon and John August) give the story a 70's retro feel that
captures the mood of the series. This is a help as the players in the film
can anchor their perfs to the simple action/T&A template of the show
without having to break new creative ground. As such, the concentration is
on the usual flash and fire coupled with choreographed fights and
Matrix-style special F/X.
No one in the cast is going to earn any Oscars or Golden Globe awards for
"Charlie's Angels," but the actors seem to be having some fun. Cameron Diaz
is almost gleeful in her portrayal of the ditzy, yet competent, Natalie.
She has all of the action and Kung Fu moves down while putting a comic spin
on her character. Diaz gets mileage out of scenes like her rescue of Bosley
from a prison at the same time a new boyfriend (Luke Wilson) gives her a
call. It's absurdist but, because of Diaz, it works.
Barrymore is cute as a button as Dylan and she, too, has good fun,
especially when she takes down five of the bad guy's henchmen while tied to
a chair. Lucy Liu, whom I usually find annoying as an actor, fits the
action bill well as the tough as nails Alex. Bill Murray doesn't get to do
too much as Bosley - kind of like in the TV show. Supporting cast is good,
though mostly underutilized. Tim Curry is wasted as a maguffin used to
distract the viewer from the real bad guys. Sam Rockwell gets to put an arc
on his perf as Eric Knox, shifting gears along the way as the nature of his
character changes. Crispin Glover gives his henchman, called the Thin Man,
a silent, chain smoking twist that makes him seem like he's right out of a
low budget James Bond flick. Kelly Lynch, Matt LeBlanc, Tom Green and LL
Cool J are given little to do except appear on the screen.
Tech credits are solid as first-time director, named McG, puts his music
video imprint on the film. Fast editing, rapid-fire camera (by Russell
Carpenter) and slick production values make this a quickly paced bit of
movie fluff. I have to say, though, that the 92-minute run time feels long.
A short film by today's standards, it could have used some judicious
editing. Things run out of steam well before the end of "Charlie's Angels,"
but that doesn't stop the filmmakers from setting us up for the sequel(s)
just before the end credits.
Looks are more important than the plot line of "Charlie's Angels" and I
guess that's how it should be. Teenage girls are the target audience and
the likable action figures rep'd by the three Angels are decent enough role
models. The sexy outfits they get to strut around in should be sufficient
draw for the boyfriends, too. This is not meant for the more discerning
viewer, though. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Art of War, The (2000)
The slumbering giant, China, is about to enter into a major trade agreement with
the west, led by the United States, when a freighter is discovered in New York
Harbor with a grisly cargo of dead Chinese refugees. Negotiations are further
strained when Chinese Ambassador Wu (James Hong) is assassinated while giving a
speech to a large, media-saturated gathering of diplomats at the UN. Special
United Nations agent, Neil Shaw (Wesley Snipes), is framed for the murder and he
goes on the lam to clear his own name and uncover what may be a conspiracy of
massive proportions in "The Art of War."
Director Christian Duguay ("Screamers") leads a talented cast and crew in what
starts off as a pretty slick actioner for the first hour. After that, the story
degenerates into a routine thriller where the good guy not only has to save the
day, he has to do so while being betrayed by his own people. The film starts out
interesting enough with a massive Millennium celebration in the heart of Hong
Kong. Neil Shaw, the covert spook for UN Secretary General Douglas Thomas
(Donald Sutherland), performs a high tech information theft under the noses of
the North Korean security officers. He then blackmails their finance minister
and makes a daring escape jumping from a skyscraper with a parachute. All of
this is slickly done with shoot-outs, kung fu and lots of eye-popping action.
Things move along pretty well with the set up and execution (forgive the pun) of
the assassination of the ambassador (an under-utilized Hong), then the fast
moving action as Shaw chases the real killer through a maze of obstacles only to
get himself arrested for the murder. FBI boss Frank Capella smells a rat over
the arrest, but Shaw is hijacked away by the henchman for the conspiracy to stop
the historic trade agreement from happening. Shaw makes a daring escape from his
captors, kicking butt and taking names in the process. Then things grind to a
halt.
Pretty UN interpreter Julia Fang (Marie Matiko) is brought into the mix as the
beautiful innocent bystander who is drawn unwillingly into the nefarious plot.
She, of course, provides Shaw with invaluable assistance - after all she is an
interpreter - while he saves her time and time again from the bad guys. We've
been there many times before, but, this time, there isn't even any romantic or
sexual innuendo between Shaw and Julia, until the tacked on epilogue where they
live happily ever after together. There is no chemistry between Snipes and
Matiko and this does serious injury to the film.
The rest of the mumbo jumbo of the second half of the movie is plagued with the
proliferation of bad guys. In the first half, mysterious and ruthless Chinese
businessman Chan (Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa, "Rising Sun") is painted as the
puppet-master pulling the strings of the conspirators from behind the scenes.
When he is abruptly killed by Shaw, the focus of the film changes as a larger,
more secretive conspiracy looms and Shaw learns that his partner Bly (Michael
Biehn) and boss Eleanor Hooks (Anne Archer), supposedly his friends, are really
his enemies. The jingoistic explanation - basically, America-For-Americans and
Say-No-To-China - as to why these highly trained, intelligent people would
behave the way they do is so trite and simple-minded, I just shook my head.
Screenwriters Wayne Beach and first-timer Simon Davis Barry have cobbled
together a mishmash of a story that starts off OK, but goes downhill when the
rapid-paced action stops and the "character development" begins. Unfortunately,
where Wesley Snipes excels is as the smart-ass, wisecracking action good guy who
puts his life on the line for God and country. He does that here in "The Art of
War" but his character lacks any of the mirth that makes the actor so likable.
His Neil Shaw is a stoic good guy who is betrayed and must get his justice done,
but there is no passion in the character or the performance.
There is a big supporting cast playing around in this celluloid sandbox, but
none, with the notable exception of the great Maury Chaykin, has much to do.
Chaykin, whom I first saw and respected in Atom Egoyan's 1991 Canadian film "The
Adjuster," has always had my admiration as a fine character actor who is capable
of humor and drama. As Frank Capella, he brings to life the sketchy character,
making the savvy FBI agent a sympathetic character (you're shocked when he is
gunned down, point blank, and breathe a sigh of relief when he pulls off his
bulletproof vest) and, ultimately, the one who believes in Shaw. The rest of the
cast - Donald Sutherland, Anne Archer, Michael Biehn, Marie Matiko, and
Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa - goes through the motions dictated by the lame script,
collecting a paycheck along the way.
Technically, things are of high quality and give the film a good crisp look with
lots of nighttime photography (by Montreal-based Pierre Gill), garish,
bright-colored sets and flashy action choreography, none of which help to save
this disappointment. I like Snipes and enjoy his films like "Passenger 57." As
for "The Art of War"? It should surrender. I give it a C-.

Title
Review for Dr. Dolittle 2 (2001)
The doctor is in once again as Eddie Murphy reprises his role as the man
who can walk with the animals and talk with the animals in "Dr. Dolittle
2."
The summer movie season and the success of the 1998 remake of Hugh
Lofting's long successful children's stories have made a sequel to "Dr.
Dolittle" inevitable. And, you get what you expect, though without the
little surprises the first story had, with the good doctor honing his
"talent" to converse with critters. This time around, we know Dr. D, his
family and some of the animal crew (Lucky the Dog (voiced by Norm
MacDonald), the rats and the drunken monkey (Phil Proctor) appear again)
and are introduced to a whole new gaggle of talking creatures.
Now, Dr. John Dolittle is secure in his God-given gift and opened his
clinic doors to humans and animals alike. With his professional life in
good working order, John turns his attention to his family, only to find
that his daughter, Charisse (Raven-Symone), has become withdrawn and
petulant. As he tries to cope with the emotional state of his teenager, he
is solicited by a tough-talking raccoon that insists that the doctor come
to the nearby forest to have a sit down with his boss, known as The Beaver.
The doc agrees to makes the journey and, to his horror, discovers that a
lumber company is clear-cutting the forest for profit and the forest
creatures' homes are in peril.
Dr. John looks into the situation and finds there is no way to stop the
devastation - except if it will save an endangered species. One such
candidate is a lone female Pacific Western bear that lives in the woods,
but without a mate to propagate the species, the government refuses to save
her or the forest. The only male bear of the same species anywhere nearby
is the member of a circus troupe and he, Archie (Steve Zahn), refuses to
give up his creature comforts - until he catches sight of the attractive
femme bear, Eva (Lisa Kudrow). In a Rocky-esque series of events, Dr.
Dolittle vows to help change Archie's behavior and introduce the bruin to
the forest (and Eva) to make little bears. It's a battle against the clock
as John struggles to make Archie a true bear of the world while they try to
save the habitat of all the other animals.
"Dr. Dolittle 2" is just what you expect, no less and not more. Half of the
film consists of a whole bunch of animal animatronics and computer graphics
that give the desired anthropomorphism that we came to enjoy so much the
first time around. This is where almost every laugh comes from as the
various creatures strut their stuff and sass the good doctor. Man, for some
reason, loves to give a human persona to his animals and "Dr. D 2" strikes
the right note. When the godfather-like Beaver explains, "I'm just a
fisherman blessed with many friends," a la Don Corleone, or his
hench-raccoon, Joey, (Michael Rapaport) uses a cell phone, it is funny. The
rest of the critters get to put their funny two cents in, too.
The human half of the story fares less well, mainly because it's just too
human. There is an evil plot by the state government, greedy businessmen
(Jeffrey Jones) and, of course, their lawyers (Kevin Pollack) to destroy
the land and make all the animals homeless. The forest critters, led by the
understanding Dr. Dolittle, must do battle to stop the megalith and they do
so in a way that would make Gandhi proud. But, the man story is the least
of the two halves.
The human characters, except for Murphy as the doctor, are superfluous.
When John has tender moments with his family or faces off against the
corporate baddies, you just want him to go back to the animals. I think,
for the next sequel (and I guarantee there will be another), they should
forget the people and stick with the animals.
With Lucky marking his territory over and over and Archie having intestinal
problems at one point, we are talking lowest common denominator,
humor-wise. The target for the toilet humor is the younger audience (which
is why more animals/less plot would be better, at least from a kid's POV).
The "story" of saving the environment is simply a frame to lay the gags
upon and provide the attending parents with an "adult" story when they take
their kids to see the doctor and his friends. But, "Dr. Dolittle 2" is for
kids and for the kid in us. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Saving Silverman (2001)
Darren (Jason Biggs), Wayne (Steve Zahn), and J.D. (Jack Black) have been 
best friends since the fifth grade. Like the Three Musketeers, they've been 
together through thick and thin. But, when Darren meets an attractive, but 
cold-blooded and manipulative, psychiatrist, Judith (Amanda Peet), the long 
time friendship is placed in danger. It's up to Wayne and J.D. to rescue 
their best friend in "Saving Silverman." 
"Silverman" has its heart in the right place, but the story, by newcomers 
Hank Nelken and Greg DePaul, is too lightweight to sustain the tale of the 
battle for Darren's soul. Based on their experience of a friend making a 
major marital mistake, the story is centered on the three, life long 
amigos. When Wayne introduces Darren to Judith, he doesn't realize that he 
has opened a Pandora's box of disaster for himself and J.D. Judith was once 
in a relationship where her boyfriend was the dominant figure until he died 
in a kick boxing match. Since then, she has sought a new mate - someone she 
can boss around and mold into her own vision. Enter Darren Silverman. 
Once they realize the magnitude of their error in judgement, Wayne and J.D. 
try everything they can, including threats and bribery, to get Judith to 
free Darren. Nothing works until the duo come up with a plan - kidnap 
Judith and get Darren back together with the girl he called his one and 
only, pretty Sandy Perkus (Amanda Detmer). The only problem here is that 
Sandy is about to take her vows to become a nun. Things spiral out of 
control as Judith repeatedly attempts to escape while Wayne and J.D. play 
cupid. The boys even bring their idol, Neil Diamond, into the picture to 
help resolve things. 
Thinking about it, this is a real mishmash of contrivance and coincidence 
that is held together solely by the comedic efforts of Steve Zahn and Jack 
Black. The pair is able to elicit the film's only laughs with their goofy 
antics and child-like behavior. They are relegated to providing slapstick 
guy humor and the two are more than equal to the task. Steve Zahn has been 
steadily honing his comedic acting skills and gives some complexity to 
Wayne, the "brains" of the gang. Jack Black has the big-guy moves of a 
Chris Farley, giving J.D. an amusing physical presence. The neat thing is 
that the two actors are able to get fresh laughs from stale material. 
The rest of the cast doesn't fare as well, though. Jason Biggs is the 
straight man of the Musketeers and gets very little to do; though having 
watched his previous films ("American Pie" and "Loser") I'm not sure what 
attraction Biggs actually has. Amanda Peet is caustic as the manipulative 
Judith. There is no humanity at all to her character as she single-mindedly 
strives to recreate Darren into her mind's image. She's a monster that 
Wayne and J.D. must defeat to save their friend. Unfortunately, there is no 
dimension to her character. Amanda Detmer brings nothing (or gets nothing) 
as Darren's one and only. R. Lee Ermey, as the psychotic Coach, made a bad 
decision taking this role. Tune-meister Neil Diamond gives a good-natured 
cameo perf as the boys' idol and savior. 
Production values are on par with the rest of the film - lackluster and 
non-involving. Director Dennis Dugan has a track record for broad comedy 
with films like "Big Daddy" and "Beverly Hills Ninja," but falls flat with 
"Saving Silverman." 
The 2001 movie year has yet to provide us with a "good" film to sink our 
teeth into. At least, with "Saving Silverman," we get a couple of funny 
perfs from Zahn and Black. Too bad that the rest of the film lacks their 
level of humor. Kick boxing deaths and conflicted nuns are not the makings 
of a good comedy. I give it a C-. 
For more Reeling reviews visit reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Endurance: Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition (2000)
"The Endurance: Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition" 
In 1914, as the Great War descended upon Europe, Sir Ernest Shackleton 
began his third expedition to Antarctica, this time to be the first to 
cross the ice-bound continent on foot. 28 men set sail on the brigantine 
Endurance and they would not be heard from again for nearly two years. 
Director George Butler, using film footage and photographs from the 
historic journey, tells their remarkable story in "The Endurance: 
Shackleton's Legendary Antarctic Expedition." 
The expedition started out as a merely incredibly difficult quest to 
traverse, on foot, the vast wasteland of Antarctica. As the intrepid ship 
and crew entered the Weddell Sea, the entry to the cold, cruel continent, 
they did not plan on the dense pack ice bringing the voyage to an abrupt 
halt as the Endurance became trapped within sight of land. For months the 
ice thickened and compressed until the ship was crushed, stranding the men 
on the flow, propelling them away from their goal and, eventually, into 
their lifeboats for safety. 
Shackleton, faced with a desolate situation, made the decision to lead the 
three tiny boats to the relative safety of uninhabited Elephant Island. 
Once on this "safe" haven, Shackleton next turned his sights to saving his 
crew and returning them to civilization. He and five of his men leave the 
island in an open boat to make the 800 mile journey on the world's roughest 
sea to get help from the nearest inhabited island of South Georgia. 
Miraculously, the six land, after 17 days at sea, on the uninhabited side 
of the target island and are forced to trek across treacherous, snow 
covered mountains, covering 22 miles in just 36 hours. This ordeal is 
followed by several attempts by Shackleton to get back to Elephant Island 
to rescue the remaining crewmen. In the end, he is successful and everyone 
made it back home alive, only to be swallowed up by the ravages of the war. 
The title of this fascinating documentary, "The Endurance," is more than 
just the name of ship that carried the crew of brave men to the edge of the 
world. It is also the description of the stamina and ability of every one 
of the men who survived 19-months of the toughest, most grueling conditions 
on the face of the earth. The name of the film is a tribute to every member 
of the crew and to the ship that sheltered them for many month of frigid 
Antarctic weather. It also describes the focused mental state of Shackleton 
who never gave up on himself or his men. 
With astonishing foresight, Shackleton brought Australian cinematographer 
and photographer Frank Hurley along on the journey. The filmed footage and 
photos are remarkable as they capture the ordeal of the men, day to day 
life, the affection all felt for their loyal sled dogs, the slow 
destruction of the Endurance and the preparations to get off of the pack 
ice flow. After the sinking of the ship, the remaining film stock, with the 
exception of a still camera and three rolls of film, had to be discarded so 
the continuing chronicle of the incredible journey gets less photo 
documentation as the ordeal plods on. Considering Hurley was using 
relatively primitive photo technology in one of the world's harshest 
environments and captured so much on film is a feat unto itself. (Hurley 
created his own account of the Shackleton expedition in his 1919 
documentary, "South," an interesting companion piece for "The Endurance." 
If Shackleton's original idea, document his trek across the frigid southern 
continent, had been successful, it would have been considered a super human 
feat. As you watch the story of "The Endurance" unfold, you realize that 
the disastrous obstacles the Sir Ernest and his men faced and overcame were 
even greater accomplishments than the first intent. (Shackleton's amazing 
800-mile journey in an open boat is fodder for a rousing adventure story 
all by itself.) 
There are a couple of minor nitpicks with this fine work, though. Actor 
Liam Neeson narrates the story, but his voice is too soft spoken and 
lilting for the dramatic tale. The nature of the ordeal also concentrates 
most of the visual material, both film and photo, in the documentary's 
first half. As the crew's adventure takes more drastic paths, Hurley had 
less and less film stock available to chronicle the awesome events. Helmer 
Butler and his team fill in the blanks, but the treasure of "The 
Endurance," its film footage, is mostly relegated to the early months of 
the expedition. 
I can't think of a true-life adventure that shows, better, the triumph of 
man over seemingly insurmountable odds. "The Endurance," based on Caroline 
Alexander's book, is an eye-opening documentary that goes where few men 
have gone before and, even more remarkably, all 28 survivors lived to tell 
about it. I give it a B+. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for King Is Alive, The (2000)
A disparate band of travelers is stranded in a remote part of northern
Africa. They take the only means of transportation, a bus, across the
desert to safety. But, a faulty compass causes them to stray 500 miles out
of their way when the bus breaks down. One intrepid member of the troupe
heads off, alone, for help. The rest are left to fend for themselves in
latest of the Dogma 95 manifesto films, "The King Is Alive."
Helmer Kristian Levring provides the fourth installment in the
stripped-down film aesthetics of the Dogma 95 movement founded by the
director and Lars Von Trier. The intent of the movement is to bringing
filmmaking back to its essence - no artificial props, lighting or sets, no
sound effects or special visual F/X,  location shooting only, etc. Levring
is fulfills the dictates of the Dogma Manifesto with his story of a journey
of lost souls.
When the dozen or so passengers find themselves stranded at an abandoned
mining town hundreds of miles from nowhere in the middle of Africa's Namib
Desert, they have nothing. The man with survival experience, Jack (Miles
Anderson), treks off to find help after explaining the five rules of
survival to those remaining - find water, find food, find shelter, stay
visible and keep your spirits up.
One of the group, Henry (David Bradley), a stage thespian, realizes the
dire strait they are all in and begins to write out all the roles to
Shakespeare's "King Lear," mainly to kill the time and keep his sanity.
When he suggests to one of the others, a feisty French girl named Catherine
(Romane Bohringer), they read the play and learn the parts as a panacea for
their dilemma, she glibly turns him down. But, as things get worse and
their isolation continues, the appeal to take part in the play increases
amongst them all, with each succumbing to the relief the project offers.
As Henry's idea unfolds and takes shape with the players, there is
dissention in the ranks as infighting breaks out. Husband and wife Ray
(Bruce Davison) and Liz (Janet McTeer) are in conflict as Liz,
disillusioned with Ray, humiliates him by openly trying to seduce the other
men in the troupe. Amanda (Lia Williams) soon realizes that her significant
other, Paul (Chris Walker), is a bully and a pig and wants nothing to do
with him. Catherine thinks that Gina (Jennifer Jason Leigh) is just another
clinging, needy American, while older Charles just wants carnal knowledge
with Gina to prove his masculinity - to himself. Ashley (Brion James) is an
alcoholic who, because of the forced isolation without the benefit of
booze, is suffering from a severe case of the delirium tremors. The
problems facing the stranded travelers do not recede at all and the
readings begin to have the cathartic effect that Henry hoped for.
Lenser Jens Schlosser ably captures the wind and sand blown location of the
African desert with the gently rolling, and incredibly cruel, sand dunes
bringing a flowing grace to the panoramic photography. There are a couple
of scenes, obviously shot from an airplane, that show the stark vista of
the desert that reminds of the striking desert photography used in "The
English Patient" and Bertolucci's "The Sheltering Sky." And all this with a
hand-held digital camera.
The story, by Levring and Peter Aalbaek Jensen, required much dedication of
purpose by the cast, but tends to keep the viewer at arm's length. There
are so many subplots and intrigues between and among the characters, it
becomes difficult to empathize with any of them. Not enough time is given
to any one player to allow you to know or care about them. The actors do a
solid job in each portrayal, but there is not enough time to really flesh
anyone out to three-dimensional proportions.
The whole Dogma 95 movement may be a filmmaking tempest in a teapot, but
there is a sincere honesty in the craftwork and artistic thought to the
story that make a film like "The King Is Alive" an intellectual treat in
the desert of Hollywood's summer fare. I give it a B-.

Title
Review for Little Nicky (2000)
Nicky (Adam Sandler) is a good boy, a sweet boy. He is also the spawn of
the Devil (Harvey Keitel). Dad has been on the throne of Hell for 10,000
years, but decides not to abdicate to any of his three sons. Nicky's elder
brothers Adrian (Rhys Ifans) and Cassius (Tom "Tiny" Lister, Jr.) have
designs on dad's throne and the pair vamoose to the mortal world to upset
the delicate balance between good and evil. This upheaval would mean the
end of Satan and it's up to Nicky to go after his malevolent siblings and
bring them back to Hell to save his Daddy in "Little Nicky."
Adam Sandler is an extraordinarily likable actor and comedian who captured
the hearts of American moviegoers with his comedy/romance "The Wedding
Singer." He solidified his icon status (and a $20 million paycheck) with
the good-natured and goofy "The Water Boy," then again with the malevolent
hit, "Big Daddy." Now, the comedian takes on his biggest role every - the
Son of Satan.
On the surface, this should be a ready-made laugher that just has to
capitalize on the good-versus-evil nature of the story and the comic
presence of Sandler. Nicky has a sweet disposition even if he is the demon
seed of the Devil. He has no designs to replace his Prince of Darkness dad
and seems like the wrong one to send to earth to bring back his brothers.
Adrian and Cassius team up to corrupt the morals of man and replace Satan
in Hell. The demonic duo engineer such heinous events as lowering the
drinking age to ten and changing New York's logo to "I Love Hookers." When
they take over Hell, they want to be sure they have a lot of new clients.
As Nicky endeavors to capture his bad brothers, he falls for a good-hearted
mortal woman name Valerie (Patricia Arquette). This proves a problem as
Nicky is torn between his mission and his budding love for Valerie,
jeopardizing daddy's wellbeing. This complicates things, as Nicky has to
worry about his newly found love as well as saving his daddy.
The problem with "Little Nicky" is that it is a comedy without humor. The
screenplay, by Tim Herlihy, wastes most opportunities for laughs on routine
pratfalls and lame devil on earth jokes. Some attempt at cleverness comes
with the arrival of two goofy dudes, Pete and John (Peter Dante and
Jonathan Loughran), but these apostles are more like Led Zeppelin hangers
on than disciples of the potential anti-Christ. Another sadly executed gag
involves Curt Howard (Ron's brother) dressing in drag - there was something
funny about this in concept that is woefully humorless in execution. The
script also makes reference to Roberto Benigni's "The Monster," but fails
to capitalize on this, and to "The Hunchback of Notre Dame" and
"Frankenstein." It goes nowhere with these paths and just drops the thread
of these plot lines. Oh, yeah. The big battle for command of Hell is a
pillow fight
There is good-naturedness to Nicky that makes the character likable despite
the inane happenings around him. Sandler comes out best in a bad movie with
his self-effacing charm and niceness - you come to find out that Dad made
it with an angel (Reese Witherspoon) eons ago and Nicky was the result of
that union. The vast supporting cast around Nicky is made up of a who's who
list in Hollywood that, unfortunately, has little to do. Rodney Dangerfield
(as grandpa Lucifer), Dana Carvey, Jon Lovitz, Quentin Tarantino, Kevin
Neelon, Michael McKean, Carl Weathers, Rob Schneider, Henry Winkler, Ozzie
Osbourne and Regis Philbin, among others, make their appearances in cameo
perfs. It is a real waste of riches as no one has anything funny to do or
say.
Techs are good, but even visions of Hell can't save "Little Nicky." I give
it a D.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Angel's Ladies (2000)
Mack Moore, a cemetery kingpin in Eugene, Oregon, and his second wife,
Angel, a widowed funeral director, sold it all and moved to the frontier
hamlet of Beatty, Nevada, located halfway between Death Valley and the
Nuclear Weapons Testing Range. The couple purchased the local brothel,
Fran's Star Ranch, and shifted careers from caring for the dead to
servicing the living in the documentary film, "Angel's Ladies."
The idea of "Angel's Ladies" is an interesting one. A middle aged couple,
he 70 and she 55, pick up their long-established roots in the damp
northwest and plunk themselves down right next to the hottest place on
earth to run a cat house. There is ready made interest in why they did it,
what their plans are, who are the women working for the Moores and why are
they there.
Things start off in a pretty straightforward manner with a succession of
talking heads and panoramic view of the scrub brush of the desert and the
ticky-tacky brothel building. But, it becomes obvious very fast that the
video makers have not learned their craft too well. In this day of
inexpensive, high quality video and audio equipment, there is no reason for
poor camera work and bad sound from a so-called professional filmmaker.
Both of these quality problems are rampant through the entire film. I have
seen local cable access programs that have better production values. The
cheesy production also extends to the lousy use of music to bridge many
moments in the documentary.
The subject matter is intriguing, but the execution of it is not. What
starts out as a document of the Moores and their unusual business in the
middle of nowhere, Nevada, turns into a rather strange tale of
misperceptions, labor problems and Angel taking an active part in servicing
the brothel's clients. Moore, at one point, claims that he never "dates"
his girls. The ladies counter his claim saying, sure, he always hits on
them. Mack and Angel say that the women are totally loyal to the couple.
Then, we hear about the labor problems from the hookers. As the docu
progresses, we become increasingly confused as to the point of the film and
why we are here.
The docu glosses over any in-depth investigation, like the impact of
brothels on the local community. This is glossed over with a few interview
shots of town officials telling us that the brothel tax pays for the town's
emergency services and it's all a good thing. We don't get into the heads
of Mack and Angel (nor would I want to be) or really learn much about the
why and wherefore of the women working at Angel's Ladies Brothel. When the
film ended, I wondered about the point of the film and the time I wasted
watching it.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Hardball (2001)
Conor O'Neill (Keanu Reeves) is a gambling addict in way over his head to
the local bookies, owing them thousands. His best friend from childhood,
Jimmy Fleming (Mike McGlone), has bailed his buddy out of such fixes many
times before, but this time is just too much. Instead of just giving Conor
the cash, Jimmy makes a deal - $500 a week for 10 weeks. The only catch is,
O'Neill has to coach an inner city Little League baseball team in
"Hardball."
The screenplay, by John Gatins, is based on the book by Daniel Coyle, an
account of the author's own experience as a youth baseball coach in
Chicago's notorious Cabrini-Green project. Director Brian Robbins brings
the story back to the Windy City as it follows loser Conor hitting the
bottom of his own personal barrel. He owes not just one, but two bookies
big time, and his immediate future has visions of broken bones. Desperate,
Conor tries to hit up Jimmy, a hot shot at a big time investment firm, only
to sell his soul for $5000 and the agreement to coach the Kekambas, the
ball team that Fleming's company sponsors. And, Conor will only get paid
after each week of coaching the team.
The reluctant Conor meets the team for the first time and they are a mixed
collection of kids, all shapes, sizes and ages and all with a desire to
play ball. Little G-baby (DeWayne Warren), the smallest of the lot, is both
team mascot and most dedicated player, despite his diminutive size. Miles
(A. Delon Ellis, Jr.) is the team's star pitcher, but only if he can jive
to "Big Poppa" on his headphones when on the mound. Jefferson (Julian
Griffith) is a 'big-boned' boy with an asthma condition. Kofi (Michael
Perkins) is possibly the Kekambas's best player. Andre (Bryan Hearne) is
tough kid who needs the anchor of his team far more than he realizes, with
Jamal (Michael B. Jordan) his best friend. Ray Ray (Brian Reed), Alex
(Alexander Telles), Sterling (Sterling Elijah Brim) and Clarence
(Christopher Loften) make up the rest of the team. I mention each of the
kids by name for a reason. It is one of the best casting of a large bunch
of young actors and they, uniformly, act the part of members of a team. My
favorite is the charismatic little kid playing G-baby.
This is a movie, in concept, like many inspirational sports team flicks
we've seen - "The Bad News Bears," "The Mighty Ducks," "Mystery, Alaska"
and a myriad of others come to mind, of course. The difference lay in a
subtle undercurrent of social commentary that "Hardball" conveys. Sure it's
a rags to riches team tale as the Kekambas start out as a motley collection
of kids and, over the weeks working with Conor and each other, become a
worthy adversary for the opposition. There are also things said about the
matriarchal nature of inner city life, where the father figure does not
come to play in the equation of raising a child. Unfortunately, this aspect
of the film is underplayed for the sake of the inspirational team story.
The screenplay tries to cover too much ground in its moderate run time.
Besides the main yarn about the boys, there is also the fall and rise of
gambler Conor, a budding romance between him and the kids' dedicate school
teacher, Elizabeth Wilkes (Diane Lane), the aforementioned social
commentary, ghetto violence, personal tragedy, triumph and redemption. To
the makers' credit, the sentimentality does not get schmarmy, especially
after the film's dramatic, sudden climax. Things never really get beneath
the surface, either, as Robbins touches upon each social and personal
subject but not giving time to explore each or, even, some fully.
Keanu Reeves as a low life gambling, and possibly booze, addict who has hit
rock bottom doesn't quite cut it. He lacks the edge that someone out of
control and desperate at their plight would have, but is likable as Conor,
anyway. Diane Lane is under-utilized as the dedicated teacher and potential
love interest, with both parts given short shrift in the story. John Hawkes
is credible as O'Neill's sidekick Ticky Tobin. Mike McGlone made an affable
debut in Edward Burn's "The Brothers McMullen" but is given virtually
nothing to do here. D.B. Sweeney is the obligatory tight ass manager of the
other top team, the Bua Was. Home run hitter Sammy Sosa makes an appearance
as himself
"Hardball" isn't all it could be but its heart is definitely in the right
place. There is a good, inspirational sports movie buried in here that
provides good role models and a degree of thoughtfulness for kids. Be aware
that there is graphic language and gang violence. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Brother (2000)
Yakuza tough guy Yamamoto (Beat Takeshi) is forced to leave Tokyo and heads
to  LA  to find his younger half-brother Ken (Claude Maki.) Soon, the older
gangster realizes he is thrust back into the old violence he left behind in
Japan  and,  before  long,  he commands a sizable gang of his own. When his
Yakuza  brethren refuse to bow down to Mafia pressures, it's all-out war in
director/writer Takeshi Kitano's "Brother."
Steeped in the long tradition of the Yakuza - a gangster society that is an
integral  part  of  the  overall  Japanese  culture - "Brother" begins with
Yamamoto  (Beat Takeshi, the director's on-screen moniker) arriving, alone,
in  Los  Angeles. He's looking for his relocated half-brother and, finally,
finds  out  where  he  lives.  Flash  back  to  Tokyo and we see the end of
Yamamoto's  Yakuza  clan as a rival gang absorbs it. The deal requires that
Yamamoto be eliminated to save the clan, but, the crime boss is secreted to
the US.
Once  in  the  good  old USA, Yamamoto picks up where he left off in Japan,
taking charge of Ken's homeboys. He joins forces with a rival Japanese gang
led  by  Shirase (Masaya Kato) and they being to take on the Chicano street
gangs,  eliminate  them, then move into their territory. Soon, the usurpers
come  to  the  attention  of the local Mafia and war breaks out between the
enemy factions on the streets of LA.
There  is  one thing you can say about Takeshi Kitano's films. They are the
vision  of  the filmmaker and, whether light comedy or gangland drama, have
his  firm  imprint  on every one. His use of over-bearing, schmarmy, cheesy
60's   orchestral   movie  music,  often  utilized  inappropriately,  is  a
trademark.  He frequently has the actors look directly into the camera, not
at  the  audience  but  at  the  actors  they  are  playing off of. He also
maintains  the  image  of  the  strong,  silent  type (or, as in the comedy
"Kikujiro",  the  weak,  silent type) who uses violence instead of words to
make his point.
Kitano's  films  are  interesting  -  maybe  not  always  good,  but always
interesting.  In  "Brother,"  there  are  a number of bits that don't quite
work.  Kitano  uses  frequent  non  sequitur  scenes  of  gangsters playing
basketball  or  throwing  a football that have nothing to do with the story
and  actually  take  attention  from the gangland drama. He also, at times,
injects  humor  into violent scenes, taking the edge off of such sequences.
I'll also mention the saccharine score, again, as an annoyance.
On  the  plus  side,  Kitano  gives  full  shrift  to  examining the Yakuza
sub-culture  with its codes of chivalry, obligation, loyalty, obedience and
brotherhood. Members of a Yakuza clan maintain a fanatical loyalty to their
anikis  (brothers)  within the gang with a willingness to put one's life on
the  line.  This loyalty, obedience and obligation are depicted vividly and
violently  throughout  the  story  and  lend  the  viewer  a look into this
culture, little known to American audiences.
Emotion,  or lack thereof, takes the lead over the acting in "Brother." The
Japanese characters, led by Yamamoto, are symbolic in the dedication to the
Yakuza  clan.  The  gang  leader's  right hand man, Kato (Susumu Terajima),
shows his complete commitment to Yamamoto as he declares to "stake my life"
on  protecting  his  boss  and brother. For Kato, the stakes are high. Omar
Epps,  as  one  of Ken's homies, Denny, has a violent initial confrontation
with  Yamamoto,  but  overcomes  his  suspicion and dislike for the man and
embraces  the  Yakuza  philosophy and loyalty to his boss.  The rest of the
cast,  with  some  exceptions,  is there to be the fodder that the gang war
uses up in copious quantities.
During  a  summer  season  that  suffers  from  a dearth of good mainstream
flicks,  the  independent  film  market  is  called  upon  to  provide  the
intelligence  in this season's film-going experience. Considering the utter
mediocrity  of  blockbuster  fare,  the  discerning  movie  maven  has some
alternatives.  There  hasn't  been,  over  the  years, a plethora of Yakuza
gangster  flicks  - Sidney Pollack's "The Yakuza" (1975) and Ridley Scott's
"Black  Rain" (1989) are two - and none from Japanese makers in our market,
with  the  exception  of  "Brother" and some vintage Akira Kurosawa flicks.
Kitano's  is a flawed work, but a breath of fresh air despite the problems.
I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
High school football rules in Virginia. But, in 1971, this
institution, this way of life, was put to the test when the local
school board was forced to integrate the high schools of Alexandria,
Virginia. To further fuel the fires, Herman Boone (Denzel Washington),
a black coach from South Carolina is brought in to replace local
legend and state Hall of Fame nominee, Coach Bill Yoast (Will Patton),
as the head coach of the T.C. Williams High School football team, the
Titans. Boone's task is formidable as he takes absolute control of his
players, during volatile times, molding them into a team where respect
is more important than race in "Remember the Titans."
Producer Jerry Bruckheimer seems to have his producer credit on most
of the films coming out of Hollywood this year. "Gone in 60 Seconds"
and "The Replacements" come immediately to mind and, now, "Remember
the Titans." While "Gone in 60 Seconds" was a lot of smoke and flash
and "The Replacements" was good-hearted fun, Bruckheimer's latest is
hit-you-over-the-head inspirational tale.  Based on a true story,
"Titans" tells us about two men - Herman Boone and Bill Yoast - who
are both at an important crossroad in their lives. Boone is being set
up by the town fathers to fail as the school's head coach, while Yoast
is forced to choose between his loyalty to his team or to himself.
Coach Boone, who took the assistant coaching position when he came to
T.C.  Williams, is suddenly thrust into the number one spot to the
detriment of the man he thought he would be working for - Coach
Yoast. Herman doesn't know it, at first, but the town elders are
setting him up, along with the government-imposed school integration,
to fail. If the daunting task of integrating his team isn't difficult
enough, it is compounded, many fold, by the racial turmoil that
enfolds the city and the country. Boone's reaction is to take on the
task as absolute dictator of the Titans. He does not brook racial hate
and conflict in the ranks of the team and demands, even if the boys do
not like each other, they will respect each other unconditionally. The
message of respect, integrity and team play is repeated many times
through the film.
Bill Yoast is a man of honest integrity who stays on board the Titans'
staff as defensive coach out of loyalty to the team and, especially,
Gerry Bertier (Ryan Hurst). Gerry is an All-American player who has a
shining career ahead of him, a career that Coach Yoast has nurtured
him toward. While Gerry is totally opposed to the integration of the
team and the school, even challenging head coach Boone, the influence
of Bill Yoast is apparent and helps the young player to take the right
path in his life-affecting decisions. Patton brings out the gentle
understanding and strength that a man like Bill Yoast would need to
have in such an emotionally fraught social climate.
The story doesn't stop with the two lead characters. There is a
significant ensemble cast that fleshes out the team and allows the
message of the movie - integration and respect is good, racism and
hate is bad - to be played in a variety of ways. Principally, the
initial rivalry, then friendship, that develops between the leaders of
the blacks and whites on the team - Julius Campbell (Wood Harris) and
Gerry - is the catalyst that makes the team the role model for the
rest of the school and the city of Alexandria. The boys, especially
Gerry, see the wrong in segregation and begin the long, painful task
of changing the way people think. Again, more inspirational messages
on good versus bad.
The integration process begins, for the team, when one kid, Lewis
Lastik (Ethan Suplee), a poor white kid who doesn't give a hoot about
race or prejudice, volunteers for the team. He just wants to tackle
people and have some fun and acts as the first bridge between the
black and white players. To make sure we, the audience, understand the
film's simple, straightforward message, a friendship is also formed
between the two coaches daughters. Sheryl Yoast (Hayden Panettiere) is
a tomboy who loves football and knows more about the game and her
beloved Titans than most of the adults around her. Nicky Boone
(Krystin Leigh Jones), a prim and proper young lady, is as different
from Sheryl as oil is to water. Despite their differences - personal,
not racial - they become fast friends and are yet another example of
the goodness of racial harmony and acceptance of people's differences.
Acting is uniformly solid throughout. Washington is good, as usual,
but Will Patton is better in his powerful, yet subtle, portrayal of
the humane and intelligent Bill Yoast. While Yoast does not stray far
from his path of personal integrity, there is nuance and conflict in
the performance that makes Patton's perf a fine character study of an
interesting, complex man.  
The kids masking up the team are a good collection of newcomers who
are given a chance to create real people out of their
characters. Hurst, as Gerry, get the most of the limelight in his role
as a true leader, a young man who, with Yoast and Boone's influence,
is destined to be great, no matter what life dishes out to him. Wood
Harris as Julius, rival then best friend to Gerry, isn't given the
floor as much as Hurst but still does a good job in showing that the
man he was afraid of is, in fact, his brother. Kip Pardue as
Californian transplant nicknamed Sunshine, Donald Faison as the lost
then found Petey, and comic relief Suplee help give the background
characters some personality.
Production is consistent with the acting quality, with attention paid
to the circa-1971 period details - although I question that the use of
mouth guards had come in to being for high school players at that
time. I may be wrong.  Most of the action is on the field, in the
locker room or at the school, so town locales are less significant but
still well displayed. The tunes use during the film are a collection,
almost a mishmash, of the music of that time. Prominent are the
overused "Ain't No Mountain High Enough" (also covered by the team, of
course), "I Heard It Through The Grapevine," "Spirit In The Sky"
(another well-worn piece), Eric Burdon & WAR's "Spill The Wine,"
"House of the Rising Sun" and The Temptations' "Superstar," among
others. "Na Na Hey Hey Kiss Him Goodbye" is used as a gospel ballad,
replacing "Amazing Grace" (which is also sung by the team members) as
the inspirational funeral tune.
If "Remember the Titans" weren't so relentless in hammering its
messages home - I began to physically react every time the story
tackles you with the good is good and bad is bad theme - it may have
been a better film. The bold statement of "based on a true story" at
the beginning precludes the taking of major liberties by the
filmmakers. As such, it is relegated to being a well made, well
intentioned inspirational "message movie" that not only wears its
heart on its sleeve, it beats you to death with it. I got the point in
the first few minutes.
Note Will Patton's performance at year's end. I give "Remember the
Titans" a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sound and Fury (2000)
Heather Artinian is a precocious little six-year old who has decided that
she wants to change her world from one of being deaf to hearing. The reason
for her decision is a controversial medical device, the cochlear implant,
which would help Heather to hear. With Heather's desire as a springboard,
the fine documentary, "Sound and Fury," explores the struggle for identity
of a deaf family in the hearing world. It also attacks the controversial
issue of turning our children into robots dependent on the kindness of
those who can hear, forsaking their soundless roots.
When one first hears of the subject matter of "Sound and Fury," a cure for
deafness in children through surgery and implant, it sounds like a
no-brainer. Of course, if a child is born deaf, the best thing, the right
thing, to do is to correct that deficiency. The cochlear implant is
installed inside the child's skull and is attached to an external connector
that, in turn, connects to a Walkman-like device that the child must carry
in order to hear. When implanted at a very young age, the device
successfully allows the child to hear and, thus, speak. The problem is, as
a child gets older in the deaf world, they become assimilated into it,
making the value of the implant to decrease, proportionately, with age.
Heather's two brothers and her parents, Peter and Nita, are all deaf. Peter
is a near-militant leader of the anti-implant deaf community on Long Island
and is stunned by his daughter's desire to enter the hearing world. Nita is
initially encouraging, but, when she finds out that implant would not work
for her - an adult mind would find it nearly impossible to assimilate the
cacophony of sounds that would invade their silent world - she joins Peter
in his adamancy against the process. They also fear that their silent
world, which revolves around American Sign Language, will grow increasingly
isolated as their children are given the chance to leave the realm of the
deaf.
So you say to yourself, "Wow, they're right to want to preserve a culture
of necessity and keep their children close." Then, docu filmmaker Josh
Aronson and his team shift gears. Peter's sister, Mary, and her husband are
blessed with the birth of twins, but one of the babies is deaf. The hearing
couple learn of the success of the cochlear implant and immediately see the
device as a savior for their child. The whole controversy over the implant
is focused on the Artinians and their nuclear family, both deaf and
hearing.
Peter's adamant anti-implant stance is argued just as strongly against by
his mother, who had to learn to adapt to the life of a deaf child and had
first hand experience of the pain and the prejudice a deaf person must face
in the hearing world. Peter wishes to preserve a world where he can freely
communicate with his family. He also sees that the independent and adaptive
world of the deaf is going to close in upon him and him and his family.
Peter is, I think, justly afraid of being left alone, deaf, in a hearing
world.
I find it amazing that a subject that, on the surface, is so cut-and-dried,
turns out to be one of the most intelligent and thought-provoking
documentaries I have ever seen. It presents both sides of the controversy
in a fair, even-handed manner that gives ample food for thought. Each
side's case is well represented in this familial microcosm of a process
that can, indeed, change the world of the deaf. Unfortunately, the implant
will leave those untreatable in a constantly contracting world that will
garner less and less understanding or sympathy from the hearing world as
time goes forth. Peter argues, too, that the process is extremely invasive
and anything but minor, but this argument has to be discounted. As medical
technology progresses, other, less invasive, devices will be developed,
making Peter's a moot point. The real issue is the isolation and loss of a
culture that has lived and survived among us hearing folk for thousands of
years.
"Sound and Fury" does exactly what a documentary is supposed to do - open
your eyes to another world unfamiliar to you. It does that and makes you do
an awful lot of thinking, too. I give it an A-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Blow (2001)
In the '60's George Jung (Johnny Depp) was a small-time pot dealer with big
ambitions. When a fateful arrest for possession of 640 pounds of marijuana,
and being finked on by his own mother, puts him in Federal prison, he meets
Diego Delgado (Jordi Molla), the man who introduces George, and millions of
Americans, to the evils of cocaine in the true life story, "Blow."
"Blow" is a biopic with a difference. It not only follows the rise and fall
of George Jung, it also chronicles the events that led to the nationwide
epidemic of cocaine use and the rise of Pablo Escobar (Cliff Curtis) and
the Colombian cocaine cartel into a multi-billion dollar industry. George
may simply have been in the right place at the right time, but he did, for
a period of years, control 85% of the cocaine flow into this country.
Helmer Ted Demme, using a script by Nick Cassavetes and David McKenna of
Bruce Porter's true life saga about George Jung, bites off a rather large
chunk in a biography that spans five decades and introduces, literally,
dozens of characters as the episodes of the drug trafficker's life are
unfolded before us. It starts off low key with Weymouth MA-born Jung
leaving the home of his loving father (Ray Liotta) and troubled mother
(Rachel Griffiths) and relocating to California's Manhattan Beach in the
60's. To make some easy money, he starts to peddle pot to kids on the beach
and soon becomes known as Boston George. An old friend from the east (Max
Perlich) tips him that there is a lot of money to be made selling pot to
students in Boston. This begins a different spin on the American Dream of
profit and greed, as pot selling becomes pot smuggling, which opened the
door for the invasion of cocaine, a plague on America that lasted through
the 70's and 80's.
"Blow" is an ambitious effort that tells one man's story, episode by
episode, as George, several times, rises and falls, eventually losing
everything, including his beloved daughter
Kristina Sunshine. The inception of the cocaine biz in the US is shown in
high-octane spurts depicting the nuts and bolts of the dog-eat-dog drug
business. The human side of the flick is played through George's love for
his daughter, the product of a very bad marriage with Mirtha (Penelope
Cruz), a beautiful, coke tooting, bitch of a woman who uses Kristina as a
weapon against George.
Johnny Depp is given the daunting task of making a real person out of
George Jung. The talented actor is able to credibly span the 30+ years of
George's adult life, as Depp plays Jung as a likable salesman who is not
beyond taking a chance when there is a bunch of money to be made. George's
face shows the signs of age and wear and tear as the arc of his life
eventually lands him in prison forever. Depp gives sensitivity and
dimension to the character that sustains the bio portion of the film. This
is good as the rest of the large cast, due to the episodic nature of the
story, come and go in pretty short order.
Of the ensemble, a few are notable in their small but important roles. Paul
Reubens as George's partner and eventual betrayer, hairdresser Derek
Foreal, gives his role the appropriate flair it needs. Spanish star Jordi
Molla, as Diego, lasts quite a few years in George's life and develops his
character well. Rachel Griffiths and Ray Liotta give depth to their roles
as George's mom and dad. Franka Potente ("Run Lola Run") is only around for
a short time as George's girlfriend, Barbara, but the actress gives a nice
perf in the small role. Cliff Curtis is deadly as the ruthless Escobar.
Cruz gets to be a meanie and pulls it off as the selfish, drug abusing
Mirtha.
Production-wise, "Blow" does a solid job of giving each era of the story
its own period look and feel. Photography, by Ellen Kuras, is
straightforward without being overly stylish. Costuming, by Mark Bridges,
suits each period while giving George a particular, continuing style that
spans the years. The rest of the behind the camera techs are first-rate.
"Blow" is an ambitious effort that tries hard to keep its episodes flowing
from one to the next and succeeds most of the time. Johnny Depp, who also
voices the narration in a convincing Boston accent, is the one thread that
that is drawn through the whole tapestry and is good, but not great. The
movie works well enough on its two levels, though, and I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Visit, The (2000/I)
Alex Walter (Hill Harper) is serving 25 years for a rape he says he didn't
commit. His once close knit family has abandoned him, except for the
occasional visits by his brother, Tony (Obba Babatunde). Now, five years
into Alex's sentence, Tony journeys to the prison once again, but this time
it's different. Alex has AIDS. With the help of prison psychiatrist Dr.
Coles (Phylicia Rashad), Alex learns to cope with his disease and confront
the rift he caused for his family in "The Visit."
Newcomer Jordan Walker-Pearlman's ambitious debut as
director/writer/producer is based on the play of the same name by Kosmond
Russell. The story begins with a long overdue visit by Tony to his younger
brother. It has been ten months since their last reunion and, it turns out,
Alex's parents have never been to the prison to see him. The younger man
breaks the news to Tony that he is dying and wants to see his family, maybe
regaining some of their past closeness.
When Lois and Henry Walters (Marla Gibbs and Billy Dee Williams) finally
make the two-hour journey to the prison, mom could not be more ecstatic
about seeing her little boy after so many years. But, dad can't let the
past just sit and stew, so he begins to deride Alex for his mistakes. All
the while, Alex denies his guilt. The confrontation abruptly ends the visit
and Lois must leave with not enough time with younger son. But, a seed is
planted and there is the hope of more time together.
Soon after, Alex receives another visitor, Felicia McDonald (Rae Dawn
Chong), a childhood friend who has had her own series of hard knocks
through life. Felicia suffered the incestuous advances of an abusive
father, bore his child, and became a crack cocaine addict and a petty
criminal. She killed her father to protect her son. Now, she's on the mend,
is off of drugs and is caring for her son and his cerebral palsy - a
product of her father's rape. Her visit to Alex is a recuperative one as
she rekindles their old friendship, giving Alex some solace in his despair.
The episodic visits continue with mom and dad, Tony, Felicia and her son
coming back to see Alex. A new life, of sorts, emerges as Alex loses
himself in a fantasy world of soft lights and the gentle touches of loved
ones. It's a nice melding of the sweet fantasy with the brutal reality of
prison life. The despair is well tempered by the positive developments
spawned by the visits and some fabulous acting.
The ensemble cast focuses on Alex as he undergoes an odd sort of redemption
in the life he finds, again, with his family and Felicia.  Alex is
spiritually rescued as he draws his family back to him. The real treat is
Rae Dawn Chong as Felicia. She comes on screen as a nice, well-adjusted
woman visiting an old friend. As she unfolds her past to Alex, we find out
what a harsh life she has had, making her present state of well being all
the more remarkable. It's a stunning performance that reps one of the best
supporting roles this year. Marla Gibbs actually glows in the warm light of
her love for her sons. Billy Dee Williams is suitable gruff as the
disappointed dad whose love for his family helps him get past his shame of
Alex. Obba Babatunde serves well as the bridge between Alex and his family.
Fledgling filmmaker Walker-Pearlman makes a striking first entry into
feature films. There is a great deal brewing in the mind of the writer that
makes a statement on the psychological impact of incarceration on the
inmate and his family. Innocent or guilty, the fact that he is in prison is
a stigma that Alex, his family and, especially, his father must overcome.
The helmer's visual style is raw with overused close-ups and shaky hand
held camerawork, but there is talent there, too. I give "The Visit" a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
What if life on Earth did NOT come out of the primordial ooze hundreds of 
millions of years ago? What if the building blocks of life came from deep 
outer space instead? And, what if the first struggling cells needed only 
days to evolve into full-blown monsters? This is the premise for Ivan 
Reitman's latest goofball comedy starring David Duchovny, Orlando Jones and 
two-time Oscar nominee Julianne Moore in "Evolution." 
Just watching the first promotional bits, over the past couple of months, 
for "Evolution," I was taken by the obvious parallels to Reitman's 1984 
smash hit, "Ghostbusters." What saved that mostly silly movie was a 
performance by Bill Murray that capitalized on the actor's comedic talent 
and sarcastic wit. Unfortunately, "Evolution" does not have Bill Murray, 
nor anyone approaching his one-man-show talent, to bear the burden of a 
mediocre comedy that has its requisite special F/X, but little humor in its 
routine sci-fi tale. 
A mysterious object crashes into the Earth. A team of scientists 
investigates. The object not only turns out to carry living organisms, 
they're hostile to humans and growing in number - fast. It's up to the 
intrepid team of boffins to stop the alien invasion before the Earth is 
lost. This formula has worked well for decades, since "The Thing" (1951) 
and "War of the Worlds" (1954), and screenwriters David Diamond, David 
Weissman and Don Jakoby, dust it off one more time for "Evolution." This 
time, though, the alien invasion is played for laughs. Well, some laughs, 
anyway. 
The problem with "Evolution" stems from trying to force the comedy into the 
original sci-fi drama developed by Don Jakoby. Unlike "Ghostbusters," which 
came from years of comic ghost stories like "The Ghost Breakers" (1940) and 
"Ghost Catchers" (1944), "Evolution" spawned from more serious fare. This 
is a problem as the film tries to force humor into scenes that borrow from 
flicks like "Alien" and "Tremors." The cast does its best to inject comedy 
into the scenes, but it is hard work and forced. 
David Duchovny and Orlando Jones do yeomen's work as a pair of junior 
college professors who see the discovery of the alien object - a meteor 
that seeps slime - as their ticket to the big times. When Ira Kane 
(Duchovny) and Harry Block (Jones) take the sample of ooze back to their 
lab, Ira discovers it contains single-celled organisms from outer space! 
Even more exciting is the fact that they reproduce at a fantastic rate! 
When they take some students on a field trip to the site - an underground 
cavern the rock crashed into - they discover that, in few hours, the 
single-celled creatures had evolved into mushrooms and mitosis-reproducing 
flatworms. Visions of Nobel prizes dance in the scientist's heads. That is, 
until the military, led by Ira's old boss, General Woodman (Ted Levine), 
takes over the operation. Little do they all know that the alien invader is 
developing at a rate where millions of years of evolution takes only hours. 
The flatworms eventually become dinosaur-like creatures and, soon, the 
first primates evolve. As the flora and fauna from another world adapt to 
Earth's atmosphere it becomes apparent that, at their rate of evolution, 
they will completely take over the world in a matter of months. Of course, 
the military blunders big when the general decides to burn the creatures to 
hell - the exact wrong thing to do. It's up to Ira and Harry, with a little 
help from CDC investigator Allison Reed (Julianne Moore) and firefighter 
wannabee Wayne (Seann William Scott), to stop the spread of alien varmints 
and save the world - with Head & Shoulders shampoo, no less. 
As I think about it, this really is a serious sci-fi story (except for the 
shampoo bit). It doesn't lend itself to comedy, which is why, I guess, 
there are so few laughs. Most of the humor is geared to the slapstick, with 
lots of set scenes of human confronting alien - much like "Ghostbusters." 
Duchovny plays it all tongue-in-cheek, with the required poke at his "The 
X-Files" past. Orlando Jones gets some mileage out of his oppressed (but 
not, really) black man. Julianne Moore - what was she thinking when she 
took this role - does numerous pratfalls and klutzy stuff, most of which is 
not funny and almost embarrassing for the twice-nominated Oscar contender. 
Seann William Scott ("Road Trip," "Dude, Where's My Car?") is locked into 
playing the doofus, yet again, adding nothing to the proceeds. Ted Levine 
plays the inept, overbearing general in a cookie cutter perf. 
F/X are adequate but not outstanding. The film seemed murky and audio was 
poor at times, but this may have been the product of the theater projector 
and not the film. 
"Evolution," I'm afraid, is the kind of comedy flick that exemplifies our 
summer movie entertainment. It's a popcorn flick that uses toilet humor, 
anus jokes and lots of slime 
that will entertain the younger audiences. It leaves me craving more 
intelligent fare - like "Shrek." I give it a C. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Lumumba (2000)
On June 30, 1960, a self-taught, idealistic, yet pragmatic, young man
became, at age 36, the first head of government of a newly independent
African state, formerly the Belgian Congo. Two months later, he was ousted
from his powerful position and hunted by government troops until he was
captured and brutally murdered along with two aides. This little-known
story of this meteoric rise and fall is told my international filmmaker
Raoul Peck in "Lumumba."
Patrice Lumumba's (Eriq Ebouaney) story has been told previously by helmer
Peck in his 1991 award winning documentary, "Lumumba -   Death of a
Prophet," virtually guaranteeing that his new, fictional account of a
patriot remains true to its subject. Peck, with co-writer Pascal Bonitzer,
begins at the end of the story of the young political leader. We watch as
two white men perform the gruesome task of dismembering the bodies of three
black men. Images of hatchets, saws and fast-emptying whiskey bottles
accompany the grisly image.
Jump back a few years to a meeting among the black leaders in the
Belgian-owned Congo. A third class postal worker, Lumumba, speaks his mind
to heads of the most powerful tribes, proclaiming himself not tribal, not
regional, but a national leader. His small, mobile party, the Congolese
National Movement (MNC) is gaining prominence and Patrice leaves his
clerical job to sell beer, and get his face known, in the bustling capital,
Stanleyville. At a time when the colonial empires are falling down around
the world, Lumumba is in the right place at the right time and, through
political savvy and chess-like manipulation, achieves a position of
leadership of the MNC. As the date for independence approaches, he
tactically positions himself to be the new nation's first prime minister
and defense minister, supporting the presidency of Joseph Kasa Vubu (Maka
Kotto).
The coalition he created soon starts to fall apart as the former Belgian
masters continue to exert influence on the struggling nation as they strive
to maintain economic hold on the country's vast natural resources of
copper, diamonds, gold and more. Lumumba won't seek the help of the US,
knowing that they would try to create de facto American control of the
fledgling government. His initial investigation into Soviet assistance
immediately tags Patrice as a communist and his integrity is overshadowed
by the Cold War threat of Russian domination. The situation goes from bad
to worse as the army mutinies, the remaining whites begin to evacuate or
arm themselves, Belgian troops violently intervene, the lucrative Katanga
province succeeds under the leadership of rival Moise Tschombe (Pascal
Nzonzi) and Lumumba is refused access to his own country when he returns
from a conference abroad.
This tumultuous and little known period of modern African history saw a
score of nations struggling for independence from the sometimes-odious
colonialists who have ruled much of the world from their European seats of
power for centuries. Peck focuses his story on familiar material that
strives to give an honest portrayal of Patrice Lumumba, his friend and foes
and the independence movements that gripped Africa in the 50's and 60's.
(During the time the story takes place, many new nations, including Nigeria
and Somalia, were born, with varying degrees of success and failure,
usually dependent upon which country colonized them. Some colonial masters
were better than others.)
The effort involved in "Lumumba" is quite ambitious as Peck and his crew
before and behind the camera strive to bring to life this slice of world
history that might have gone unexplored for decades, if at all. Production
values are first rate on what must be a small, by US standards, budget. The
period feel and realistic African settings are nicely maintained in a
production that traveled from Zimbabwe to Mozambique.
The screenplay covers a lot of ground and does yeoman's work in providing a
great deal of detailed history while trying to do justice to the story of
Lumumba's life. The political side of things is evenly told in a linear,
straightforward manner that teaches, not preaches. It concentrates on the
good deeds of the man, if a bit as a stalwart saint, but doesn't embellish
on a larger than life persona. The family side of Patrice's life is handled
in several, perfunctory and brief interludes that show him talking to one
of his children, embracing his wife or lamenting the death of his child. I
know the intent is to flesh the man out, but too short a shrift is given to
the family man side of Lumumba. The story, as such, has a lopsided feel
about it.
High marks go to Eriq Ebouaney as the title character. The actor gives a
convincing, charismatic performance as the multifaceted, politically deft
Patrice Lumumba who has the good of his people and his country as the force
driving his own ambitions. In true docudrama tradition, the supporting cast
does not outshine the star, complementing his good efforts, instead.
"Lumumba" is a solid, interesting, educational and honest docudrama that
should appeal to film buffs and politicos, both. It has more intelligence
in its telling than anything I've seen out of Hollywood for months and I
give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
The Toro cheerleading squad from Rancho Carne High School is at the top of the
game. The six-time national champions have a new captain, Torrance Shipman
(Kirsten Dunst), and it looks like they are on their way to a seventh. Until,
that is, Torrance learns that the Toro's kick-ass routine is stolen from another
cheerleading squad, the Clovers, leading to a moral dilemma for the new team
leader in "Bring It On."
The world of cheerleading at the national competitive level has never, as far as
I know, been the subject of a feature film. The picture that comes to my mind
when I hear the word "cheerleader" harkens back to my days in high school (many
moons ago) when the 'leaders were pretty, stuck up chicks who had their
exclusive clique and ignored everyone who didn't belong. (OK, so I was a shy kid
who didn't too well with girls back then.) Tyro helmer Peyton Reed and
first-time screenwriter Jessica Bendinger shatter that image with a neatly done
moral teenage tale about competition, honor and integrity. Winning isn't
everything in "Bring It On," but honesty and fair play are.
The story, extensively researched by Bendinger, has a notable lack of parental
involvement in the cheerleading lives of the principles. This is actually a
strength breathe of fresh air for the film, with Torrance and rival team captain
Isis (Gabrielle Union) acting out of dedication and love for their sport, not
out of some pressure by mom or dad. I call cheerlead competition a sport
because, at the regional and national level, you are looking at kids who have
trained as hard as any other athlete and are the best in combining gymnastic
skill and dance choreography. I knew nothing about the whole cheerleading thing
going in to "Bring It On." Afterward, I did a little research and talked with
parents of cheerleaders. I was assured that the movie, as I described it, has
the ring of authenticity.
The moral nature of the script builds very strong characters in Torrance, Isis,
and the others. Kirsten Dunst does a fine job as the newly elected captain who
learns from transfer student Missy (Eliza Dushku) that Torrance's champion
cheerleading squad has been gaining kudos by using stolen material. It turns out
that the Toro's former captain Big Red (Lindsay Sloane) had surreptitiously
videotaped a rival team, the Clovers from Compton High, and homogenized the hip
hop routine for the more white bread Rancho Carne High School squad. Not
believing that her team's success is based on theft, Torrance agrees to go see
the Clovers with Missy.
Torrance is stunned by the blatant rip-off of the other team's excellent
performance. The Clovers are every bit as good as the Toros, but their economic
circumstances in their blue-collar neighborhood has kept them from competing at
the regional and national level. When Isis confronts Torrance and accuses her of
being another spy for the Toros, the right-minded Torrance insists that her team
completely redo their routine with only six weeks to the nationals, causing a
rift in team spirit. Meanwhile, she coaxes her father (the only time parents
show up to any degree and they just to fork out money) to collect the funds
needed to bring the Clovers to the nationals, too. (In an inexplicable move,
Isis tears up the from-the-heart check and the Clovers get to the big show by
other means. I thought that the heartfelt and meaningful gesture by Torrance was
unnecessarily snubbed.)
The Toros go through the painful exploration of reinventing their performance,
going to the expensive pains of hiring a choreographer, Sparky Polastri (Ian
Roberts), who turns out to be a con artist selling the same cheer routine up and
down the California coast. Of course, just when she is at the end of her rope,
Torrance is inspired by Missy's brother Cliff (Jesse Bradford), the romantic
interest the pretty team captain keeps denying exists, and a new cheer routine
is born. Once all these ends are tied together, the big finale at the nationals
kicks into gear. I won't discuss the outcome, but it is one heck of a bang for
the little movie.
The kids surrounding the principal characters get a chance to flesh out their
own characters, if only a little bit. Eliza Dushku ("True Lies") plays the part
of Torrance's conscience as she points out the fraud of their routine. She
sticks by Torrance when she knows her new friend will do what is right. Jesse
Bradford ("King of the Hill") is good looking and has the presence to provide
the almost unnecessary, but obligatory, romantic interest. Members of the music
group Blaque - Natina Reed, Shamari Fears and Brandi Wiiliams - are very cool
and talented as the key members of the Clovers, giving attitude to the Toros and
rightfully so. Clare Kramer and Nicole Bilderback, as Courtney and Whitney, are
the dim-bulb stereotype Rancho Carne High squad members, but their pride in
being dumb but pretty and popular has a certain charm.
There are a number of teams and routines shown during the competition sequences
and they are uniformly exciting with energy and fine choreography. The
filmmakers and the kids on the screen make what is very hard look easy and
graceful. Cheers to dance master Nancy Rae Stone and cheerleading choreographer
Ray Jasper for their fine contribution to a good teen flick.
As you'd expect, it all comes down to the best team winning, but "Bring It On"
stresses that it is the healthy competition and desire to do one's best for self
and team that count. And don't go thinking that the sport of cheerleading is all
girls. The press material states that "97% of all cheerleaders are female,
however, 50% of all collegiate cheerleaders are male." When a youngster gets to
that level - the best of the high schoolers are shown here - the athletic
abilities and physical strength of a guy is an absolute necessity in pulling of
the remarkable tosses and flips they do. This is a good date flick for older
teens and a good roll model movie for younger girls.
"Bring It On" doesn't preach political correctness, just a good moral tale of
right versus wrong and why doing the right thing is necessary. If kids are
raised believing these simple, but important, concepts then the world will
indeed be a better place. It's nice to see a well-crafted, thoughtful film that
shows what kids are like at their best. I give it a B.

Title
Review for American Outlaws (2001)
The Civil War has ended and the rebel troops have put down their guns and
are heading home to the hoped for peace of their farms and former lives.
But, in the town of Liberty, Missouri, Jesse James and his friends find
that the head of the Rock Island Railroad, Thaddeus Rains (Harris Yulin),
is buying up all the farms dirt cheap and it's up to the James-Younger Gang
to put a stop to the robber baron's nefarious plans in "American Outlaws."
The outlaw has often been a folk hero for the masses at the very least
since Robin Hood and his band of merry men roamed Sherwood Forest and
thwarted the evil plans of the Sheriff of Nottingham around the time of the
Crusades. In America's Old West, the name Jesse James was synonymous with
popular desperado and has been the subject of no fewer than 23 different
films since the 1921 silent flick, "Jesse James Under the Black Flag." Most
of these movie treatments of the life of the notorious outlaw depict him as
a Good Samaritan who robs from the evil rich, usually the railroads and
their banks, and gives to the needy poor. "American Outlaw" forgoes any
attempt to tell the true story of the James brothers and their gang, opting
instead to adapt the "legend" in this latest telling of American history.
The film starts out with an exciting battlefield sequence at the very end
of the American Civil War. A Confederate cavalry column is ambushed by
superior, more heavily armed Yankee forces, but the brave rebels, in the
persons of Jesse and Frank James (Colin Farrell and Gabriel Macht), Cole
and Bob Younger (Scott Caan and Will McCormack) and trusted comrade
Comanche Tom (Nathaniel Arcand) (and a few other Johnny Rebs) thwart the
Yanks and win the battle, finding out, too late, that the war officially
ended the day before. It is an exciting, noisy introduction to a bunch of
good-looking, likable guys and sets the tone for the rest of the film.
As the war-weary soldiers head to the supposed safety and security of the
Missouri homestead, they find that a blue-coat regiment has garrisoned
their town and is trying to force the local folks to sell their farms to
the railroad at far less than true value. One of the locals, who resisted
the blatant attempt to take his land, is hanged as rebel and left in the
town square as a reminder to Liberty that resistance to the will of
railroad baron Rains is futile. Legions of Pinkerton detectives, led by
Allan Pinkerton (Timothy Dalton), are brought in to reinforce the point.
Incensed by the murder of their friend, Jesse and the boys, supplemented by
the Younger's little brother Jim (Gregory Smith), Clell Miller (Ty O'Neal)
and Loni Packwood (Joe Stevens), decide that the railroad must be stopped.
When Pinkerton's goons start burning down the homes of the obstinate
farmers, they make the fatal mistake of blowing up the James homestead,
killing Ma James (Kathy Baker) in the process. This is a major blunder by
Mr. Rains and the James-Younger Gang declares war on the railroad, robbing
his banks and disrupting his supply lines. Rains presses the reluctant
Allan Pinkerton to bring his forces to bear on the outlaws in the David
versus Goliath battle.
"American Outlaws" tag line, "bad is good again," should tell you something
about the nature of the story. In this sanitized, politically correct
telling of the James Gang legend all the outlaws are noble, kind and good.
They are ruthless in dealing with Rains's henchmen, but careful not to
involve innocents in their frequent gun battles with Pinkerton's private
army, even in the middle of a bustling town. Scenes of the gallant young
men giving large sums of stolen loot to the church or scattering dollars to
the poor make you see that these are just good boys who are forced into a
life of crime to protect their farms, families and selves.
But, what it is really all about is romance, intrigue, shootouts, horse
chases, lots of things blowing up, revenge and justice. The clichéd,
sometimes goofy, not often serious dialogue is an unusual plus for the film
and helps string together the set action pieces, starting with the Civil
War opening. There are bank robbery sequences, a cacophonous ambush, a
grand train escape scene and more by way of action. There is also a stab at
romance between Jesse and his childhood sweetheart, Zee Mimms (Ali Larter),
in a move that holds homage to "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" with
Zee a strong, supportive friend and true love (and, she is hell with a
canon). Sure it's politically correct, but in a good, positive way. If the
outlaws weren't always killing people and breaking the law, I'd have this
nice bunch of guys and gal over for dinner.
The cast is uniformly personable with Irishman Colin Farrell first among
equals as the pivotal character Jesse James. He displays humor, charm and
wit and does a darn good job performing the tough stunts and horse riding.
Scot Caan is solid as Cole Younger, the only rival to the charismatic
Jesse. Gabriel Macht steals the screen as Frank James and puts a nice spin
on his perf as the gang's "mother" and quiet wise man, as well as being the
best shot. Will McCormack is endearing as Bob Younger, especially his hurt
reaction when he sees how bad his wanted poster picture looks. The rest of
the gang fits the bill and everyone worked and trained hard for their
rolls. Vet thesps Dalton, Bates, Yulin, Ronny Cox and Terry O'Quinn give
the air of maturity without spoiling the film's inherent youthful fun.
Production values are first rate with Russell Boyd's lensing providing a
crystal clear image with fluid camera work that captures the action
beautifully. Authentic-looking costume by Luke Reichle gives a hip, Old
West look to the handsome cast, with a lot of individuality given to each
player. Production designers Cary White and John Frick make the Wild West
come alive with their recreation of frontier towns. The screenplay by
Roderick Taylor and John Rogers is full of cliché but uses it to good
affect, although some of the dialogue made me slap my head.
"American Outlaws" is good-hearted and good-natured fun that isn't going to
bump anything off of the best western film list. It does entertain, it
looks good and there is solid acting that could be star making. Finally,
some good mainstream summer entertainment. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
The Coen brothers are back again, this time with Homer's "Odyssey" as the 
backdrop in their tale of three fugitives from a Mississippi chain gang who 
trek across the South to find a secret treasure in "O Brother, Where Art 
Thou?" 
Right for the beginning of "O Brother" the Coens grab your attention with a 
chain gang of prison inmates breaking rocks along the road in unison to a 
work song. The camera flows around the hard toiling men, giving a visually 
exciting symmetry to the scene that ends with our three heroes - Ulysses 
Everett McGill (George Clooney), Delmar (Tim Blake Nelson) and Pete (John 
Turturro) - escaping across a cotton field. It is the beginning of a 
journey that takes on different meanings and urgencies to each member of 
the trio. 
A strong suite, as always with the Coen brothers, is the depth of character 
of the folks they create in their films. Their characters are goofy and 
comical, like Nicolas Cage in "Raising Arizona"; or, dramatic, as Albert 
Finney and John Turturro in "Miller's Crossing"; and, even a mix of the two 
with Frances McDormand in "Fargo." In all cases, and in "O Brother," too, 
the characters populating their films are three-dimensional people. 
Ulysses Everett is a handsome, hair-obsessed petty criminal with a silver 
tongue and not a lot in the brains department. But, he seems like a genius 
when compared to the simple, sweet Delmar and the maladjusted Pete, who 
follow their self appointed leader to a promised treasure of $1.2 million. 
Their odyssey takes on the mystical proportions of Homer's original 
material as they meet all manner of people along the way, including those 
dangerous sirens who beckon them onto symbolically rocky shoals and a 
Cyclops who beats them and takes all their money. There is magic, too, when 
Delmar believes that Pete was turned into a horny toad by the sirens. 
The story meanders through the different vignettes of the boys' adventures, 
giving the flick a  choppy, episodic feel that disrupts the overall flow. 
Some of the interludes are an epiphany, though. The trio becomes a quartet 
when they pick up guitar-playing Tommy Johnson (Chris Thomas King) and 
visit a radio station in the middle of nowhere, run by its blind owner 
(Stephen Root). They become the Soggy Bottom Boys for the sightless Radio 
Station Man and, without their knowledge, are recorded as they sing the 
traditional tune, "I Am a Man of Constant Sorrow." It is a wonderful moment 
of moviemaking and gives us, in my mind, the best movie song of the year. 
Contrasting this and other wonderful moments (the sexy seduction by the 
sirens comes to mind) are some pretentious bits that detract from the 
overall quality of "O Brother." In particular, near the end, is a scene 
where Ulysses, Delmar and Pete crash a Ku Klux Klan rally to save Tommy 
from being lynched. The scene is overblown and flashy and reeks of "The 
Wizard of Oz." They don't say "lions and tigers and bears, oh my!" and 
there's no Dorothy, but it is the Land of Oz we're seeing here. 
The highs and lows of the story flow are tempered by fine acting on several 
levels. George Clooney is funny, charming, a little dumb and one of the 
handsomest actors in the business today. He has the charm of a 30's movie 
idol and is able to put himself into silly situations with dignity. Ulysses 
has an ongoing obsession with his hair, risking life and limb to get a 
particular brand of pomade and a supply of hairnets. His vanity will come 
to plague him as it would any mystical hero-wanderer. 
While Clooney is the name draw for "O Brother," the show stealer is Tim 
Blake Nelson as Delmar. The heretofore unknown Nelson is terrific as the 
simple convict who, at one point, hears the word of the Lord and joins 
members of a church congregation in their mass baptism. Delmar is saved and 
dedicates his life to doing good and provides a richness to his simple 
character that makes him shine. The taciturn Pete, as played by longtime 
Coen collaborator Turturro, is the sullen member of the trio and gives them 
the necessary angst. 
All together, the tuneful triumvirate is a mix of the Three Stooges and the 
Three Musketeers as they prove to be buffoons, albeit brave ones. 
The colorful supporting cast is rampant with Homerian characters to meet 
and get to know along the way of the boys' odyssey. Charles Durning appears 
as incumbent governor Pappy O'Daniel, who keeps crossing paths with them in 
his bid for re-election. John Goodman is wicked as the one-eyed bible 
salesman and con artist, Big Dan Teague. Michael Badalucco is manic and 
outrageous as outlaw and bank robber extraordinary, George "Babyface" 
Nelson. Stephen Root is amusing as the blind DJ, rep'ing one of the many 
references to the sightless that abound in the film in mystical ways. Holly 
Hunter is wasted in the small role as Ulysses' estranged wife, Penny (and 
the real reason for this adventure, not secret treasure). 
Techs are, as expected in a Coen brothers venture, first class. 
Cinematographer Roger Deakins, who has worked on five previous Coen films, 
captures the sultry atmosphere of the South. The photography complements 
the lush period production and costume provided by Dennis Gassner and Mary 
Zophres, respectively. Once again, Roderick Jaynes - the alter ego of Ethan 
and Joel Coen - is on board as editor. 
The high points outweigh the low through most of "O Brother, Where Art 
Thou?" with particular praise for the wonderful selection of period and 
traditional music. I give it a B. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Woman on Top (1999)
Isabella (Penelope Cruz) is a beautiful, talented chef living in contented bliss
with her husband, Toninho (Murilo Benicio), at their little restaurant in the
Brazilian port town of Bahia. But, while Isabella works in isolation in the
kitchen, Toninho sings and socializes with the patrons nightly. The pretty cook
can deal with her husband's flirtations as long as he can live with her
affliction: severe motion sickness. It's a condition so bad that she must be in
control of her movements at all times, or get very sick. She must drive when
they go out; she can't take the elevator; and, she must lead when they dance.
Even worse for the macho Toninho, Isabella must be on top when they make love.
This last fact drives the couple apart and Isabelle flees to San Francisco to
seek a place to practice her culinary skills in "Woman On Top."
Director Fina Torres ("Celestial Clockwork") uses the screenplay by newcomer
Vera Blasi to create a magical little love story that owes much more than a
passing nod to the 1992 food and fantasy film by Alfonso Arau, "Like Water For
Chocolate." In both films, the cuisine is a character unto itself that, in the
hands of the magical maestro, takes on a sensuality that will "fire the blood
and satisfy the heart." The Arau film is more involving in its combination of
complex and numerous characters and a wonderfully lyrical mysticism that makes
the film so magical.
Blasi's original story is more forced in it situational setup of plot devices as
the fantasy story unfolds. For example, how many people live in obscure little
Brazilian towns, but run off to San Francisco when the marriage breaks up? This
is a real stretch for the imagination and is just one of the problems with the
story. There is the best "girl" friend, Monica Jones (a marvelous performance by
Harold Perrineau, Jr.), who is supposed to be a childhood friend of Isabella's,
but seems to be there just to be the off-beat transvestite comic relief.
Isabella's success and popularity, especially among the guys in San Francisco,
is made believable only because of the charisma of Cruz.
The love story that is drawn through the film does have a certain amount of
charm as Toninho realizes his loss when Isabella leaves after catching him with
another woman (where he got to be on top). When the despondent restaurateur
learns where his true love has fled, he makes a beeline to the US to find her.
Isabella has had a spell cast to make her fall out of love with Toninho, but
that won't stop the passionate Brazilian as he risks anything, including arrest
and incarceration, to get Isabella back. Toninho is aided in his quest by a
three-piece band that  (magically, of course) accompany him in his continuous
serenades to the beautiful Isabella. The love story is sweet and the music,
especially Toninho's love songs, helps set the romantic mood.
The acting will not bring any attention at the end of the year. Cruz is lovely
to look at and has a real presence on the screen, but the actress is more eye
candy than character. Don't get me wrong, Isabella is a beautiful object of
affection. And, she can cook! Murilo Benicio is a handsome, personable young
actor and does a fine job as the tortured Toninho. When he realizes just what he
lost when Isabella left him, nothing else matters as he does all he can to get
her back. Harold Perrineau, Jr. (TV's "Oz") gets lots of opportunities to camp
it up as Isabella's best friend, though the point of the character is lost to
me, except as comic relief. There is little, if any, other character development
by the rest of the supporting cast, which is a problem.
Food may be the focus of the film, but it is obvious that cinematographer
Thierry Arbogast has a crush, visually at least, on Cruz. The camera lovingly
captures every move and expression of the actress in a way that is almost a
caress. This helps to build the sensuality of the film while giving the guys in
the audience a chance to linger awhile and gaze at one of the world's most
beautiful women. Other tech credits are first rate with costumer Elisabeth
Tavernier giving Cruz a complimentary look and she has some fun dressing up
Monica. Production design by Philippe Chiffre is slick, especially with the sets
for Isabella's cooking show.
The music used in "Woman On Top" must be noted, too. Classic Brazilian songs
from the '40s and later are used to wonderful effect, with Toninho using the
soulful romantic ballads as tools to get his beloved wife back, even if on her
terms. Scoring, by Oscar-winner Luis Bacalov, carries the Latino music theme
through the whole film that blends nicely with the songs.
The forced artificiality of much of the story tends to dim the shine of the
sweet romance that develops between Isabella and Toninho. The overt magical
references and effects, the glitter of Isabella's sudden fame on TV, thoughtless
network honchos, spell casting and other such devices end up hurting the film,
making its 92 minute run time seem excessive.
Penelope Cruz has been gaining popularity internationally with her
collaborations with Spanish directors Pedro Almodovar and Fernando Trueba. The
actress is stunningly beautiful and casts a sensuous shadow across any role she
plays. With "Woman On Top," she gets the chance star in a film that is a
showcase for her beauty and her entry into the great American star machine.
While "Woman On Top" may not be all that it could have been - a more mature
screenplay that delved into relationships, magical or not, would have helped -
it does has a gentle nature that helps cancel out some of the film's problems,
but not all. It just doesn't cast a spell on me. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
David Dunn (Bruce Willis) is on a commuter train heading home for
Philadelphia after a none-too-successful security job interview in New York
City. He flirts with and is rejected by a pretty young woman and sinks into
his own doldrums. Just before arriving in Philly, the train goes out of
control, jumps the track and all 131 passengers and crew are killed -
except for David, who survives the wreck with nary a scratch. A mysterious,
handicapped man, Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson), who tells David that he
is a very special person, a man who may be invincible, soon approaches him.
The bemused David begins to delve into his apparent indestructibility and
makes some shocking discoveries in director/writer M. Night Shyamalan's
"Unbreakable."
Helmer Shyamalan faces a tough battle with his follow up to the incredibly
successful sophomore effort, "The Sixth Sense." (That film was the second
largest grossing film in 1999, overshadowed only by "The Phantom Menace.")
The director/writer wasted no time in creating a new mystery thriller that
invites the viewer to pay close attention to the details of the story while
still delivering a finale with a revelation that shocks. But, please, don't
expect the stunning, unexpected ending of "The Sixth Sense." Shyamalan's
follow on film effectively avoids a slump by weaving a different mystical
tale.
David has survived the horrors of the train wreck with absolutely no damage
to his body, but his mind is another thing. There is a part of David that
he has never come to grips with and it has impacted his life in negative
ways, including a failing marriage to Audrey (Robin Wright Pen). His only
ray of hope is his son, Joseph (Spencer Treat Clark), who idolizes his dad.
One day soon after the crash, David finds a note on his car that asks the
question, "How many days have you been sick?" There is nothing else except
for a company logo on the card. Dunn tracks down the company to find a very
strange individual as the owner.
Elijah has suffered a lifelong affliction, osteogenesis imperfecta; a
debilitating disease that makes his bones as frail as twigs. He has lived a
careful, reclusive life and still suffered 54 breaks of his bones since he
was a child. Elijah became, as a boy, with his mother's (Charlayne Woodard)
help, an aficionado of action comic books and has delved into duality
inherent in the hero/villain themes of the genre. He built a business based
on the art of his beloved comic books and became obsessed with finding his
dual, his opposite, in life. Elijah's thinking is that there must be
someone to counter his own breakability. Is David the man he seeks?
Other heinous disasters have also taken place, recently, besides David's
train wreck. Of the three life-snuffing accidents, David is the only one to
survive - without a mark on him. Elijah makes David think back over his
life and those things that may have harmed him. As Dunn digs into his past,
he finds that events did not really play as they seemed and that his
childhood "injuries" never happened. His is, truly, unbreakable. The
question now becomes, what is David's purpose on Earth? The fragile Elijah,
whose bones quite literally can break like glass, shows David that he has
the ability to "see" wrongdoers and their deeds. This newfound "sight"
gives David the chance to save a couple of children from a brutal death,
proving to his son that he is a hero. Is he Elijah's comic book hero?
I won't talk anymore about the story so I don't give anything away. This is
a mystery story and the viewer should be allowed the chance to figure it
out. The good news is, though not as shocking a work as "The Sixth Sense,"
"Unbreakable" is an intelligent, well-executed mystical tale. Prepare
yourself for rampant symbolism (and, unfortunately, at least one, extended
product placement that I found annoying). The two-sides-of-the-same-coin
relationship between David and Elijah also has elements of student and
master. David is the bewildered, invulnerable hero figure to Elijah's
flawed, but brilliant, advisor. But, yes, there is more. The comic book art
as a binding device is interesting, especially for action comic fans, but
it left me cold. I think an understanding of the graphic novel art form, as
the director obviously has, will make you appreciate the film's intent a
little more.
Technically, "Unbreakable" is solid. Photography by Eduardo Serra is key to
the look of the film, capturing the moody, off-kilter, otherworldliness
that Shyamalan strives to create. Production designer Larry Fulton, who did
such subtle work on "The Sixth Sense," gets a chance at a more stylized
locale in the world of Elijah Price. The starkly contrasted
chrome-and-glass look combines beautifully with the costuming, from another
Shyamalan collaborator, Joanna Johnston. (See Laura's review at
www.reelingreviews.com/unbreakable.htm for a unique perspective on the
film's costume/makeup.) The film carries a vaguely sinister look throughout
that helps keep the story intact.
Screenwriter Shyamalan needs to get out more. His script is intelligent,
yes, but also self-indulgent. He is having fun with the mystery, the look
and the colors of the film and the film abounds with little in-jokes that
the observant viewer will see and enjoy. He is an honest writer that does
not go for the cheap shot to titillate the audience. I would like to see
the helmer work with other filmmakers and spread his creative wings more.
Unfortunately for the actors, this is a story-intensive flick that requires
the filmgoer to pay attention to the plot threads. As such, the thespians
are required to live within their characters rather than develop them.
Willis is conflicted as David Dunn and works hard to understand his real
gift, though there is little emotion allowed to bubble through - except in
one scene where Joseph tests David's new-found and incredible body
strength. Samuel L. Jackson always brings his all, but, even he is
overshadowed by the Gumby-hairdo and slick costume of Elijah. Clark does
fine as the incredulous son, Joseph. He and Willis play well with each
other, though the boy is not a Haley Joel Osment. Robin Wright Penn, as
David's troubled wife Audrey, does well in the tough role of understanding
wife.
"Unbreakable" should have a ready-made audience and do well at the
box-office as the only "serious" film out right now. It will draw an after
life on video and DVD for the fans who want to pick it apart and look for
all the little nuances in the story. Enjoy the show. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for American Rhapsody, An (2001)
When the oppression of the Communist regime running 1950's Hungary proved
too much, Margit (Nastassja Kinski) and Peter (Tony Goldwyn) take their
eldest daughter and flee for the refuge of America. But, they are forced to
leave their baby, Suzanne, behind to be raised by a kind, childless couple
for six years until they can manage to bring the little girl here, too.
Longtime film editor Eva Gardos takes the helm and tells her own story
about coming to America in "An American Rhapsody."
Working from her own script, Gardos brings us back to a tumultuous time as
the specter of communism descends upon the people of Central Europe,
bringing to a halt the hopes of freedom that arose from the ashes of World
War II. Book publisher Peter see the writing on the wall of Stalin's
growing hegemony on his beloved Hungary and makes plans to spirit his
family out of the country. His scheme go awry when he and his wife, Margit,
are forced to leave baby Suzanne in the hands of the child's grandma, Helen
(Agnes Banfalvy). Helen is soon arrested for her complicity in the couple's
escape and Suzanne spends her formative years with Jeno (Balazs Galko) and
Teri (Zsuzsa Czinkoczi) on an idyllic farm in the country.
Margit, in the meantime, has not forgotten her baby and lobbies untiringly
to get her daughter back. She succeeds and, in a flurry of media attention,
six-year old Suzanne (Kelly Endresz Banlaki) arrives on American soil. But,
the little girl has only known Teri and Jeno as her parents and, while
growing close to Peter, has never embraced Margit as her mother. The
estrangement deepens when Suzanne reaches teen hood and the young girl
rebels at the overprotective hand of her birth mother. Things come to a
head when mom puts bars on her daughter's windows and an outside lock on
her door. Suzanne calls in a promise made to her years before by Peter to
go back to Hungary to the "parents" she loves. Margit, reluctantly, lets
her daughter go. Once back "home" again, the young woman comes of age and
realizes the importance and love of her real family.
I must laud Eva Gardos for her dedication in bringing her story to the
screen. Her effort borders on amateur at times and the overall work comes
across as something made-for-television, but there are some good things
about it, too. The best little thing in "An American Rhapsody" is the
charming performance by Kelly Endresz Banlaki as six-year-old Suzanne. The
diminutive actress comes across as a real little girl who makes the best of
being a stranger in a strange land. When, one day, she dresses in her
Hungarian clothing and sets off to play, unknown to her parents, we see
America through her innocent eyes.
Unfortunately, the story jumps ahead to teenage Suzanne (Scarlett
Johansson), a selfish young woman who stays out all night, drinks and hangs
out with her older boyfriend, much to Margit's despair. Johansson comes
across more like a spoiled brat than a genuine young rebel. The tone of the
film takes a down turn during this transition and the impact of Suzanne's
revelations about life when she returns to Hungary is diminished. She sees
her grandmother again and all of her teen angst and rejection of her mother
is changed when she hears "the real story." It all wraps up neatly, but
without much satisfaction.
The end of the Cold War opened up Eastern Europe to filmmakers and Gardos
makes the best out of the lovely old city of Budapest. We get a travelogue
presentation of the bridges and buildings that make up the city, but the
nice scenery does not help the change in pace from the film's first half or
draw you close to the older Suzanne. This part keeps the viewer at arm's
length from characters and loses the involvement gained when watching the
charismatic younger Suzanne.
The production has an artificial feel to it as the period touches - things
like hula-hoops - are used to show the timeframes the film follows. I would
have to watch again, but it seems that the attention to such details is
less than accurate, bringing my mind to question the chronicle of events
depicted.
"An American Rhapsody" is a heartfelt film and an obvious labor of love by
Eva Gardos, but the story loses steam when it leaves little Suzanne's
story, becoming a conventional coming of age tale, albeit one with Budapest
as a backdrop. I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Gift, The (2000)
Annie Wilson lives in the small Southern town of Blixton, Georgia, with her
three sons. The young widow has a knack for psychic vision and is called
upon by certain of the town folk to give readings, explain the past and
predict the future. Her talent is sorely tested when a rich socialite
disappears and Annie is called in by the police to help find the missing
heiress in Sam Raimi's "The Gift."
Director Raimi has had a most rewarding and eclectic career since his
breakthrough "Evil Dead" films. He has created stylish films like "The
Quick and the Dead," "A Simple Plan" and the sometimes beautiful "For Love
of the Game," always putting a different spin on each work. He continues
this track record with "The Gift," a supernatural thriller that is a
showcase for its star, Blanchett.
The story, by Billy Bob Thornton and Tom Epperson, is a middling entry for
Raimi that is, disappointingly, a conventional whodunit coupled with
supernatural power. Annie has psychic powers that allow her to help the
various members of Brixton society who have come to depend on the gifted
woman.
Her steady stream of troubled clients includes Valerie (Hilary Swank), a
badly abused woman who comes to Annie for help but refuses to follow the
psychic's advice to leave her violent husband, Donnie (Keanu Reeves).
Donnie, a real redneck's redneck, declares Annie a witch working for the
devil and threatens her and her boys with violence if she continues
interfering in his life. Another patron, the simple but very troubled Buddy
(Giovanni Ribisi), seems to be collapsing within himself over childhood
abuse by his father, but may hold the key to later events.
The crux of this southern Gothic yarn is the disappearance of society girl
Jennifer King (Katie Holmes). Jennifer is high school principle Wayne
Collins' fiancée, but Annie soon learns the young woman has a promiscuous
and selfish streak, catching her in flagrante delicto at one point. When
Jennifer disappears one night, her frantic father begs Annie to use her
power to find his daughter. The visions she has lead to the arrest,
conveniently, of Donnie, sending the wife beater to prison for murder and
out of Annie's life.
This is where the convention of the story replaces imagination. From here
on in, doubt is raised as to Donnie's guilt and one suspect after another
start to come out of the woodwork. Almost everyone who has a line in the
movie falls under the suspicious gaze of the camera as Annie's psychic
vision point to one, then another, possible murderer. It gets very
confusing and forces the story to unravel into a morass of faux
accusations. So many suspects crop up over the course of the movie that I
thought I was watching the psychic edition of "Clue." The whirlwind of this
whodunit replaces suspense with a series of false leads as the real killer
is eventually brought to justice.
As I said, "The Gift" is a showcase for the very talented Cate Blanchett.
Since her breakthrough performance as the young queen in "Elizabeth," the
actress has shown versatility and is capable of a myriad of accents and
characters. With her natural-sounding southern drawl, Blanchett pulls you
into her character and the danger and confusion that her gift can cause.
Even as she tries to help here clientele with her visions, she denies the
impact they have, repeatedly, when they involve her or her own. It's not
the best performance of the year, but it does further establish the actress
as one of the most talented in the business today.
The supporting cast surrounding Annie provide an assemblage of
two-dimensional characters, here to give cause to the mystery and not too
much more. Keanu Reeves shows himself to be an actor willing to go against
type and be something other than just a pretty face. As such, he brings
attention to his character, Donnie Barksdale, and you believe, though he is
a wife-beating jerk, he is no murderer. Hilary Swank does her best as the
one-note Valerie, but the Academy Award winning actress is not given much
to do as the abused wife - except to look extremely abused. Giovanni Ribisi
needs to get his agent to get him roles other than the simple characters he
has played of late. Greg Kinnear and Katie Holmes are miscast as a couple.
Holmes, in particular, is too young for the femme fatale she is supposed to
be.
The moody production fits the temperament sought for "The Gift" with the
dark, atmospheric night scenery and swirling fog. It looks good and couples
nicely with the story up to the first half. After that, as the tale gets
confused, the decent techs become background only.
The draw to "The Gift" is Cate Blanchett. She is worth the price of
admission, though the movie, overall, is less than her considerable
efforts. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Enemy at the Gates (2001)
In 1942 and '43, during the bloody battle of Stalingrad, a new kind of hero
arose from the ranks of the Soviet army. Vassily Zaitzev (Jude Law), a
simple shepherd from the Urals, is thrust into the limelight when he guns
down five Nazi officers, from a distance, with just five shots. As he
continues to rack up kills against the German invaders, a master sniper is
sent by Hitler to kill the young hero in "Enemy at the Gates."
Jean-Jacques Annaud directs this epic-scale story of the private war that
takes place between Vassily and German sniper par excellent, Major Konig
(Ed Harris), with the murderous battle for Stalin's namesake city as its
backdrop. Jude Law stars as the young Red Army soldier whose shooting
skills come under the scrutiny of Danilov (Joseph Fiennes), a political
commissar who sees Vassily's enemy-killing potential as a morale booster
for the beleaguered Russian troops.
As Vassily's reputation for killing Nazi officers rises on both sides, the
Germans send their own expert marksman, Konig, to Stalingrad to gun down
the young Russian hero. This begins a battle of wits in a cat-and-mouse
game as the hunters, themselves, become the hunted. As the war rages on
between the two great armies, Zaitzev and Konig each try to best the other.
Danilov uses this personal fight as a propaganda tool to elevate Vassily to
hero status in the eyes of the Russian people, soldiers and civilians
alike.
Meanwhile, both Vassily and Danilov are attracted to a beautiful
American-educated Russian woman, Tania (Rachel Weisz), and a love triangle
begins. This is where "Enemy at the Gates" runs into trouble ? the battle
of the snipers takes a back seat to the love story and the film suffers for
the change of focus.
Director Annaud and cowriter Alain Godard use the real-life story of
Vassily Zaitsez as the basis of their tale. The duel of the snipers,
Vassily's rise to hero of the Soviet Union, and Tania's presence during the
private war are all based on fact. The scripters, in their research of
facts and legends, take liberties with the true-life yarn, introducing the
conflict between Vassily and Danilov in their pursuit of the beautiful
Tania. This tangent takes the focus away, considerable, from the taut
battle between the Zaitzev and Konig.
Where "Enemy at the Gates" excels is in the depth and breadth of the
battlefield production. The film begins with an old-fashioned map of Europe
where, suddenly, the Nazi blight spreads across the face of the continent
with the roving camera eye closing in on Stalingrad! With that, we're
thrust into the war from the point of view of young recruit Vassily. He and
his comrades must cross the Volga River through a murderous barrage of
bullets and bombs to reach the front. These untrained conscripts are
prodded kicked, even shot by the political commissars to get them to fight.
These action sequences, especially the battle itself, is stunning in its
depiction of the savagery of war.
The casting and acting, for the most part, is serviceable, but without
distinction - with a couple of exceptions. Ed Harris gives an expected
excellent performance as the aristocrat hunter turned sniper master sent to
stalk and kill Vassily. He carries himself with the assured air of a man of
means and stature, used to having the best in all things. Harris
neutralizes his American accent, giving it a slight Teutonic clip in
keeping with his character. The rest of the cast doesn't make such an
effort so we get an odd mix of mostly British accents from the rest.
Notable among the cast is young Gabriel Thomson as little Sasha, a Russian
kid who becomes a pawn in the battle of wits between Konig and Vassily.
When he gazes at Vassily with a look of admiration, he almost glows. The
relationship that develops between Sasha and Konig, as the boy plays double
agent for Danilov, is palpable. It is so much so that the break between the
two, when it finally comes, did not sit right with me. Jude Law, a young
actor whom I've grown to like, is vacuous as Vassily. The tentativeness he
first displays is never lost even as he is supposed to become a battle
hardened veteran. Rachel Weisz is pretty as the love interest, but is
mostly just window dressing. Fiennes is wooden and unconvincing as the
power hungry political commissar who sucks up to Nikita Khrushchev (Bob
Hoskins), sent by Stalin to oversee the battle.
Technically, "Enemy at the Gates" is a superb achievement. The battle
sequences are wrought with shockingly realistic action as the two armies
collide. The computer-generated  F/X, like the squadron of Stukas
dive-bombing the troop boats or Junker 88's carpet bombing the ruins of
Stalingrad, are seamless.  The wide panoramic of the battle sequences are
richly detailed with specifics, like tanks, weapons and uniforms, given a
great deal of attention.
"Enemy at the Gates" tries to be two very different films and isn't really
a success at either. It tries to be a compelling war drama of a duel to the
death between two sniper masters. At the same time, it poses as a romantic
drama with the war as a backdrop. I didn't get enough of one - the sniper
battle, of course - and thought there was way too much of the other. It's a
brilliant production, though, and I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
The heist of a flawless, 84 carat diamond, fixed bare knuckle fights, Irish 
gypsies and a dog are just some of the goings on in director Guy Ritchies's 
sophomore feature, "Snatch." 
"Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels" intro'd helmer/scripter Ritchie with 
a hyper-kinetic, in your face underworld comedy that grabbed the viewer's 
attention from beginning to end. His protagonists were innocents set adrift 
in a see of sharks to swim or be eaten alive. With "Snatch," the director 
doesn't remake his first work, but he does delve more deeply into the 
criminal underbelly of London, mining a rich collection of characters in 
the process. 
>From the very beginning, "Snatch" tosses you into the action with the theft 
of the fabulous diamond, the desire of New York gangster Avi (Dennis 
Farina). En route from Antwerp, diamond thief and courier Frankie Four 
Fingers (Benicio Del Toro) stops in London to make a separate deal with 
Avi's partner and cousin, Doug "The Head" (Mike Reid). Frankie's addiction 
to gambling tempts him into making a bet on an illegal boxing match for 
Boris "The Blade" (Rade Sherbedgia), a ruthless Russian mobster. The bet 
turns out to be a setup for a robbery by a trio of bumbling incompetents - 
Vinnie (Robbie Gee), Sol (Lennie James) and portly Tyrone (Ade)- that goes 
miserably awry. 
Meanwhile, a couple of young toughs, Turkish (Jason Stratham) and Tommy 
(Stephen Graham), are trying to break in to the boxing game with the help 
of local villain Brick Top (Alan Ford), who also owns a pig farm. When 
their first fighter is put out of action, with one punch, by a wild Irish 
gypsy named Mickey O'Neil, they figure to put the loose canon in as the 
contender in a fixed fight. Mickey proves less than reliable and goes 
against Turkish and Tommy's deal. Brick Top, impressed by Mickey's 
performance, decides to gives them another chance - after calmly explaining 
that it takes 16 pigs about eight minutes to completely devour a corpse. 
When Avi doesn't get his precious rock, he jumps on a plane for London and 
hires a local legend, "Bullet Tooth" Tony (Vinnie Jones), to find Frankie 
and the diamond. Things spiral out of control as all these forces head on a 
collision course of double-cross and double-deals - and a dog that ate a 
squeaky toy. 
Guy Ritchie (Mr. Madonna to some) is an extraordinarily talented auteur who 
has a wonderful knack for pulling together his unique collection of cast 
and crew and feeding them funny and gritty dialog that spews out of the 
characters' mouths like machine gun fire. The helmer marshals his large 
ensemble actors in a frantically paced caper comedy that makes you laugh 
and feel queasy at the same time, the above description by Brick Top being 
just one example. 
The assemblage of actors and non-actors in rough-and-tumble settings gives 
"Snatch" an earthy feel in its depiction of London's criminal underworld. 
The cast of characters is too large to credit here, but two of the 
performances - first among equals, you might say - are worth noting. Alan 
Ford is brilliant as the ruthless, evil Brick Top. When he refuses sugar in 
his tea because "I'm sweet enough," it makes you shiver, even as you laugh. 
His is one of the best gangster characters I've seen in years. 
The other outstanding perf is given by none other than Brad Pitt, the name 
actor the movie's popularity may hang upon, at least initially. Pitt, as 
Mickey O'Neil, is hard drinking, hard fighting, highly unreliable and 
nearly incomprehensible with a unique Irish brogue and dialect of the 
pikers, the Irish travelers of Europe. This gypsy brigand would steal the 
fillings from your teeth, especially if it would benefit his beloved mum 
(Sorcha Cusack). When Brick Top threaten the safety of Mickey's family, he 
makes an enemy that cannot be stopped. Pitt puts a credible spin on his 
character and does some incredible physical stuff, too, as a bare-knuckle 
boxer. 
The production team behind the camera includes Ritchie alumni, producer 
Matthew Vaughn and lenser Tim Maurice-Jones, and other talented technical 
artist that bring the hyperactive imagination of the author to visual life. 
There is a patent feel to the look of "Snatch" and "Lock, Stock and Two 
Smoking Barrels" that reeks of "signature" for Ritchie, but I'm not sure 
how this will translate in his future works. There is so much talent in the 
filmmaker that I would like to see him branch out in other directions. 
Nonetheless, "Snatch" is terrific sophomore effort, a darn good action 
comedy and a hoot to boot. I give it a B+. 

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
Well, mankind finally did it. It's 2057 and planet Earth is on the brink of
ecological extinction. There is one choice and one choice only for survival
- colonize Mars. The Mars Terraforming Project laid the groundwork to
prepare the red planet for its human inhabitants. Now, a manned space
mission is sent to begin the colony, but disaster soon strikes, stranding
the landing party on the inhospitable planet and leaving mission commander,
Kate Bowman, alone on their failing spaceship. It's a race against time as
Bowman must save her ship and crew in the science fiction actioner, "Red
Planet."
"Red Planet" is by the numbers and derivative, but it is well done by the
numbers and derivative. It tries to do a lot of things with several plot
lines happening concurrently. It's a survival flick a la the 1964 sci-fi
movie "Robinson Crusoe on Mars" as the marooned crew discovers that there
is air on the planet, extending their endangered lives. The introduction of
a sinister robot, called AMEE, portends problems that are reminiscent of
both "Alien" and "Terminator." There is even a passing nod to the classic
"War of the Worlds" thrown into the mix, as well as "2001."
This is a typical Hollywood action/disaster film that moves along at a
brisk, energetic pace under the control of first-time helmer Antony
Hoffman. The director has a good team behind the camera, so there is
quality built in to the sets, costumes (although all the uniforms have the
players names emblazoned in several places in large letters as if the crew
of six suffers from a learning disorder that prohibits their remembering
each other's names) and flashy special F/X.  Veteran lenser Peter
Suschitzky gives the film the benefit of his years of craft experience.
Owen Paterson helps things look otherworldly with art direction that makes
the red planet an inhospitable place indeed. Costuming, by Kym Barrett, has
a suitable pseudo military air about it, though Carrie-Anne Moss's threads
consist mainly of skin tight t-shirts without a bra - not that I'm
complaining, mind you.
The small but well-versed cast breathes some life into their mostly
two-dimensional characters, though there is little in the way of character
development. Carrie-Anne Moss has proven she has the physical ability to be
an action hero, but, to date, has not had the chance to show any acting
chops. If she can get more meaty roles, she may prove herself to be the new
Sigourney Weaver. It's too soon to tell, though, with her current track
record. She plays the stalwart, smart Captain Bowman well enough but
doesn't get beyond the essentials of the character. Val Kilmer and Tom
Sizemore get to do the macho guy thing and get to deliver the funny,
smart-ass lines that provide the film's comic relief.
The rest of the cast is little more than background characters. Terrence
Stamp plays a scientist turned philosopher, but is killed off early on,
getting little to do except to tell the others "you can do it!" Benjamin
Bratt is given even less to do and his demise makes little sense in the
context of the story. Simon Baker plays a quasi-sinister character, but the
motivations and actions of the guy make little sense except to introduce a
"bad guy" to the story. Special mention is needed to praise the robot
character AMEE. While she doesn't speak, she is a major character in the
monster movie part of the tale and consists of some cool F/X.
Some of the details of the Red Planet are not handled quite as well as
others. In one part, there are clouds in the sky - on a planet supposedly
devoid of an atmosphere. This is one glaring inconsistency. In another,
when the stranded, would be colonists locate their emergency habitat, they
find it utterly destroyed. The comment is made that even the worst storm on
Earth could not harm the refuge, but no reason is given why their almost
home was wrecked. You also have to take the sci-fi mumbo jumbo explanations
given with a grain of salt.
Comparison will be made with the other Mars flick that hit the screens
earlier this year, "Mission to Mars." Where the latter film approached the
awful category, "Red Planet" plays more like a space western that tells its
tale of survival in a hostile land. There is no deep philosophy to muddy
the action waters, here. Instead, we have an old-fashion story that uses
up-to-date F/X and computer-generated technology to keep us entertained for
a couple of hours. Even if it ain't rocket science, it did that for me and
I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)
Pretty young art restorer Amanda Pierce (Monica Potter) has a great job at
the Metropolitan Museum of Art, but you can't say the same about her luck
with men. When she catches her latest beau in the, shall we say, arms of
another woman, a model, she rushes away and gets an apartment with, guess
what? A bunch of models in "Head Over Heels."
In a word, "Head Over Heels" is a mess. It starts off as offbeat romantic
comedy with Amanda, a fish out of water, thrown into a pool of sharks - her
four super-model roomies, Jade (Shalom Harlow), Roxana (Ivana Milicevic),
Candi (Sarah O'Hare) and Holly (Tomiko Fraser). Their goal is to get Amanda
a man and things progress along this path, inanely, for a while. Then,
suddenly, the flick morphs into a rip-off (the filmmakers probably call it
an homage) to Alfred Hitchcock's "Rear Window" and a totally silly murder
mystery
When Amanda agrees to pay her roommates $500 a month for what is
essentially a closet, she enters a world where men constantly hang around
the front door of the gorgeous models in hopes of getting the privilege to
lavish money upon one or all of the beautiful girls. As the five become
friends, the models take on the quest to find Amanda the man of her dreams.
This turns into a Peeping Tomasina tale when Amanda and her new buddies spy
on a handsome neighbor, Jim Winston (Freddie Prinz, Jr.), a fashion
executive.
Amanda gets weak in the knees when she finally meets Jim, a condition that
only used to happen when she saw a great painting, and true love appears
imminent. At this point, about 45 minutes into "Head Over Heels," things
twist and Amanda believes she has witnessed murder of a woman, by her new
amour, in his shade-drawn apartment. The police, of course, find nothing
and treat Amanda and her girlfriends as a bunch of bubbleheads.
The girls decide to forego the police and begin their own investigation of
events. But, this becomes muddled and confused as we lose sight of "the
murder." Is Amanda looking to solve the supposed killing or is she looking
for Mr. Right? It becomes apparent that it's the latter she wants as she
romances and beds Jim, even though she's remains uncertain about his
possible murderous streak. Everything is tied up, sloppily, by the film's
end.
The story for this mess is attributed to a committee of writers - John J.
Strauss, Ed Decter, David Kidd and Ron Burch - and it shows in its
scattershot approach to the disjointed material. Two of the hacks
responsible for "Head Over Heals." Strauss and Decter, hale from "There's
Something About Mary," and bathroom humor pervades the whole tale, mostly
in poor taste. Wee-wee and toilet jokes, number two gags, (unfulfilled) T&A
humor and other childish whimsy are used to replace a real story with what
amounts to 90 minutes of unfunny vignettes.
The press material for "Head Over Heals" touts Freddie Prinz, Jr., as the
Cary Grant of the new millennium. He's not. In fact, this extraordinarily
bland actor never seems to change from one film to the next. His
expressions vary between blank and uncomfortable and he gives no life to
his dual character here. Oh, yeah, you find out in the second half that Jim
Winston is really Bob Smoots, an FBI agent working under cover on some case
or another. But, who really cares?
Top-billed Monica Potter is pretty enough as Amanda, but her good looks
can't help her get around the horrible script. The camera loves to look at
her in close up and she suffers the least, of the two leads, from the bad
writing. The four women playing Amanda's roommates are a quartet of
good-looking ladies, providing ample eye candy. Sarah O'Hare comes across
best, in a slapstick way, as Aussie model Candi. Her ongoing cosmetic
surgeries and comic pratfalls rep some of the few laugh throughout the
film. The rest of the cast should have stayed home.
Director Mark Walters shoulders the burden of responsibility for "Head Over
Heals" and should do what he can to place blame elsewhere. There is little,
if any, chemistry from the behind the camera crew to help lift the leaden
script from its doldrums.
Mein Gott in Himmel! What were these people thinking?! If a friend suggests
going to see "Head Over Heels," run away as fast as you can and get
yourself a new friend. The fact that it's in focus is one of the few
reasons this doesn't get the absolute lowest grade. Still, I give it a D-
and that's pretty bad.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
What does the future hold for us? Genetic engineering could eliminate world
hunger, cure disease, and remove the threat of extinction and stock the
medical labs with cloned organs for transplant. It could also open the
Pandora's box of mankind's most elusive desire - immortality.
Adam Gibson (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is and old-fashioned family man with a
happy and loving little clan of wife, Natalie (Wendy Crewson), and
daughter, Clara (Taylor Anne Reid). He comes home one night brandishing a
surprise gift for Clara, only to find his place taken by an exact duplicate
of himself. His perfect life wrenched away, Adam is plunged into a sinister
world of murder, corruption and high tech skullduggery in a tale about the
dangers of cloning, "The 6th Day."
Deriving its title from the bible - "and God created man on the sixth day"
- this latest Arnold flick utilizes a very hip and controversial subject,
cloning, as its high-tech draw. And a rather cool one it is. "The 6th Day"
begins with true and fictional reports of the progress of cloning from the
first success, Dolly the sheep, through the failed attempts at human
cloning and the eventual banning of the process if it involves people. This
future world does accept the simpler aspects of the technology, though,
with such specialized companies like RePet, Nu Salmon and Real Grain. These
new companies can recreate your beloved, but dead, pet, or fresh food for
your table. A lucrative industry in creating spare body parts has sprung
up, too. But, because of the ban, whole body cloning is definitely a no-no.
Enter our hero, Adam Gibson. Adam is an adoring husband and father who
leaves the house on his birthday not suspecting that a sinister plot is
about to change his life. He and his partner, Hank (Michael Rapaport), have
a lucrative helicopter business, Double X Charters, which ferries
snowboarders up into the mountains to ski. Hank convinces Adam to take his
special day off and the younger man takes the charter of a wealthy genetics
tycoon, Michael Drucker (Tony Goldwyn). The impact of this fateful decision
is made vivid to Adam only hours later.
Arriving at home with a new life-size talking doll, SimPal Cindy, for his
daughter, Adam is confronted by an unbelievable site. Hearing everyone
singing "Happy Birthday," he looks in the window to see himself and his
family celebrating his birthday. Two thugs arrive on the scene to take Adam
away, telling him that there has been a "sixth day violation," that he was
erroneously cloned and that, should his family find out, they will all be
killed. Adam must face the powerful, greedy corporation, led by Drucker,
which stole his life and fight to get it back.
"The 6th Day" moves, despite the high-tech, sci-fi premise, along a
well-traveled road about one innocent man pitted against a corrupt, evil
system. Here, the cloning technology has advanced to the point where
immortality is within the grasp of man, but society has deemed such an
advance as too dangerous. Arnold, as the muscular everyman Adam Gibson, is
thrust into a world of duality as our hero is brought to question his own
existence, his own reality in this world. Is the Adam who is fighting so
hard for his life and family truly being persecuted or is he merely a clone
remembering a life not his? And, if he does remember another's life as his
own, isn't, then, truly his?
All of this is a really good premise for a movie and, if it weren't
burdened with a former action megastar who wants to return to his former
glory, there may have been a good movie here. Instead, we see Arnold in
transition. The former Mr. Universe has been through some major heart
surgery and you can see that he just can't do what he used to in his films
like "Predator" and the "Terminator" franchise. Now, Arnie has to do more
thesping and less butt kicking and he is simply not up to the task. When he
is playing the loving husband and father opposite Crewson and Reid, it made
me want to cry - but, not from emotion for the scenes! With all the
millions Arnold has made from his flicks over all these years, he couldn't
have invested in a few acting lessons, maybe.
Given an actor in the lead role, I think that, with everything else
associated with "The 6th Day," there could have been a good sci-fi actioner
here. As it is, the supporting cast - with Tony Goldwyn as the greedy
high-tech entrepreneur, Michael Rooker as his chief henchman, and Robert
Duval as the well meaning mad scientist - is left to hang in the breeze
with nothing to anchor on to. The F/X showing the brain drain process that
makes cloning possible reminded me of the 1980 Ken Russell film, "Altered
States," and doesn't cover any new ground.
At a little over two hours long I thought that "The 6th Day" could have
easily lost 30 minutes and have been a better movie. Losing Arnold would
have been another good move. I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for House of Mirth, The (2000)
Lily Bart (Gillian Anderson) is a pretty, intelligent young woman whose
mission in life is to land and wealthy, socially prominent husband in early
20th century New York City. But, her ambitions and bad decisions will come
to haunt her on the road to poverty in director/screenwriter Terence
Davies' adaptation of Edith Wharton's "The House of Mirth."
The period work of Edith Wharton holds no charm, normally, for me, so I was
pleasantly surprised at how much I enjoyed watching "The House of Mirth."
Lily, as played by "The X-Files" star Anderson, is a strong-minded woman
who, when we meet her, seems certain to get exactly what she wants from
life. She rebuffs the advances of a handsome young lawyer, Lawrence Selden
(Eric Stoltz), who, though well bred, does not earn enough for her liking.
Lily's mercenary nature leads her down a path that will end in poverty and
despair.
While "The House of Mirth" isn't going to break any box office records, it
is still a well-crafted, well-acted film that showcases a top performance
from Gillian Anderson. The actress is pigeon holed in her Agent Scully
persona from "The X-Files," but has proven herself to be a talented
character actor - see her terrific little performance in "The Mighty." In
"House of Mirth" she takes on the starring role and gives one on the best,
most subtle performances of 2000.
The rest of this little gem is equal to the efforts of Anderson. The large
supporting cast provides wonderful depth to the background characters with
solid perfs all around. Anthony LaPaglia, Eric Stolz, Laura Linney (in a
truly, sublimely wicked little role), Eleanor Bron and the rest give
credence and dimension to their well-defined roles.
Helmer/scripter Terence Davies does a marvelous job of adapting the Wharton
novel to the screen. The stage director uses his skilled background to
provide a play-like environment for the actors, but with the benefit of
lush sets and costume that flesh out the material to movie, rather than
stage, stature.
"The House of Mirth" could be a breakout film for Anderson, but a lot
depends on how much box office attention the movie gets. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit at www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
British MI-6 agent Andrew Osnard (Pierce Brosnan) really screwed up his
last assignment and is reassigned to the armpit of the Foreign Service -
Panama. Trying to make the best of a bad assignment, Andrew recruits the
local tailor to the Panamanian elite, Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush), for
information and unleashes a series of events that may lead to America
taking back the Canal in the John Le Carre story, "The Tailor of Panama."
Andrew Osnard is the antithesis of the always-honorable James Bond
character that we have viewed, for many years, as the quintessential
example of the British secret agent. Brosnan, himself, has made a career
playing the legendary 007, and takes a dark departure with his spy who is
left out in the cold by his bosses for his previous "indiscretions." Andrew
is the kind of suave, yet slimy, guy who can seize opportunity when he sees
it. That's when he has the idea to bring Harry into his control and milk
the tailor for information about his well-to-do clients, to get the pulse
of Panama, so to speak.
Harry has built his business on a Saville Row reputation and has become
quite well off as the clothier to Panama's stars. But, a bad, costly
investment in a failing farm forces Harry to act as an info-for-pay
resource for Andrew. To get enough money to cover his debts, Harry invents
a story about the country's "Silent Opposition," led by a former Noriega
foe, Michelangelo Abraxus (Brendan Gleeson). Mickey, Harry reports to
Andrew, is the new hope of the Panamanian people to end the government's
continued repression. The only trouble is, Mickey, Harry's good friend,
isn't told about the deception. As the money starts to roll in, the
indebted tailor perpetuates his lies with even bigger ones, digging himself
in deeper and deeper into a quagmire.
Andrew's controllers in Britain aren't satisfied with Harry's reports and
demand hard proof before giving their tailor a penny more. Desperate, Harry
involves his own wife, Louisa (Jamie Lee Curtis), assistant to the manager
of the entire Canal, without her knowledge. As things spiral out of Harry's
control, he sees everything he has so carefully built for so many years
come crashing around him.
As I watched the first two thirds of "The Tailor of Panama" I could not
help but to compare it to the 1960 Alec Guinness spy spoof, "Our Man in
Havana." Both films are about a hapless everyman who is drawn into the spy
game. But, since there is nothing, really, to spy on, he invents intrigue
and develops a fake spy network. In both films, the hero's intentions are
the best, but go wrong nonetheless. Both start out whimsically, but only
"Our Man in Havana" sustains it. Le Carre's story departs as it moves away
from its early whimsy and takes on a dramatic tone that reps a sudden
change of direction for the story.
This is where "The Tailor of Panama" runs into problems. The light-hearted
nature of the bulk of the film is smothered by the serious episodes that
represents Harry's final fall, losing him nearly everything he has worked
for - including his beloved wife. This sharp turn in the story occurs very
late in the film and is handled perfunctorily, making the viewer shift
gears abruptly. This may be faithful to Le Carre's novel, but the
screenplay, cowritten by the author, is, on the whole, unsatisfying in its
conclusion.
Performances, both in front of and behind the camera, are uniformly solid.
Geoffrey Rush is always a pleasure to watch and he gives nuance and
dimension to his Harry Pendel. Harry is not all he seems or says, but
preserving his family and life are his reason for his deceptions. He is a
good man who, in the end, must pay the price for trying to grab the gold
ring.
Pierce Brosnan appears to being having one heck of a good time as the
anti-Bond. His out-of-favor Andrew is cunning and underhanded enough to get
his way. He is not beyond using Harry's misinformation for his own gain,
even feathering his own nest with millions of dollars of espionage funds.
Brosnan comes across as sexy and sleazy at the same time.
The rest of the cast is made up by a bevy of talented actors, from Curtis
and Gleeson to Leanor Varela as Harry's disfigured (from the Noriega days)
secretary Martha, keeping the supporting cast close to the central action.
There is also a plethora of small and cameo performances, including
Catherine McCormack as Andrew's foreign service lover, Francesca, Jon
Polito as a deceitful banker and Harry's supposed friend, and Dylan Baker
as a gung ho US Army general. Playwright Harold Pintner plays the pivotal
role as Harry's dead Uncle Bennie, who appears to the tailor at critical
times, advising his nephew to give up his dangerous life.
Cinematographer Philippe Rousselot gives the film a lush, crisp look that
has a coolness belying the heat and humidity of the Panama location. As you
would expect from a story about a tailor, costuming, by Maeve Paterson, is
exceptional, especially the suits of Harry's design and the casual suavity
of Brosnan's attire.
"The Tailor of Panama" had me for the bulk of the film, but its sudden turn
from whimsy to drama left me out in the cold. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Monkeybone (2001)
Stu Miley (Brendan Fraser) is on top of the world. He's madly in love with
beautiful Dr. Julia McElroy (Bridget Fonda) and has a hit animated TV show
based on his main character, a mischievous monkey named Monkeybone. A freak
accident puts Stu into a deep coma where his nightmare world comes alive
and he must fight his way back to the land of the living in "Monkeybone."
The film opens with a short animation, Monkeybone, conceived and created by
the reclusive Stu. He hates the attention, especially the merchandise
marketing, that the fame his creation has spawned. An unfortunate car
accident involving a giant, inflatable Monkeybone doll knocks Stu
unconscious with little chance for revival. While his doctor girlfriend,
Julie (Bridget Fonda), fights to bring him back before his selfish sister,
Kimmy (Megan Mullalley), can pull the plug, the animator finds himself cast
into the land of his nightmares. To his surprise, Stu learns that the bad
dreams that have plagued him his whole life are a big hit in Downtown, the
purgatory-like limbo between life and death. His celebrity status has come
to the attention of Hypnos (Giancarlo Esposito), the god of sleep, and poor
Stu soon learns that he can never leave his underworld prison.
Adding insult to injury, his creation, Monkeybone, comes to life in the
nightmare world and the malicious monkey escapes to take over Stu's body on
earth and garner all the perks of the cartoonist's fame - including Julie.
It becomes a battle of wills as Stu fights to escape the nightmare world
and get his body back from the willful, troublemaking Monkeybone.
This is the kind of movie that must have looked good on paper - the popular
Brendan Fraser starring in a Tim Burtonesque film about the land of
nightmares and all the creatures that reside there. Admittedly, the art
direction and imagination that went into the creation of Downtown and its
bizarre inhabitants is second to none, and is reminiscent, at times, of
Burton's "Beetlejuice." The effort is laudable in its visual achievements
in creating the frightening demons of Stu's dreams. But, this creative
artwork does not have a story to hold it together. There is no real tale,
at least not one I care about, to involve the earthbound characters. It's
visual eye candy in the nether world and not much more.
Helmer Henry Sellick has ample experience with the creating a fantasy wolds
as is very evident in "The Nightmare Before Christmas" and "James and the
Giant Peach." The demon world of the land of nightmares in "Monkeybone" is
further proof that he and his team of filmmakers know how to create a dark
fantasyland. The same cannot be said for his direction of the live actors
in their world. This is where "Monkeybone" falls flat, leaving the actors
to mouth their lines while the possessed Stu revels in the havoc he causes
amongst the living.
Brendan Fraser has been used to better effect, especially in his last film,
"Bedazzled," where he got to do a multitude of characters and some good
comedy. In "Monkeybone," he, like the rest of the "human" cast, is left out
in the cold, playing second banana to the terrific F/X, stop motion camera
work and computer-generated animation. The rest of the cast, a pretty good
collection of comedic actors, is wasted in their various character roles.
Bridget Fonda has the unenviable task of being the loyal girlfriend, Julie,
and has little to do but look pensive or startled. Whoopi Goldberg, a
veteran of this kind of comedy, doesn't do anything with the great
potential of her character, Death. Giancarlo Esposito does his best to give
some evil mirth to his half-man, half-goat, Hypnos, but, falls to the power
of F/X. Chris Kattan gets some mileage as the dead gymnast/organ donor that
Stu possesses when he returns to earth to get his own body back. Plan on
watching a stomach or a kidney fall out of Stu's temporary bod, only to be
snatched up by a greedy gang of organ harvesting doctors. Rose McGowan is
cute as the aptly named Kitty, while a blond, goateed Dave Foley could have
phoned in his slimy agent character, Herb.
Special F/X, alone, do not make a movie. There has to be a good story to
hang terrific techs on and that does not happen with "Monkeybone." I give
it a disappointed C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
Jerry Welbach is a hapless bagman forced to do the bidding of a prominent
mob boss. His years of indenture are just about over and he has one last
job - head south of the border and acquire a legendary pistol called the
Mexican. The only problem is his girlfriend Samantha (Julia Roberts). She
wants him to move to Las Vegas with her, now!, or get out of her life
forever in "The Mexican."
This much anticipated partnering of Julia Roberts and Brad Pitt has come
under some criticism because, for most of "The Mexican," they aren't even
together. And, when they are, much of the dialogue consists of Samantha
badgering Jerry in a shrew-like and shrill manner, making me wonder why
they are even together. Things change for the better when they go their
separate ways, but the film then suffers from its real problem - it's too
darn long for a light romantic comedy.
This is a problem that is not the fault of the two mega-stars. Roberts and
Pitt (along with a fine perf by James Gandolfini) do well enough, but this
major star power almost forces the filmmakers, led by director Gore
Verbinski, to create a two plus hour tome. As such, there is much padding
involved to stretch things out to the detriment of a tight, well-paced
story. In Hollywood, it is believed that the people want stars, not a
tightly told story, and that's what we get here.
When Jerry heads to Mexico for his one last job to locate the coveted
pistol, he is a real fish out of water. The unlucky mob courier sees his
little mission as a hit and run, where he does the deed and can get back to
Samantha to beg forgiveness. Once he lands, though, things could not go
more wrong as he gets the gun, loses it, gets it again, but loses his
passport, keeping him in country with no way out. His puppet master back in
the States, mob accountant Bernie Nayman (Bob Balaban), for insurance, sets
one of his thugs to find Samantha and put her on ice until the gun is
delivered. Unknown to Jerry, Bernie is planning his own scam to wrest the
gun from his boss, Arnold Margolese (Gene Hackman in an uncredited cameo),
the man that Jerry caused to go to prison.
Paralleling Jerry's plight is the strong-willed Samantha's undertaking to
move to Las Vegas, get a job as a waitress and become a croupier at a
casino. When she hits the road, she finds herself in the clutches of a
vicious hit man named Leroy (Gandolfini). This becomes one of the movie's
brightest moment as the bad guy and his victim begin to bond, becoming fast
friends and confiding their deepest secrets. The chemistry between Roberts
and Gandolfini is palpable, sweet and entertaining.
Brad Pitt's Jerry is left to his own simple devices as he makes a journey
of both confusion and enlightenment. Pitt has always had a comic flair
(check his funny stoner perf in "True Romance") and is up to the task of
carrying better than half of the movie alone - well, he does have a bonding
relation, himself, with a big, scruffy dog whose favorite toy is a beat up,
deflated football. When he finally locates the prized pistol, in the hands
of Margolese's grandson, Beck (David Krumholtz), things go bad when the kid
is killed in a bizarre shooting accident. They get worse when Jerry's El
Camino, the body and the Mexican are stolen.
When Bernie learns of Jerry's dilemma, he thinks he is trying to pull a
fast one and sends a hit man, Jerry's friend Ted (J.K. Simmons), to bag the
bagman. The two stories - Jerry's plight and Samantha and Leroy's own
journey - start to cross paths, frequently, as poor Jerry struggles to get
himself and the gun back to the US while trying to save Sam from the
mobster. Jerry, it turns out, smells a rat in Leroy. There's a lot more
going on leading to the requisite happy ending.
As one expects with a big star vehicle like "The Mexican." No expense is
denied in the making. The production team essentially renovated the small
Mexican town of Real de Catorce to fit the film's needs and the look and
feel put you right with Jerry, south of the border. Stylish lenser Dariusz
Wolski ("The Crow") gives a separate color palate to each of the sequences,
with the flashback scenes to the making of the legend of the Mexican
handled particularly well. They have a look that gives the sequence a nice
period feel. The rest of the production equals the photography.
"The Mexican" is another case where the star power overwhelms the story,
making more not necessarily better. There is a logical ending at the
96-minute mark that would have, with a little work, tightened up things
considerably and made a better movie. As it is, the stars are entertaining,
Gandolfini is terrific and there is some good fun along the way. I give it
a B.
For more Reeing reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Fast and the Furious, The (2001)
Dominic Toretto (Vin Diesel) owns the streets of L.A. During the day he
puts together high-performance racing cars. At night, he pilots his own
little pocket rocket and wins upwards to $10,000 if someone has the nerve
to race him. A young loner, Brian (Paul Walker), wants to hook up with the
outlaw motor maestro. Dom is suspicious, until a confrontation with a
ruthless gang leader, Johnny Tran (Rick Yune), changes his mind. But,
enough about plot. It's about racing in Rob Cohen's "The Fast and the
Furious."
Over the past year, we've had a couple of auto-based, adrenalin rush pics
with "Gone in 60 Seconds" and "Driven." Neither film had much in common and
neither was very good, but they both carried the central theme of a need
for speed. Helmer Cohen takes the hunger to drive fast to the streets with
his pop-culture look into that microcosm of Americana, Los Angeles.
The desolate nighttime streets of sections of L.A. become tribal territory
for the adrenalin junkies whose pride is in their hopped up imports. They
gather every night, monitoring the whereabouts of the police, and risk
their pink slips against their ability to drive fast. Dom is the leader of
this tribe, along with his team, and he rules the outlaw races. But there
is danger lurking on the horizon for those involved in a major hijack ring
and members of the clan of night drivers may well be involved.
Brian is a loner who comes into the scene with a desire to impress Dom and
his posse with his guts and ability. But, the young man has a hidden agenda
- he's an undercover cop and he suspects that the hijackers may be hidden
among the tribe. When he and Dom have a run-in with Johnny Tran's team, a
bunch of gun toting, motorcycle driving hotheads, it looks like these are
the bad guys the cop is searching for. Brian and his bosses jump the gun
and raid Johnny's operation, much to their eventual embarrassment.
At about this point, things start to sort themselves out as the real story,
one of honor and loyalty, kicks in. This is also where the film gets very
derivative of such action flicks as "Speed" and "Point Break" - is it
significant that Keanu Reeves starred in both of those films? But, derived
does not mean bad and "The Fast and the Furious" delivers its action bits
in tense portions. The racing that dominated the first half of the film
takes a back seat, so to speak, to the meat of the story and the
relationship between Brian and Dominic and his team.
"The Fast and the Furious" benefits from the charismatic presence of Vin
Diesel. The actor was one reason "Boiler Room" worked and he cuts a good
figure here. Diesel is so likable, though, that it is hard to get angry
with him for being a bad guy, too. Paul Walker is OK as the undercover cop,
but any good-looking actor could have filled the role. The folks making up
Dom's team - Michelle Rodriguez, Jordana Brewster, Chad Lindberg, Johnny
Strong and Matt Shulze - are all supportive, if a little bland. A love
interest between Diesel and Rodriguez simply does not work - not their
fault. Chad Lindberg, as Dom's brilliant, but dyslexic, mechanic, Jesse
gets to play up the troubled martyr role well enough. Don't look for Oscars
here though.
The screenplay by Gary Scott Thompson, Erik Bergquist and David Ayer is
action packed and has some slickly executed race scenes. The cars, ranging
from souped up Toyotas to NOS (nitrous oxide) boosted Volkswagen Jettas,
are what the teens and twenties are going to see, and we get some good,
though not great, racing.
The F/X are a combo of live action and computer-generated images and look
very good. You won't have tires and fenders flying off the screen at you, a
la "Driven," which is a very good thing. The CGI stuff is so convincingly
done the line between computer-generated action and live is agreeably
blurred and works well. The action-packed hijack, which is the showcase for
the flick, is straight out of "Speed," but is so tightly wound it keeps
your attention with slick car stunts and crash bang action.
"The Fast and the Furious" is B-movie entertainment that is ideal for the
drive-in on a warm summer's night - if you can find a drive-in still alive
and kicking. The tweenies will love it. In my town, the kids are planning
to meet, with their hot cars, and head to the theater en masse on the
opening weekend. Their exuberance will be well met. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
Lady Lara Croft (Angelina Jolie) is a rich and pampered heiress whose
hobbies are travel, photography, foreign language and visiting remote
archaeological sites. But this is just camouflage for her real passions:
raiding tombs, foiling bad guys and, now, saving the world in the
long-anticipated "Lara Croft: Tomb Raider"
Good, bad or indifferent it doesn't matter a hoot what critics think about
the live action adaptation of the most popular interactive video character
in history. Lara Croft has been a fantasy figure to millions of horny
teenage boys and a role model icon to a like number teen girls, so no
matter what anyone says, this is going to be a big hit. I'm talking
franchise.
Unfortunately, there is little more than a video game in this star vehicle
for Oscar-winner Jolie. Angelina does a fine job with her extreme physical
performance, doing many of her own stunts. She is capable, smart and sassy
and shoots really big guns. Director Simon West and cinematographer Peter
Menzies work hard to keep the statuesque actress front and center for most
of the film. There isn't much depth to Jolie's performance, thesp-wise, but
she cuts a good action figure.
As if anyone that is going to see "Tomb Raider" really cares, there is a
story here. Every 5000 years, all of the planets in our Solar System come
into alignment at the precise moment there is a solar eclipse. At that
instant, when the eclipse is full, a power will be unleashed that will give
man the power of God, the power to control time. The Illuminists, an
ancient cult that has prepared (apparently for 5000 years) for this moment,
need to find the two halves of "the all-seeing eye" and join them at the
height of the alignment to take command of time.
Lara's dad, Lord Richard Croft (Jon Voight), it turns out, was one of the
Illuminists, but secretly worked to stop the cult's plan and save mankind.
His mysterious death leaves Lara in a quandary until he returns to her from
the grave in the form of a read-this-after-I'm-dead letter. The clues he
leaves point her to the plot of the Illuminists and daddy appoints Lara to
take on his quest and put a stop to the menacing scheme.
Lara has to contend with bad guys, of course, and is prepared to go
toe-to-toe with the cult's chief henchman, Manfred Powell (Iain Glen), a
suave, handsome, ruthless adventurer who has plans of his own for the
all-seeing eye. It's a race against the clock, the planets  and Powell as
Lara must travel to the corners of the Earth to find the two pieces of the
ancient triangle before the bad guys do.
The cast is a bland mix of unexciting characters that have little do except
help or hinder Lara. Noah Taylor (the young David Helfgott in "Shine") is
Lara's sidekick, Bryce, who is supposed to be some kind of techno-geek, but
comes across as just a plain geek. Iain Glen is a good-looking villain and
I thought a love/hate relationship was going to develop between him and
Lara. It turns out to be hate only. Chris Barry is given little to do as
Lara's loyal butler, Hillary, wasting what could have been a good
character. Daniel Craig, as Croft's once-colleague/now-adversary Alex West,
is underutilized. Finally, in typical Hollywood style, Jon Voight, Jolie's
real-life dad, gets work playing the same role in the movie. (One editorial
note: Jolie's breasts should have received their own billing, they are so
prominent in near every scene, with a tantalizing hint of exposure in more
than one scene.)
Production is uneven. There are lavish sets throughout, but there is a
fakeness to most of it that makes me think "soundstage" not "far-flung
ancient archaeological sites." The fight sequences are pretty good and will
entertain the fans as Jolie brings Lara Croft to life. A whole passel of
writers were involved in creating the story and the script and it feels
stilted. It's a succession of action-story-action-story sequences that have
the feel of the video game that spawned it all.
Fans will be in heaven as they watch the personification of their
electronic idol on the big screen. For the rest of us, go to another movie.
It's pretty much what I expected and, not being a fan, I give "Lara Croft:
Tomb Raider" a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Diamond Men (2000)
Eddie Miller (Robert Forster) is a traveling jewelry salesman whose life on
the road has spanned over 30 years until one day he has a heart attack.
Now, considered a liability by the front office, Eddie learns that he is
about to lose his longtime sales circuit to another. Adding insult to
injury, he also learns that he has to show the ropes of the road to this
new guy, Bobby Walker (Donnie Wahlberg), in "Diamond Men."
Robert Forster, who has maintained a low profile in films despite his
decades in the business, came back into the limelight with his perf in the
1997 Quentin Tarantino movie, "Jackie Brown." With "Diamond Men" the
veteran actor stars as a solitary, recently widowed jewel salesman who has
run the roads of his Pennsylvania territory for decades. After his sudden
heart attack he is informed by his younger boss that he is now a poor
insurance risk and has to give up the only work life he has really known.
With little guarantee of continued employment in the company, he is also
told that he is the one who will train his replacement. The only commitment
he can get from his condescending boss is the vague "we'll do our best" to
keep the veteran salesman employed.
Then, like an additional slap to the injury of losing his job, Eddie is
saddled with Bobby, whose total sales experience stems from two years of
servicing vending machines. Brash, flashily dressed and virtually
unschooled in sales etiquette, the young know-it-all presumes from the
start to grasp more than his mentor. He resists, at first, the wisdom of
the road dispensed by Eddie but soon learns that the older man knows what
he is doing and it behooves the rookie to pay attention. As the barriers
come down between them, during the weeks of training and traveling the
roads of Pennsylvania, the pair becomes friends and a mutual bonding
begins.
As Eddie and Bobby get to know, and like, each other they both receive an
education. Bobby learns the subtlety of the jewelry business, how to act
around a client and, most important, how to close a sale. Eddie gets
reintroduced to a joie de vie that he hasn't had since his wife went into
the years-long bout with cancer that eventually took her life, leaving
Eddie with a void that he fills with his work. He is scared and insecure
when Bobby coerces him to go to a "massage" parlor, especially when his
masseuse uncovers a giant eyeball tattooed on her chest. Bobby feels so
strongly about helping his muse enjoy life, he then fixes him up with a
mature, attractive woman, Katie (Bess Armstrong), not realizing that she
has her own working girl past.
There is a palpable chemistry between Forster and Wahlberg as the two very
different, generationally separated diamond men have to first, tolerate
each other (especially Eddie towards Bobby), then, accept each other and,
eventually and believably, become good friends. Bess Armsrong is perfect as
the love interest for Eddie and gives dimension to her perf as a woman with
a past but, nonetheless, a good woman. She is the spark that allows Eddie
to live once again. Supporting cast is scant but character actor George Coe
is convincing as one of Eddie's oldest customers and a close friend who
falls for a much younger woman, to his own detriment. Jasmine Guy is
likable as Tina, the lady who runs Bobbie's favorite "massage parlor" and
has a genuine affection for the young fellow.
Techs are solid with crisp lensing by John Huneck and a varied production
that brings you into the life, on the road, of a traveling salesman. The
small town-feel of the little motels, the family restaurants and the
mom-and-pop jewelry stores that Eddie and Bobby frequent puts you in the
heartland of America in a very real way.
One problem I have with the screenplay, by helmer Daniel M. Cohen (based,
loosely, on his father's own life as a traveling salesman), stems from the
abrupt changing of gears as the story shifts from a buddy/road movie with a
nice building of the chemistry between Eddie and Bobby to a dramatic turn
where a rushed introduction of larceny changes the mood of the film. The
drama that unfolds is set up, perfunctorily, in the beginning of the film
and makes this crime portion feel tacked on and contrived. The upbeat final
coda takes away some of the sourness of the last third of the flick and you
come out of "Diamond Men" with, fortunately, a positive outlook as our
heroes, in the end, are winners. This is as it should be.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
Dreams, strange characters, sexy and troubled women, a mystical black box
and its blue key and a sinister air drive the bizarre drama as
director/writer David Lynch takes us into his own unique view of the world
with "Mulholland Drive." Naomi Watts stars as a squeaky-clean, fresh-faced
actress named Betty Elms, straight out of the boondocks of Canada, who
comes to Hollywood to find fame and fortune but, instead meets, in her
aunt's shower, a mysterious, beautiful woman, Rita (Laura Harring). Rita
has a pocketbook stuffed with hundred-dollar bills and no memory after
being in a car accident on the titular road.
Betty offers to help Rita learn about herself and regain her memory.
Meanwhile, Fellini-looking film director Adam (Justin Theroux) is being
coerced by his backers, the Castigliane brothers (Dan Hedaya and
"Mulholland Drive" composer Angelo Badalementi), to put their chose of
actress as the star of the helmer's pic. Adam refuses, trashes the
brothers' car then hides out in a Hollywood fleabag hotel, only to find out
that his assets are frozen.
Betty is awakened from sleep by a strange and mysterious guy called The
Cowboy only to learn that the her meteoric success is only a dream and she
must cope with the reality of her situation - out of work and without
prospect, except to use what God gave her to try and get ahead. Rita, it
turns out, is the star and she has the attention of director Adam, now back
in control.
David Lynch, as a filmmaker, is most definitely an acquired taste. Which
explains why, for the first time I can recall in quite a while, years
maybe, people walked out of the screening I attended. If  not forewarned,
the average movie bear would be hard-pressed to see just what it is about
Lynch that causes him to have such a dedicated following. The director's
style, since he broke ground with "Eraserhead," is to use sparse dialog,
slow almost languid camera work and long bouts of quietude throughout his
films, coupled with his offbeat storylines and characters. "Mulholland
Drive" is no exception.
Be prepared, when you sit down to watch "Mulholland Drive" for the
director's unique perspective on telling a story. He treats things that are
good and nice as superficial and destined to be replaced by those things
that rise up from the sordid underbelly of the human psyche. His main
characters represent a duality of good/bad, but almost invariably, the bad
comes to prominence - see the director's nightmarish "Blue Velvet" and the
near-incomprehensible but enthralling "Lost Highway." While "Mulholland
Drive" doesn't have the exquisitely evil character of the other films,
Dennis Hopper and Robert Blake, respectively, there is the patented
Lynchian undertone of the sinister side of man within and throughout the
film.
Acting, like the dialogue, is sparse as the thesps deliver their lines in
the slow, deliberate manner what couples with the director's laconic method
of telling a story. This tale is almost linear in nature, somewhat of a
departure from the episodic sequencing he normally exhibits. Lynch
collaborator, cinematographer Peter Demming, provides the requisite moody
camera work to carry forth the story and make the film look interesting.
His close-up camerawork of the attractive female leads has a texture and
feel that brings out their beauty. Production designer Jack Fisk is
thoroughly in sync with the director and gives a life to the set design
that complements the film. A keynote of the flick is a fabulous musical
rendition of a foreign language version of the great Roy Orbison song,
"Crying," that blew me away. The oft-eerie score, by Badalementi, helps
maintain the sinister undertone that Lynch is striving for.
If you're headed out to the theater and are looking for a bit of mindless
Hollywood entertainment, do NOT buy tickets for "Mulholland Drive." But, if
you are a fan of David Lynch or are up to do a little experimentation at
the movies (which I encourage), then this will, at the very least, have you
thinking. This one is for the brave at heart (it is 21/2 hours long) and I
give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
Steven Spielberg has relinquished the directing reins of his successful
dino franchise and gives Joe Johnston ("Jumanji") a chance to play with the
big boys in "Jurassic Park III."
A friend described "JP3," for me, without seeing it: Adventurers (with Dr.
Grant (Sam Neill) in tow) arrive clandestinely on Monster Island - it's
called Isla Sorna, here. They meet a big, mean dinosaur - introducing the
new kid, the Spinosaurus - have some of their number eaten, then run away.
They see big, cuddly dinos, are chased again by another meanie, and run
away. They make their way to "the compound," where more mean dinos try to
eat them. Get chased, run away, get chased, run away, get chased, run away.
My friend was dead on describing this cookie cutter effort from start to
finish. Now, that's scarier than the monsters.
The neat thing about the first "Jurassic Park" flick was the fresh,
never-before-seen prehistoric world created by Michael Crichton and put up
on the big screen by Spielberg. It was exciting to see T-Rex for the first
time or chew your nails as the raptors hunted down the youngsters. Sure
there was a lot of hokum with the kids being the heroes, saving the adults
from being eaten, but, we could get over the Spielbergian clichés and have
a good time. This brave new cinema world was visited again, sadly, with the
mishmash that was "Jurassic Park 2: The Lost World." A cross between the
original, "The Road Warrior" and "Godzilla," the second outing just
rehashed the new technology, poked some fun at itself and monster movies,
but was pretty routine, and sometimes boring, with its "more is better"
attitude.
This third (and undoubtedly not the last if this makes money) in the series
uses formula, rather than originality, to convey its conventional
man-against-monster yarn. The newness has worn off the franchise and it is
now more of the same. What caused us to wow and wonder in 1993 has become
commonplace in 2001. The F/X developed nearly a decade ago have been
improved and made even more seamless, but there is not the quantum leap
that Spielberg and company made with the debut of the original "Jurassic
Park."
The story - the first of the franchise not adapted from a Michael Crichton
book - doesn't try to invent anything new as it tells its tale of man
against nature, albeit a nature artificially designed by man. The team of
writers - Peter Buchman, Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor - provides an
action/adventure yarn that is exactly as my friend described it to me.
There are no surprises and few logical ties to the original. For example,
in "JP1" there were no Spinosaurases or flying Pteranodons, but, a few
years later, they have miraculously evolved from nothing. A T-Rex is going
to make little T-Rexes, not Spinos. It is insulting to the fans of the
franchise to be talked down to by the filmmakers. Don't they realize that
fans notice these details? Some of us do have an attention span longer than
15 minutes, we should tell them.
I hope Sam Neill gets a good paycheck for this outing. The actor goes
through the motions as Dr. Alan Grant and is left to mouth such lines as
"Nobody move!" And that is about it for this veteran thesp. William H. Macy
and Tea Leoni, as the divorced couple looking for their lost child on
Monster Island (that's the basis for the "GP3" story), are adequate.
Handsome Alessandro Nivola is conflicted (or constipated, it's hard to
tell) as Dr.G's assistant. There is, of course, a kid - Trevor Morgan - as
the focus of the search and, yes, he's smarter than the adults. The rest of
the cast members, including Michael Jeter, are simply items on the dino
lunch menu. Laura Dern reprises her role as Dr. Ellie Sattler and, with
about 10 seconds of screen time, saves the day, long-distance.
Technically, as one would expect in a film with Steven Spielberg as an
executive producer, this is a high-tech wonder of CGI and animatronics. The
glitter has worn off since T-Rex first thumped his foot down, but the
craftsmanship given to putting life into these prehistoric creatures should
be lauded. The mechanical F/X, like a Spino attack on the adventurers
trapped inside the wrecked fuselage of their plane, are first rate.
Production design, by Ed Verreaux, does a fine job creating the lush jungle
and dangerous compound sets for the monsters to play in.
Maybe it's time for the "Jurassic Park" park franchise to join hands with
Toho and Godzilla. I can picture it now. The dinosaurs have taken over the
United States and its up to Godzilla, Mothra, Rodan and the rest of the
boys from Japan, to save the world and kick some Jurassic butt. I'd go to
see it. In the meantime, I give "Jurassic Park III" a C+.

Title
Review for Curse of the Jade Scorpion, The (2001)
C.W. Briggs (Woody Allen) is the top investigator at the North Coast
Fidelity and Casualty Insurance Company. His old school manner conflicts
with the modern business ideas of newly hired efficiency expert Betty Ann
Fitzgerald (Helen Hunt) and the two butt heads constantly. When, during a
coworker's birthday party, a mystic named Voltan (David Ogden Stiers)
chooses the two as his subjects, the hypnotic suggestion he gives them
turns out to be more than just a parlor trick in Woody Allen's latest
flick, "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion."
The Woodman has, for a number of his later films, reached a nadir in his
filmmaking career, especially when compared to those of his heyday like
"Annie Hall" and "Manhattan." His more recent films, like "Shadow and Fog"
and "Celebrity" were almost painful to watch - if you could stand to watch
them at all. He made up some lost ground with "Sweet and Lowdown," mainly
through the efforts of the film's star, Sean Penn. The problem, I have
found, is the diminished quality of the writing by Allen, himself. Even in
his "funny" films there is a lack of pith when compared to his earlier
works.
"The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" reps a partial return to Woody's old
style, but, in the end, it's the lack of depth and less than sparkling
humor that keeps his latest work on the middle ground of his long career.
Sure, there are the one-liners that are a throwback to his old ways - C.W.
"How'd you like it if I hit you?" Tough rich chick Laura Kensington
(Charlize Theron) "How would you like it if I hit you back?" C.W. "Now
that's beginning to sound like fun." - but they certainly are not on a par
with his best work.
That's not to say that "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion" isn't fun. Woody
Allen is one of America's great filmmakers; he just doesn't produce the
great works he used to. Still, for late summer entertainment, it is a
pleasure to watch Allen play the quasi-hardboiled insurance investigator,
Briggs, as he uses old-fashioned instinct, gumshoe work, snitches and
informants to break one tough case after another. The modernity of 1940,
though, spells change for C.W.'s company when his boss, Chris Magruder (Dan
Aykroyd), hires Betty Ann Fitzgerald to shake things up and make the place
more efficient. Betty Ann thinks C.W. is a dinosaur in the business and he
thinks she is something that rhymes with "witch." The pair are always at
odds over how to run the business and are constantly bickering.
When Voltan, at their comrade George's birthday party at a local nightclub,
puts C.W. and Betty Ann under his spell and gives each a hypnotic
suggestion - the trigger words are Constantinople for him and Madagascar
for her - he tells them that they are madly in love with each other. It's
great fun for all, except for Magruder, who is having a clandestine affair
with his efficiency expert. Later, when Briggs is alone, he gets a
mysterious phone call that leads off with the word "Constantinople." It's
Voltan on the other end of the line and the mystic instructs C.W., now
under his spell, to break in to a wealthy clients home and steal every
jewel he can find. Of course, the next day the unwitting Briggs is ordered
to investigate the burglary and declares it an inside job.
When another rich client is burgled, Betty Ann decides to outsource the
investigation and brings in a pair of bumbling private eyes, Joe and Herb
Coopersmith (Peter Linari and Michael Mulheren), to solve the case, but not
before Voltan strikes again. Now, it's up to C.W. and Betty Ann, with the
help of their coworkers, to crack the crimes and clear Briggs's name.
Woody Allen, of late, doesn't delve far beyond his main characters in story
structure. His concentration is on the focal folks and he doesn't spend
much time developing or fleshing out any ancillary individuals around the
main characters. This is true with "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion," but it
is, still, an amusing little flick. My real problem lay between the two
lead characters. I never got the feeling that there would ever be an
attraction between C.W. and Betty Ann, so this required a real leap of
faith for me. Putting that aside, the adversarial conflict between the two
has the most punch in the film as Allen and Hunt play a couple of people
who love to hate each other.
Supporting cast is well rounded though no one is given a great deal to do.
David Ogden Stiers, as Voltan, gets to put a malevolent spin on his con
artist character. Charlize Theron, as the wealthy and caustic Laura, is
introduced as a Veronica Lake look-alike and puts a tough spin on her
character. If anything, Theron is underutilized in a role that she seems to
relish. Dan Aykroyd has proven himself to be an effective character actor
in the past and continues this track record as sleazy boss man Magruder.
Wallace Shawn and Brian Markinson, as C.W.'s coworkers, aren't given much
to do.
Techs are as expected in a Woody Allen film. Zhao Fei has lensed the last
several Allen films and works to keep the look consistent with the maker's
earlier efforts, but, boy, do I miss Gordon Willis behind the camera.
Costume designer Suzanne McCabe helps capture the look of the 40's and
longtime Allen collaborator Santo Loquasto does a solid job on the period
production design. Music, as one expects in a Woody Allen film, is perfect
with its mix of big band swing and combo jazz from the era.
One always hopes that Woody is going to produce another masterpiece like
"Manhattan." We don't get it with "The Curse of the Jade Scorpion," but we
do get a solid middlin' film from the guy. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)
William Forrester (Sean Connery), four decades ago, received the Pulitzer
Prize for his first and only novel, Avalon Landing, then seemed to drop
from the face of the earth. That is, until he crosses paths with 16-year
old Jamal Wallace (Rob Brown), an intelligent and talented neighborhood kid
who has the same passion for writing as the old recluse in Gus Van Sant's
"Finding Forrester."
Forrester is known in his Bronx neighborhood only as "The Window." The kids
playing basketball across the street see his shadowy figure looking out the
window of his run down brownstone, but no one knows anything about the man.
On a dare, Jamal agrees to sneak into the hermit's apartment and take
something as proof of his visit. The deep voiced, white haired man startles
the boy and, instead of procuring a trophy, he leaves his backpack
containing all his writing in the man's cluttered apartment. Jamal figures
that that's the last of it until the mystery man returns the pack - with
all of Jamal's notebooks annotated and graded. This begins a
teacher/student relationship that ends up going both ways, with each
learning life-changing lessons from the other.
I was struck, while watching "Finding Forrester," that I had been there
before, but I couldn't quite put my finger where and when, exactly. It
really isn't a mentor/apprentice flick like "The Karate Kid" where the
"kid" learns all manner of things from his guru that change his young life.
"Forrester" is a two-way road as the student/teacher relationship blurs
between Forrester and his protégé. As the story progresses, Jamal is not
the only one who gets to grow and mature both emotionally and
intellectually. By the end of the film, no surprise, the older man, too,
becomes a different, better person. Then, it dawned on me - "Man Without a
Face" and "Renaissance Man" both draw on the same premise. Unfortunately,
the two-way street story didn't work too well in either of those movies and
works only a little better in "Finding Forrester."
The reason that "Forrester" works better than other films of the same ilk
rests squarely on the shoulders of young Rob Brown. The newcomer, a
non-actor until now, literally dominates the screen with a fresh,
self-assured presence that allows Brown to play opposite the veteran
Connery like a true equal. Brown exhibits no tentativeness in his character
and delivers his soliloquies and intellectual bon mots with a certain hand.
When Jamal is derided by a snobbish yuppie as being ignorant about his
precious car, a BMW, the young man lets the guy have it with a complete
history of the marque that leaves the snob speechless. Brown pulls this and
other speeches off with a natural cadence that rings true. Plus, his
deftness at playing basketball (an important point of the story) only adds
to his character. It is an impressive debut performance that raises the
whole film up a notch.
Sean Connery is a seasoned thespian who has achieved worldwide icon status,
so there are certain expectations whenever he stars in a movie. He has
transitioned from the cool, suave James Bond persona into a senior
statesman of the acting profession. Now, he is usually positioned as the
wise sage who dispenses his knowledge to his various neophytes (see "Name
of the Rose," "The Untouchables," "Rising Sun" and "Entrapment," among
others). He does that in "Forrester," but with a more vulnerable spin on
the character. The vet thesp does not try to upstage his costar, either,
allowing the younger actor to effectively play off of Connery's character.
Supporting cast is left to fill out the background without intruding on the
action too much. F. Murray Abraham plays high school teacher Robert
Crawford, a less talented contemporary of William Forrester who questions
Jamal's education abilities when the boy gets a scholarship to Crawford's
prestigious private school. He's too obviously a device to allow the
arrogant teacher to get his comeuppance from Jamal and William by the end
of the flick. Anna Paquin is a fellow student of Jamal's at his new school.
The pretty young actress comes on strong, but her character becomes
ambiguous as a hint of romance with Jamal is introduced but goes nowhere,
as if the makers didn't have the guts to play out an inter-racial
relationship. Busta Rhymes, in the small part as Jamal's parking lot
supervisor brother Terrell, is a funny character, providing much of the
comic relief for the film. Other supporting parts are generic, including
Michael Nouri as Paquin's father.
The main attraction of novice screenwriter Mike Rich's script is the dialog
afforded to Connery and Brown, especially Brown. A film about the art and
craft of writing should have some discussion of the nuts and bolts of that
craft. Rich provides a good deal of such discussion, effectively, between
the two characters, often times to intellectually funny ends. Otherwise,
the story follows routine lines as Jamal faces the scandal and accusation
of plagiarism and Forrester overcomes his own fears to come out of his
reclusion and help his young friend.
Helmer Gus Van Sant, known for his edgy, independent filmmaking, like
"Drugstore Cowboy" and "My Own Private Idaho," has gone mainstream in
recent years. His "Good Will Hunting" brought him to "Hollywood." His
remake of Alfred Hitchcock's "Psycho" smacked of acceptance of Van Sant (if
not his lovingly crafted remake) by the big guys on the West Coast.
"Finding Forrester" lacks any of the helmer's earlier distinctive directing
style. It is straightforward, routine storytelling that lacks Van Sant's
mark, but helps make him a directing attraction for conventional movies.
Tech credits are solid, although the editor (Valdis Oskarsdottir) could
have used some judicious direction in cutting the film down from its near
140 minute run time to something that would have kept the movie tighter and
more viewable. As it is, you expect what is going to happen early on and I
got impatient waiting for the final resolution of the tale to get under
way.
"Finding Forrester" should get a decent draw, initially, because of its
megastar Connery, but the real reason to see it is for the remarkable debut
of Rob Brown. Now, here is a kid who is worth the price of admission. I
give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Krámpack (2000)
Dani (Fernando Ramallo) invites his best friend, Nico (Jordi Vilches), to
spend the summer holiday at the family beach house in southern Spain. The
cool thing is that Dani's parents are off on a trip of their own to Egypt.
Late night dates and house parties are the order of the day as the two boys
enter the next stage of their sexual awakening, but each takes a very
different path in "Nico and Dani."
This little coming-of-age flick is one of the most honestly rendered tales
about growing up that I have seen in a long time. Sophomore Spanish helmer
Cesc Gay (who cowrote the screenplay with Tomas Aragay) takes a very
conventional tale about two friends on the verge of adulthood and infuses
it with a refreshing approach of no excuses, no explanations for growing
up.
The two boys playing the title characters are naturals. Fernando Ramallo is
the experienced actor and plays Dani as a young man who finds his sexual
desires draw him to boys and not girls. Nico, on the other hand, had no
problems with his same sex adolescent explorations with Dani, but now is
very much into girls. When Dani's friend Elena (Marieta Orozco) and her
friend Berta (Esther Nubiola) arrive on the scene, Nico is thrilled with
the chance to be with a woman. Dani is not so inclined and wants his
boyhood closeness to Nico to continue unabated.
Director Cesc Gay, with his talented young actors, takes this simply story
of growing up and gives it a fresh direction that we don't usually see in
the American equivalent. Here, in "Nico and Dani," there is no judgement
made over the boys' choices in life - Dani decides on a gay lifestyle,
while Nico shrugs off his friend's decisions and makes his own hetero
choice. The film leads the boys to the crossroads of life and they must
each choose their own path to follow.
"Nico and Dani" is a world class teen film that has meaning in many
different cultures and countries, not just Spain. This is the kind of
little, independent film that has so much to tell its teen target audience
that I hope it can succeed internationally. I wish there were more such
honestly rendered and thoughtfully told coming-of-age films. I give it a
B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Captain Corelli's Mandolin (2001)
The beautiful Greek Island of Cephallonia was a peaceful jewel in the
Ionian Sea until 1941 when the war ravaging Europe landed on its shores.
Italian troops are sent to garrison the island and Captain Antonio Corelli
(Nicolas Cage), a conscript sent to the foreign land, falls in love with a
lovely local girl, Pelagia (Penelope Cruz), in "Captain Corelli's
Mandolin."
Months ago, we received the first of the video press material for "Captain
Corelli's Mandolin." Watching the trailer tape way back then, I was
reluctant about the movie. It looked like a smarmy romance, the kind that
really doesn't hold a lot of appeal for me. The press stuff kept trickling
in and a sense of mild dread took over as the film's release date drew
near. Finally, word came announcing the advanced screening, so I bit the
bullet (after all, it does have Penelope Cruz) and went to see what I
expected to be nothing more than a chick flick. Boy, was I wrong.
John Madden ("Shakespeare in Love") brings the popular Louis de Bernieres
novel, Captain Corelli's Mandolin, to the big screen in a lush, beautifully
crafted movie that turns out to be more than just a love story. Captain
Corelli, an unwilling draftee into Mussolini's invading army, loves life
and the music he plays on his mandolin. When he is stationed, with his
artillery battery, on Cephallonia, he sees beautiful Pelagia amidst the
island's citizens and is immediately smitten. When Antonio is billeted in
the house owned by her father, Dr. Iannis (John Hurt), her resentment of
the invaders is softened and the Italian officer works his way into the
young woman's heart. A deep, mutual love is born.
The horrors of the war have left the small Greek island unmolested and
Italy's powerful ally, Nazi Germany, has left the Balkan country to the
Italians to rule. But, in 1943, when Mussolini falls from power, his German
masters take a hand in the occupation of Greece. When Italy surrenders to
the Allies, the Nazis demand the surrender of arms by all of the Italian
forces. Rumors fly about Italian troops being imprisoned by the Germans and
the soldiers occupying Cephallonia decide to resist their now-former
allies. Battalions of crack German mountain troops are sent to quell the
mutineers and the out-numbered and out-gunned Italians pay the deadly
consequences.
The focus, as you would expect in a romance-based story, is on the two lead
characters. Antonio and Pelagia make a handsome couple and some sparks fly
in their romantic scenes, but, overall, Cage and Cruz don't quite have the
chemistry to make this an epic love story. The pair is nice but the screen
doesn't burn up when they're together. This could have been a disaster for
the movie, but the quality of the production, a strong supporting cast, the
gorgeous locale, the outstanding tech values and exciting battle scenes,
plus the depiction of a little know slice of history all contribute in
making this a solid all-around film.
John Hurt, a truly great actor, gives depth to his character, Dr. Iannis,
the island's physician. The doctor is an enlightened individual, shunning
the Greek Orthodox religion of the islanders, but dedicated to the people
of Cephallonia and, in particular, his daughter, Pelagia. Film icon Irene
Papas appears as the mother of Mandras (Christian Bale), an illiterate
Greek fisherman who had the heart of Pelagia until Antonio Corelli's
arrival. With just a look the veteran actress tells volumes of the hopes
and fears for her son. The actors making up Corelli's artillery battery,
called La Scalas for their propensity to break into the songs of Puccini
and other great Italian composers, provide a musical cameo perf that gives
a human face to the occupiers.
John Toll's cinematography is, in a word, stunning. The pallet of colors
that his cameras pick up give a lushness that complements the island
locales. The look of the film is so inviting it makes you want to spend
your days drinking in the beauty of Cephallonia. Other techs are on a par
with Toll's exquisite lensing. Jim Clay and his production design team had
the daunting task of creating the film's Greek island village virtually
from scratch. An earthquake devastated the island in 1953, leaving little
of the old-fashioned structures needed for the film. The recreation of the
capital city of Argostoli is nothing less than remarkable. Costume designer
Alexandra Byrne expertly fits the period, clothing the Italian and German
troops in real looking uniforms and the islanders in homespun attire. The
battle sequences between the Italians and Germans are deftly staged and
wrenchingly realistic looking.
The history depicted in "Captain Corelli's Mandolin" covers territory
virtually unknown. The only other film that deals with the Italian
occupation of Greece and its islands was the charming Best Foreign Film
winner several years ago, "Mediterraneo," but that comedic viewpoint did
not get down to the nitty gritty of the war itself. If only the romantic
center of "Corelli" had equaled the exquisite production. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dayereh (2000)
In a nation where a woman cannot even buy a bus ticket without her
husband's permission or smoke a cigarette in public, much less obtain an
abortion, director Jafar Panahi delves into the lives of women on the wrong
side of the law in Iran in "The Circle."
>From the very start of "The Circle" we are thrust into the alien,
male-dominated society of Iran that treats its women as possessions, not
people. An old woman stands outside the small door to a hospital maternity
ward. The door slides opens and a nurse tells her that her daughter has had
a beautiful baby girl. The door slides shut. Obviously agitated, the woman
knocks at the door and asks another nurse about the baby's sex. Again,
"it's an adorable girl," she is told. "They'll want a divorce!" she moans
about her in-laws as she dejectedly leaves the hospital.
This extended scene of despair summarizes the film's theme of the harsh
life for women, especially an ex-convict, in Iran. The old woman's misery
is just the lead into one of the most powerful, thought-provoking and
eye-opening films to come to the screen this year. Iran's Islamic society
stridently keeps women in a second-class, subservient role where the men
running the country define a woman's "rights". Conditions, from a western
viewpoint, are severe, at best, for the average Iranian woman.  Panahi's
"circle" of women is an even more harshly treated subgroup - the sisterhood
of women who served time in Iranian prison.
As the old woman leaves the hospital, she crosses paths with three younger
women, dressed head to toe in the black robes and the ever-ready chadir
required by Islamic law. There is something wrong as they try to make a
phone call to a friend who can help get tickets for the three to flee the
city, hopefully to a place where the air is not so oppressive. But, no one
answers the phone. Desperate for money, one of them takes their one
valuable possession, a slender gold necklace, and tries to sell it on the
street. A scuffle ensues and she (though not the men she tries to sell the
trinket to) is arrested, as her friends look on helpless to intervene.
Arezou (Maryiam Parvin Almani) and Nargess (Nargess Mamizadeh) now must
fend for themselves. The older Arezou takes the little money they have and
gets Nargess onto a bus that she hopes will bring her young friend back to
the wonderful world of her childhood. It doesn't and Nargess must seek out
another convict, Pari (Fereshteh Sadr Orafai), for help. The story shifts
to Pari, who has her own set of problems. She's a prison escapee, single
and pregnant, not a safe combination for a woman and Pari goes to another
prison sister for assistance. The story then weaves in a heart rendering
tale about a pretty little girl, dressed in her best clothes, abandoned by
her unwed mother (Fatemah Naghavi) in hopes that she'll be taken by good
and kind people.
The end of the film bookends the beginning with another small door sliding
shut. The finality of this action closes out a story that leaves you
pondering just how it would feel to live under such repression, always
fearful and always vulnerable. It's a story about a man's world shown from
the woman's view and it's not an appealing picture of life in Iran. But, it
is a beautifully made film by the maker of the wonderful childhood story,
"The White Balloon," showing Panahi's deft versatility as a world-class
filmmaker.
The cinema verite-style camerawork helps carry forward the tension these
women live with, day to day, as they strive to survive and stay out of
prison - and it doesn't take much to get sent to prison. The look of the
film, coupled with the natural efforts by the actresses, makes it feel
real, almost documentary-like, and brings us to see a very different social
order. "The Circle" is a powerhouse of a film and I give it an A.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mars (2001)
It's 175 years into the future and Mars is colonized by over ˝ million
Earthlings. To ensure order on the pioneer planet terrestrial laws apply
and are enforced vigorously by the MPF (Mars Police Force). When an
unmanned trained arrives from a far flung mining station, the only one
aboard, handcuffed, is Lt. Melanie Ballard (Natasha Henstridge), and she
has a horrifying story to tell her superiors in John Carpenter's "Ghosts of
Mars."
The lieutenant was second in command on a team sent to bring in James
"Desolation" Williams (Ice Cube), the red planet's most notorious criminal.
Desolation is being held at Shining Canyon mining station, but when the
cops arrive, they find the place deserted except for those held in the
fortified confines of the local jail. Commander Helena Braddock (Pam Grier)
splits up her crew, sending Ballard and two troopers, Kincaid and Descanso
(Clea Duvall and Liam Waite), to locate Williams. Braddock and
smart-mouthed Sergeant Jericho (Jason Statham) reconnoiter the compound and
find some of the colony's inhabitants - headless corpses hung upside down
in a gruesome, ritualistic display.
The cause of the slaughter is soon apparent when Braddock spots the
remaining miners, possessed by some force that has rendered them inhuman.
Self-mutilation is the norm for these creatures, led by a Marilyn Manson
wannabee, Big Daddy Mars (Richard Cetrone), and the creepy critters are out
for blood. The beleaguered cops and the few still-human survivors of the
colony must battle the vicious monster of Mars until the train that took
them into Shining Canyon returns. It's kill or be killed, or worse, be
possessed by the ghosts of the distant planet.
"Ghost of Mars" is meat and potatoes filmmaking. John Carpenter is known,
of late, for some truly hack work, like "Escape from LA" and the
presumptuously titles "John Carpenter's Vampires." With "Ghosts" the helmer
works from a script co-written with Larry Sulkis and tells a fairly
conventional cops against the bad guys. Setting it on Mars gives it
ready-made sci-fi status, but it is, still, a routine survival story.
Natasha Henstridge is not bad as the veteran Mars copper. She is too pretty
and well made up for the character and is too Hollywood looking, but she
acquits herself with the physical moves required.  Ice Cube has done the
same sullen tough guy character too many times and, while likable in a
punch-you-in-the-face way, it's a carbon copy perf we've seen before. Jason
Statham, with his Cockney accent and insouciant ways, makes himself notable
and should get more work after "Ghosts of Mars." Blaxploitation icon Pam
Grier is, sadly, used up very quickly and loses her head early on. Almost
everyone else is alien fodder, including the aliens.
Techs aren't as cheesy as in "Escape from LA," but there is an
artificiality to the whole thing that never lets you forget you are
watching a movie. The story goes through its paces with the requisite
explosions, machine gun fire and alien butt kicked as the steadily
dwindling number of humans try to get away from the possessing Martians.
The last moments of the end of the film give rise to the possibility of a
sequel, if the box office numbers are good. I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreiews.com

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
Gwen Harrison (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and Eddie Thomas (John Cusack) have
been romantic idols to the American public for nine films. When their
marriage broke up a year and a half ago, her career went down the tubes and
he ended up as a patient at a California wellness clinic. Now, with their
last film about to hit the street, PR maven Lee Phillips (Billy Crystal) is
given the task of bringing the estranged couple together, with the help of
Gwen's sister, Kiki (Julia Roberts), to save their careers and their film
(and his job) in "America's Sweethearts."
Screenwriters Crystal and Peter Tolan provide a modern romantic comedy that
is set in the world of the Hollywood "press junket." The last film Gwen and
Eddie did together is scheduled for its debut, but there are problems. The
divorced couple, both of whose careers are currently in the toilet, need to
make a show of reconciliation or lose their audience and a lot of money for
the studio. Complicating matters, the director, Hal Weidmann (Christopher
Walken doing a riff on real director, the late Hal Ashby), has taken the
unfinished movie, named "Time Over Time," hostage and won't let anyone see
it until the junket, not even studio head Dave Kingman (Stanley Tucci). Lee
has to do the most difficult juggling of his public relations career to
keep the press at bay and the stars conciliatory until Hal and his film
arrive.
Meanwhile, Gwen's sister and assistant, Kiki, has quietly undergone a
change since her sister's divorce. Since Eddie last saw her, right after
the breakup, she has lost 60 pounds and is not just a nice person (unlike
Gwen) she has turned from an ugly duckling into a beautiful swan. Eddie and
Kiki have always been close and, now that he has been separated from Gwen
for a while, he begins to see which sister really is the one for him. The
conflicted romantic comedy continues until the big day when Hal finally
delivers his film and shows it to the studio heads and the press. Then, all
hell breaks loose.
I had high hopes for "America's Sweethearts" what with its stellar ensemble
cast and all. Julia Roberts is actually developing into an actor and does a
good job as the self-deprecating, loyal sister to the star. She maintains
the nice-girl persona of the character throughout the film and, when the
now-svelte Kiki binges out on a huge breakfast from frustration with the
whole situation, she does it with vigor. Catherine Zeta-Jones, as Gwen, is
dead on as the shallow, selfish prima donna - "People have no idea what it
is like being me!" she whines - and is as unlikable as she is beautiful.
Cusak does the bedraggled, obsessive actor with his usual goofy charm.
Billy Crystal moves things along (and gives himself some of the funniest
lines, especially when acting opposite a large Doberman), both as writer
and performer and he does good PR shtick.
The problem that holds "America's Sweethearts" back is the completely
telegraphed story. There is little doubt, for the viewer, as to who ends up
with whom and how they get to where they are going. The actors play their
parts well, but the two-dimensional machinations of the script prevent
anything more than the obvious from happening so, by the end, you have the
whole thing figured out. There is slapstick galore and one-liners abound -
the Doberman gets to do the best visual gags in the film - but there isn't
nothing' new here. A bright distraction, near the end, is Hal's
presentation of his visionary film, changed from feature to documentary,
much to the consternation of soon-to-be ex-studio boss Kingman. Alan Arkin
gives a subtle, yet riotous, cameo as Eddie's wellness guide. He's supposed
to be an Indian wise man, but he plays it so sharp he keeps you guessing if
he's Eastern Indian or Native American.
Direction, by Joe Roth, is perfunctory and straightforward. He does it by
the numbers as he walks his cast down the line to the films inevitable
conclusion. Costuming, by Ellen Mirojnick (with Jeffrey Kurland responsible
for wardrobing Miss Julia), meets the superstar criteria of elegance and,
for Cusack, despondent seediness. Production design by Garreth Stover,
especially the selection of the remote location of the Hyatt Regency Lake
Las Vegas Resort, suits the Hollywood star mentality of "America's
Sweethearts." The prods show the money is there and the tech staff uses it
well.
A good cast and expensive production attributes can help a film but,
without a solid screenplay to hang it all on, you can never attain
greatness, whether it be comedy or drama. "America's Sweetheart" falls
smack in the middle of this dilemma and suffers for it. It will draw a good
size audience and will appeal to many with its good-natured pokes at the
Hollywood star machine. But, it never rises beyond the level set by the
routine, predictable screenplay and I give it a B-.

Title
Review for Before Night Falls (2000)
Winner of the Grand Jury Prize at the 2000 Venice Film Festival, "Before
Night Falls" tells of the life and the writings of Cuban exile Reinaldo
Arenas. The gay author spent years in and out of Cuba's jails for his
inflammatory prose and poetry before escaping to the United States in 1980.
Javier Bardem plays the persecuted writer and co-stars with the likes of
Johnny Depp, Sean Penn and Michael Wincott in a film by Julian Schnabel.
Javier Bardem does a fine job of portraying the intelligent, talented
Arenas as we follow him, first, as a young man showing an interest in the
written word (and men bathing), and, later, as he garners critical
attention for his first novel. He develops such a following and notoriety
that he comes under the scrutiny of Castro's police and their Russian
masters because of his deviant "capitalist" lifestyle. This begins a tale
of persecution and a personal fight for creative freedom that last up until
Arenas leaves his homeland in the Mariel Harbor exodus of 1980, when Castro
evicted all of Cuba's "deviants, homosexuals and mentally ill" to the
shores of the US.
The tone of the story of "Before Night Falls" is more political and social
in nature, showing Arenas' persecution for his homosexuality and his
politically motivated work. The machismo of Cuba is threatened by the
sexual revolution getting under way in the 50's and 60's around the world.
The oppressive totalitarian government actively tries to subdue this other
revolution with arrests of gays, sending them to cut sugarcane as
rehabilitation. Arenas never gave up, getting his written word out of the
country for publication by any means. At one point he even uses a
transvestite inmate's behind to smuggle out the pages of his latest tome.
(Check out who plays the transvestite.)
The depiction of Cuba, by Schnabel and production designer Salvador Parra,
over the years the story unfolds, is generic and doesn't give the feel that
"you are there." The main means used to show the Cuban location is by
having everyone walking around smoking cigars, even some of the women. The
scenes on the streets of Havana have an obvious movie set feel, pulling
attention away from the action
The screenplay, by Schnabel, Lazaro Gomez Carriles and Cunningham O'Keefe,
brings us, point by point, along the way as we follow Arenas through his
life, his incarcerations and escapes. Once he finally is freed, Arena
spends his last days with a disease we can only guess is AIDS - filmmaker
Julian Schnabel fails to tell us about it, so I can only guess. This kind
of omission detracts from the story, as it requires the viewer to
unnecessarily guess what's going on.
"Before Night Falls" is hopeful tragedy that shows the strength of the
human spirit under adversity. The tragedy is that not everyone is as
courageous and talented as Reinaldo Arenas, who, when he finally escapes
the oppression of Castro, realizes that he has lost his Cuba. Javier Bardem
is solid in his portrayal of Arenas, even if the script is weak. I give it
a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit r eelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Wo de fu qin mu qin (1999)
Businessman Luo Yusheng (Sun Honglei) is going home. His father recently
died and his mother  (Zhao Yuelin) insists that, following tradition, the
body be walked home from the hospital morgue many miles away. Luo balks at
the idea, but when he sees an old photo from his parents' youth, his
reminiscences of their locally historic courtship cause him to change his
mind and fulfill his mother's wish to walk with his father, one last time,
on "The Road Home."
Chinese filmmaker Zhang Yimou has been responsible for some of the world's
most beautifully rendered films since the start of his career. "Red
Sorghum," "Ju Dou" and "Raise the Red Lantern" dealt with such issues as
sex, political repression and male misogyny in lightly veiled personal
statements against the Chinese government's humanitarian policies. His
latest films, though, like "Not One Less" and the now-showing "The Road
Home," take on a more personal, gentle air.
"The Road Home" begins, in present day China, with Luo Yusheng making the
long, cold winter's journey home to Sanhetun, the tiny village of his
birth, to attend his father's funeral. The old man was a schoolteacher who
came to the town 40 years ago, fell in love and stayed, teaching the
children, until his recent death. Now, the man's mother insists that there
be a traditional funeral and her husband's body be carried back on the
shoulders of the village men. Luo thinks the demand unreasonable and tries
to persuade his mother to change her mind. But, as he gazes at an old
photograph of mom and dad when the were first married, he recalls the local
stories of their unique courtship and it's his mind that changes.
We are taken away from the stark black and white of the modern day story to
a lush and colorful time, 40 years before. The pretty, young Zhao Di, the
comeliest maiden in the village, learns that a new schoolteacher has been
assigned to their tiny hamlet and is pleasantly surprised to find Luo
Changyu (Hao Zheng) to be a darned handsome young man. Di unabashedly sets
her cap for the young man, against the advice of her elderly, blind
grandmother (Bin Li). The subsequent tale is a sweet remembrance of two
people falling in love.
Zhang Yimou has always created striking images on the screen, but has, in
recent years, taken on simpler stories that deal with the day-to-day
mechanics of life and living. Daily incidents like cooking food or
repairing a bowl are shown in great detail with a love of image that makes
you drink in every moment of such simple tasks. There is also a hint of
rebelliousness as the determined Di goes against the tradition of arranged
marriage. The pairing of Di and Luo because of love, not arrangement, makes
the courtship and subsequent nuptials a local legend, remembered by all,
even today.
Zhang Zi-Yi lights up the screen with her smile and, in one scene where Luo
first notices her, it is almost blinding. Her dazzling smile and animate
features are a plus since there is little dialogue and the story is
conveyed primarily with visual images. There is Di's painstaking
preparations of meals she hopes Luo will select during the lunch breaks as
the men of the village build the new schoolhouse. She spends days and weeks
trying to arrange a chance encounter with the teacher, even travelling
across the village to get water from the well near the school, but farther
from her home. (The well is used for subtle humor in one scene where
teacher Luo, noticing Di, tries to rush up and get water for himself. But,
a well-intentioned villager insists that the scholar is too important for
such menial tasks and struggles to wrest the buckets away from the eager
Luo. It's a funny, believable little scene.)
The bookends of the film, the man going home, is a movie unto itself as the
wash of emotions and remembrances help to change Luo Yusheng and honor his
mother's wish. Once his mind is changed, he seeks the help of the town's
mayor (Guifa Chang) to hire men from another village to help carry his
father's coffin home. When the day finally comes and the procession makes
its way on the long journey, the mayor gives back all the money, explaining
that over 100 of the old teacher's students have volunteered to help. The
others, who were hired for pay, refuse the money in honor of the deceased.
"The Road Home" is a world-class film that shows influences from other
countries. The distinctly western-sounding score by Bao San uses soaring
violins and a lone flute that sounds much like the music to "Braveheart."
Cinematography, by Yong Hou, is striking, especially his color work used in
the flashbacks. Zhang Yimou has always used colors prominently in his films
and Yong Hou utilizes them to stunning affect, especially for the
exteriors. Costume design, by Huamiao Tong, is terrific, particularly the
attention to Zhang Zi-Yi's outfits of bright pink and vivid red. Art
direction, by Juiping Cao, is nicely rendered and spans the decades
properly as what was once young is now old.
The true story, by Shi Bao from his novel "Remembrance," is a simple,
loving tale that wears its sentimentality like a badge of honor. It is
homage to our parents and an affirmation of love and loyalty that easily
spans cultures. It isn't a Chinese story, but a universal and human one. I
give "The Road Home" an A.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Krieger und die Kaiserin, Der (2000)
Writer/director Tom Tykwer made quite a splash, internationally, with his
surprisingly popular, hyper-kinetic film, "Run Lola Run." Now, he changes
gears, but keeps his star, Franka Potente, in the modern fairytale, "The
Princess and the Warrior."
Can a filmmaker who made his mark on world cinema with a fast-paced
81-minute action flick - the same story told, with a twist, three times -
pull off a two-plus hour movie that bridges romance, bank robbery and a
visit to an insane asylum? The answer is: sort of.
Sissi (Potente) is a psychiatric nurse who lives and works in a private
hospital. When an old friend asks her to collect an inheritance at a local
bank, as a favor, she takes a blind patient in tow and heads into the city,
away from the safety of the asylum. Meanwhile, a drifter, Bodo Riemer
(Benno Furmann), is being chased by supermarket security guards for
shoplifting and hitches a ride on the back of a trailer truck. The driver,
distracted by the unwanted hitcher, reacts too late as Sissi walks into his
path and is run down.
Not knowing what damage he has caused, Bodo seeks refuge from his pursuers
under the truck and, in a burst of heroics, saves Sissi's life with an
impromptu tracheotomy. He stays with the injured nurse until medical help
can be summoned, then disappears without a trace. Months later, the nearly
recovered Sissi begins a search for "the man" who saved her life. When she
finally finds him, the sad and angry Bodo wants nothing to do with her.
They have another chance encounter when Sissi arrives at the bank to
collect her friend's inheritance just when Bodo and his brother Walter
(Joachim Krol) are robbing it. Walter gets shot and has to be left behind,
but Sissi helps Bodo escape and brings him to her hospital to hide. As she
gets to know him, she comes to believe their meeting was not just chance,
but destiny.
I have to give Tykwer credit in his single-minded vision of this modern
fairytale. It is ambitious in its scope and tries to cover a lot of ground.
It's kind of like "Beauty and the Beast" meets "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's
Nest" with the shy princess searching for her savior, a reluctant hero who
has his own share of deep-seated psychological problems. When Sissi gives
Bodo asylum in the asylum, she begins a journey of self-discovery that
draws her closer to the troubled former soldier. She also learns the truth
about his past - a gas station explosion killed his girlfriend and Bodo has
never been able to cope with the death.
Throw into this mixture the botched bank robbery and the unexpected death
of Bodo's brother and Tykwer takes us on a low-key roller coaster ride that
tries hard to cover all of its bases, but, in the end, fragments in too
many directions. The extended "Cuckoo's Nest" sequence has characters
straight out of Ken Kesey's story. I half expected R.P. McMurphy to show
his face and demand to watch the World Series.
The characters are, in Sissi's case, shy and quiet, and Bodo's, sullen and
quiet, making this a pretty quiet movie, overall, especially when compared
to the raucous "Run Lola Run." Tykwer, with Johnny Kilmek and Reinhold
Heil, provide the music score (derivative of the likes of Bernard Herrmann)
that keeps tensions building, helping the too-long runtime feel just a bit
shorter. The tech aspects of the film are pretty nifty.
Tykwer tries to do too much with "The Princess and the Warrior." Part
fairytale, part romance, part self-awakening, part bank heist, there are
just too many parts. It's ambitious and obvious that the writer/director
sees greatness in himself, but he ain't no Krzysztof Kieslowski, at least
not yet. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Zamani barayé masti asbha (2000)
Ayoub is a hard-working young boy who is responsible for the care and
feeding of his brothers and sisters in a remote town near the Iran-Iraq
border. Their mother is dead and their father, a smuggler, is away most of
the time. When the local doctor tells them that their handicapped brother,
Madi, will die without an operation, Ayoub, without much hope but with a
lot of perseverance, tries to raise the money. His sister, Rojin, agrees to
marry an Iraqi Kurd to get the needed operation, but this, too, fails,
forcing Ayoub to even more desperate measures in the starkly beautiful
film, "A Time for Drunken Horses."
Over the past several years Iranian films have been seeping out of that
small country in a trickle that is, in reality, an emotional flood of
beautiful, thought provoking films that rival the best of western films. A
key element of many Iranian films, at least those we are fortunate to see
here, is the role of children in those films. Internationally prominent
Iranian filmmaker Abbas Kiarostami ("Where Is the Friend's Home?"), for
years, had created films based on the growing child population in his
country. This laid the path for others to follow in Iran's film community.
In 1995, Jafar Panahi created the wonderful "White Balloon" about a little
girl's quest to buy a lucky goldfish. Majid Majidi, in 1997, brought us
"Children of Heaven," a story about a brother and sister who concoct an
elaborate plan to hide the loss of a pair of shoes. He followed this up
with this year's "The Color of Paradise," a simple but multi-layered story
about a little blind boy and his father - this, in my mind, is one of the
best, most visually stunning and emotionally satisfying films this year.
Newcomer writer/director Bahman Ghobadi continues exploring the plight of
children in his rugged country with "A Time for Drunken Horses." The helmer
delves into the darker side of childhood with his tale of Ayoub and his
struggling, little family in the mountainous region of Kurdish Iran. Ayoub
becomes the head of his family after they learn of the death of their
smuggler father. On the heals of this shock comes word from the local
doctor that Madi, Ayoub's ailing dwarf brother, will die without a crucial
operation. Even with the surgery, little Madi may only live for 7 or 8
months. This matters not for the orphaned family and earning the money for
the operation becomes the priority of them all. In the hard, desolate land
of the border between Iran and Iraq, this is a near impossibility for the
hard-pressed little boy. An arranged marriage for Ayoub's sister Rojin also
fails to bring hope as her groom's mother reneges on the agreement to take
care of Madi, too. Ayoub then faces his greatest challenge as he fights
harsh conditions and the threat of ambush as he smuggles tires to earn the
money for Madi. The film ends with this quest unfulfilled, but with an
understanding of Ayoub and the rest.
Ghobadi treads on neo-realistic territory that filmmakers like Vittorio De
Sica ("The Bicycle Thief") first explored in films coming out of the
ravages of post-WW2 Europe. The Iranian filmmaker makes no effort to gloss
over the hard life of the folks populating his story who accept their
plight and privation. The poverty of his characters, according to the
helmer, is not a condition; it is a way of life. The wonderful thing about
"A Time of Drunken Horses" is that it doesn't just show the subjects' lives
to the viewer, it involves us in them. One scene has Ayoub, Madi and little
sister Ameneh, while running away from Iraqi border guards, stopping to
give Madi his medicine. There is no water to take the pills, so the
siblings show little Madi how to make spit to swallow them. I found myself
unconsciously trying to make spit, too. This is involving filmmaking.
Though the story is simple and the film's budget minuscule, there is no
lacking in artistry. The screenplay, by the helmer, grabs you early on and
carries you through, emotionally, right to the end. Coupled with this
involving story is the masterful cinematography by Sa'ed Nikzat who
captures the stark beauty of the rugged Iranian countryside in lovingly
composed shots that could second as a photo montage in a gallery. The utter
simplicity of the filmmaking evinces an elegance that we do not see in
American films, regardless of the budget. In "A Time for Drunken Horses,"
images and expressions speak volumes to the viewer.
Another remarkable thing in the films from Iran, at least the ones I've
seen, is the capable use of non-actors and the marvelous performances the
directors are able to garner from them all. Ayoub Ahmadi breaks your heart
and impresses you with his resilience and love for his family. Watching the
boy, it's hard to believe he's not a professional actor. Little Ameneh
Ekhitar, as the younger sister, is yet another in the line of adorable
little sisters that seems to be a staple of Iran's films. Most heart
wrenching, though, is Mehdi Ekhitar as the diminutive little brother, Madi.
The helplessness and need of the little boy is countered with the touching
warmth and caring devotion of his siblings. You fear, while watching the
film, that something bad will happen to him. The tension over Madi's fate
is palpable.
It's hard to really describe a film like "A Time for Drunken Horses" to an
audience used to the rapid-fire action and dialogue of Western film. The
pleasure is in watching the story, and its strife, slowly and quietly
unfolds as it draws you into the emotional complexity of the seemingly
simple story. The best way, for the film buff, to experience this is to go
see it.
The film is part of the Shooting Gallery's release schedule and will only
be at the art houses for a couple of weeks, so catch it if you can.
Oh, yeah. The title refers to the horses and mules used by the smugglers to
move contraband over the rugged mountains between Iran and Iraq. It's so
cold for the poor animals, the smugglers mix alcohol with their water to
make them docile while carrying the onerous loads in the dead of winter.
It's a subtle, off-hand indictment of the cruelty these creatures must
endure.
I give "A Time for Drunken Horses" an A-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Men of Honor (2000)
Carl Brashear (Cuba Gooding, Jr.) was born to a poor share cropping family
in the Deep South. His daddy's admonishment of "don't end up like me"
drives the ambitious lad to seek a life away from the farm and its toil.
Carl becomes the first African-American to serve as a diver in the United
States Navy, fighting racial prejudice, military bureaucracy and even
crippling injury to fulfill his dream in "Men of Honor."
"Men of Honor" is, at its heart, a guy flick. The inspiring biography of
Carl Brashear is made in the tradition of John Ford's 1957 movie "The Wings
of Eagles" with John Wayne. Like "Wings of Eagles," "Men of Honor" is an
old-fashioned yarn of one man overcoming every obstacle put before him,
even devastating physical damage, to fulfill his life's goal. Where John
Wayne's Frank "Spig" Weads must overcome paralysis and a failed marriage to
become a key strategist of air power in the Pacific during WWII, Carl
Brashear must face racial prejudice, narrow mindedness and physical trauma
as his main obstacles.
Cuba Gooding Jr. does a fine job portraying the smart, though under
educated, Carl. As a boy, he proves himself to be a first rate swimmer
whose love of the water makes him an ideal candidate to be a Navy diver.
But, in the 50's, a black man in the U.S. Navy had three career options -
cook, officer's valet or, as his chief tells him, "get the #$%& out of the
Navy." Carl defies the racial barriers of the time and challenges the
whites-first policy of the military. His commander, Captain Pullman (Powers
Boothe), sees past the color obstacle and recommends Carl for dive school.
But, for each wall of prejudice Carl overcomes, he faces a bigger one.
Once ensconced in the school, Carl is forced to deal with Master Chief
Billy Sunday (Robert DeNiro), the dive school master who holds a grudge
against blacks. Sunday has the same roots as Carl - Billy, too, comes from
a poor, southern farming family - but has a deep resentment of blacks
stemming from his youth. For every obstacle Sunday and the school commander
Mr. Pappy (Hal Holbrook) place before Carl, the young man hurdles past
each, steadily earning the grudging respect of his chief. Eventually, the
two men, Carl and Billy, develop a mutual bond and Master Chief Sunday
pulls in markers from his comrades to help Carl achieve his goals -
respected Navy diver and a Master Chief rating of his own.
This old-fashioned style story flows along in a typical manner for this
kind of bio flick. We meet a young Carl on the family farm as he tries to
help his father with the work. Dad is adamant that his kids go to school,
not work in the fields. This father's desire for a better life for his son
influences Carl, strongly, and inspires him to strive for what he wants out
of life. As the adult Carl begins his naval career, as a cook, the old
adage of success being 10% inspiration and 90% perspiration holds true for
the man. Carl has to work twice as hard as his white peers and, despite his
seventh grade education and with the help of an attractive librarian, Jo
(Aunjanue Ellis), competes with them as an equal. It's not all beer and
skittles for Carl as he must overcome the prejudice of the white military
bureaucracy against a black man climbing the ladder of success. As one
expects, since this is a true story, Carl graduates in the face of
adversity.
The final leg of the story has Carl, now a respected diver, called upon to
lend his underwater talents to find a nuclear device - a 50 megaton bomb -
that was lost during a B-52 accident off of the coast of Spain. This part
provides the most raw tension in the film as Carl is swept away by a
Russian sub skulking in the area looking for the bomb. This action packed
sequence brings up the bomb, but leads to an accident that costs Carl his
leg. The end of the story shows Carl, now with the help of Billy Sunday,
overcome his handicap and become the first amputee ever returned to full
duty in the Navy. Carl keeps his coveted job as a senior diver and gets the
Master Chief rating - the highest non-commissioned rating in the U.S. Navy.
While Gooding does a good job in portraying Carl Brashear, Robert DeNiro
stands out as the gruff, tyrannical Master Chief Sunday. Giving a perf that
is a departure from what he's done lately, DeNiro plays the son of a poor
white sharecropping family who escaped that plight and found a home in the
Navy. A product of his upbringing and the prevailing mores of the day,
Chief Sunday initially sees Carl's arrival as a threat to the status quo of
his beloved Navy. Carl's determination, ability and dedication to the Navy
slowly turn the chief and his attitude toward Brashear. The change is
neither abrupt nor easy and DeNiro puts a convincing spin on his
conversion.
The talented supporting cast is not given enough to do, for the most part.
Hal Holbrook is wasted as the bigoted dive school commander who refuses to
see Carl's inherent talent and ability. Powers Boothe and David Keith lend
an enlightened quality to their respective roles as Carl's commanding
officers at different periods in the story. They symbolize intelligent
officers who see beyond the color barrier. Aunjanue Ellis, as Jo, puts a
distinctive arc on her love interest role as she, first, helps Carl then,
later falls in love and marries him. Michael Rapaport is a two-dimensional
stick figure who is the only white guy who unconditionally accepts Carl
into the fold. Charlize Theron is miscast as Sunday's young wife, though
the actress makes the most of the small role.
Helmer George Tillman ("Soul Food") shows a deft hand in mustering the
talents of his actors and his behind-the-camera crew. Cinematography by
Anthony Richmond is straightforward and crisp. The underwater sequences
have a murkiness that suits the deep-sea environment the divers work in,
giving the film a you-are-there look. Production design, by Leslie Dilley,
and costume design, by Salvador Perez, are first rate and capture the
period feel with accuracy. In particular, the old-style dive gear used is
convincing looking and rings true.
There is a high level of sentimentality throughout men of honor. Carl's
daddy, as the young man boars the bus to join the Navy, gives him a
handmade radio with the initials "ASNF" carved into the side. This image
recurs throughout the film, a mystery until Chief Sunday, carves the true
meaning beneath the initials - a son never forgets. Another bit, after Carl
loses his leg, turns into a mini "Rocky III" as Chief Sunday drives the
amputee to overcome his handicap. These sentimental interludes suit the
flick, though, and blends with the rest of the inspirational story.
"Men of Honor" plays out the importance of honor and personal integrity
without preaching. As such, the story is a solidly entertaining one that
does not hammer the viewer with its message. It is an inspirational true
story of a unique man that broke the Navy's color barrier for himself and
those like him. Carl Brashear is a true hero and I'm glad his story is
told. I give it a solid B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Dish, The (2000)
The manned landing on the moon on July 20, 1969, was the first, truly
worldwide media event ever. 600 million people watched in awe when they saw
and heard Neil Armstrong say, "That's one small step for man and one giant
leap for mankind." What few of those viewers knew is that a remote
Australian radio telescope team was responsible for those historic images
and their story is told in "The Dish."
Director Rob Stitch, whose earlier comedy, the wonderful and goofy "The
Castle," takes a different trail with this true-life story of the
Australia's contribution in making possible for millions to actually see
one of man's greatest accomplishments. The action takes place in the small
town of Parkes, New South Wales, Australia where sheep are the main
industry and the skyline is filled with the giant radio telescope called,
simply, the Dish. The advent of America's mission to land a man on the moon
brought the power of the Dish to the attention of NASA and an official
request for help was made to the Aussies.
Cliff Buxton (Sam Neill) is the director of the Dish project, but the
worldwide visibility of the moon mission prompts NASA to send their own man
to take over the show. Al Burnett (Patrick Warburton) is a high-powered
NASA tech sent on site to assume command of  the Australian operation and
is resented by the local technicians as a know-it-all interloper. As the
Apollo 11 launch date approaches, tension run high at the dish site.
Personal conflicts seem destined to overwhelm the important space mission.
Then, real disaster strikes!
An unexpected power outage in the town also hits the Dish station. One
problem mounts on the next when the backup generator fails to kick in. It
is discovered that Burton's main opponent, Mitch, forgot to prime the fuel
pump, causing all the computers to lose their programs and, most
importantly, the coordinates of the Apollo 11 spacecraft. The crisis unites
the team, Aussie and Yank alike, and they work hard together to make things
right - after blatantly lying to NASA about their problem. When the time
does comes for the first link with the astronauts, the plucky team of
astronomers overcome monumental challenges to fulfill their own mission to
the world.
As the landing approaches, NASA decides that the Parkes dish will be in the
best position to receive the first televised images from the moon. But,
things get even more complicated when high winds suddenly whip the area and
threaten to stop the Dish and its crew from accomplishing their own special
task for posterity. It's science's chance to be daring and the telescope
team is ready to risk it all to give the people of the earth their first
glimpse of the first moon landing.
Helmer Stitch works with many of the same folk that made "The Castle" such
a charmer. Where the earlier film used comedy to tell a quasi-serious
serious story of a man saving his home from ruthless developers, "The Dish"
takes a real, historical event and tells the story in a straightforward
fashion. What keeps the film from being just a docudrama is the keen wit
and humor that underlies the serious subject. Besides the Dish folk and the
government mucky-mucks that descend upon the station are the oddball
characters that live in the town of Parkes.
The large ensemble cast breaths life into the characters of the town and
dish station, making Parkes the kind of place you'd like to visit some
time. The crew  members of the Dish, led by Neill, are real people with
real hopes and dreams. They are proud of their abilities and talents and
come across as a true team. Roy Billing, as Parkes' mayor Bob McIntyre, is
politically ambitious and sees the big event as his chance at the big
times. He, his wife May (Genevieve Moy) and military academy-attending son
Billy (Carl Snell) lead the sometimes quirky townsfolk in their celebration
of the town's involvement in the great event. Tayler Kane, as the Dish's
goofy security guard Rudi Kellerman, get the most outright guffaws with his
not-quite-with-it perf.
The on-site locations and solid cinematography by Graeme Wood give the film
a majestic look of man's technical capabilities. Amazing detail is given to
the production design, by Carrie Kennedy, capturing the 60's period feel
and look - especially of the now-archaic computer equipment that was
state-of-the-art at the time. We're so used to super fast computers and the
internet, it's nice to get a realistic glimpse of where all our modern
technology came from.
The goofy comedy that is liberally sprinkled throughout the film is
represented in a single scene where the local band is requested to play the
American national anthem for the visiting US ambassador (John McMartin). I
won't spoil the gag, but the tune they play definitely ain't The
Star-Spangled Banner.
The Aussie humor may not hit home ever time for American viewers of "The
Dish," but the sincerity and warmth given to the telling of such a
momentous event will appeal to everyone everywhere. I can't wait to see
what Rob Stitch and company will come up with next. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Harry, un ami qui vous veut du bien (2000)
Every so often, a filmmaker, usually European, takes on the task of making 
a "Hitchcockian thriller." Paul Verhoeven was successful with his lurid and 
sexy 1983 flick, "The Fourth Man." George Sluizer gave the master an even 
better turn in the Dutch/French produced "The Vanishing." Now, West German 
born Dominik Moll takes a shot at Hitch with his own psychological 
thriller, "With a Friend Like Harry...." 
Alfred Hitchcock still holds the mantle of master of the chilling thriller, 
but it is nice to see a film that ably pays homage to the late, great 
filmmaker. Helmer Moll, working with a script co-written with Gilles 
Marchand, begins his film on a discordant note as we watch a young couple 
and their three restless kids drive off to the French countryside for 
vacation. The kids are cranky, it's hot and the drive is taking on 
interminable proportions for dad, Michel (Laurent Lucas). 
When the family takes a break at a rest stop, Michel meets a man who claims 
to know him. Harry (Sergi Lopez) tells him that they knew each other in 
school, years before, but Michel can't recall the man at all. This doesn't 
stop Harry from insinuating himself and his buxom fiancée, Plum (Sophie 
Guillemin), on Michel and his wife, Claire (Mathilde Seigner), and their 
vacation plans. The couple has an old farmhouse, which they are struggling 
to restore, in the countryside and the newcomers promptly plunk themselves 
down to stay, changing their own plans to go see the Materhorn. 
Everything starts off seemingly innocent, but the odd-acting Harry 
definitely has his share of enigmatic quirks. Late one night, while Michel 
is taking care of the baby, he announces that he needs to eat a raw egg 
after each orgasm to improve his virility. On a shopping expedition with 
Claire, Harry decides to buy the family an expensive SUV, against Michel's 
protest. The old school chum appears just to be helping his friend to take 
care of "life's problems," but how he takes care of them is the crux of 
"With a Friend Like Harry...." 
In the best tradition of Hitch, Dominik Moll uses many of the old master's 
tricks to depict violence and convey real tension to his audience. Mayhem 
takes place all through the film, but it is done almost exclusively off 
screen, cleverly making the viewer build the horror of the scene in his/her 
mind. Additionally, the score, by David Sinclair Whittaker, has the same 
tense quality that the great Bernard Herrmann gave to many of Hitchcock's 
films ? who can ever forget the screeching violins in "Psycho?" 
The cast, with one exception, maintains a low-key presence throughout the 
film. Sergi Lopez, as the enigmatic and dangerous Harry, gives a psycho 
edge to his performance that conveys volumes with a wicked gleam of the eye 
or an overconfident smirk on his lips. Right from the start, his outward 
affability carries an edge to it as Harry goes about his business of 
insinuating himself into Michel's life. Harry carries a lot of baggage from 
his past, including a long-standing but hidden obsession for Michel. No 
explanation is offered for Harry's bizarre, deadly behavior, keeping us in 
the dark about his motives. This is a problem as the enigma about Harry is 
carried too long and answers to our questions are left dangling in the end. 
The production, oftentimes shot with a dark, sinister quality by Matthieu 
Poirot-Delpech, maintains the edgy nature that Moll needs to convey to keep 
the chills in his thriller. Actor Lopez isn't going to replace Anthony 
Perkins's Norman Bates as the quintessential movie monster, but with a 
friend like Harry.... 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Baby Boy (2001)
In 1991, 23-year old director John Singleton exploded on the movie scene
with his insightful and unflinching look into the impact of violence on an
inner city black family in "Boyz N the Hood, becoming the youngest helmer,
ever, to receive an Oscar nomination. Now, he brings us back to the 'hood
in a story about a young man facing the trials of becoming a responsible
adult in "Baby Boy."
Singleton has maintained a theme on life in South Central LA since his
auspicious debut film, followed by "Poetic Justice" and, now, "Baby Boy."
The writer/director, following his smash hit, "Shaft" returns home, once
again, and makes a personal statement on being black in America and the
sub-culture that has produced a generation of boy/men whose adult actions,
such as fathering illegitimate children, are coupled with the
irresponsibility of youth. For generations, working class black society in
the inner city has becoming increasingly matriarchal, with the mothers and
girlfriends of these baby boys bearing the burden of their deeds.
Jody (Tyrese Gibson) is a steetwise, but misguided, 20-year old who has
fathered two children by two different women, Yvette (Taraji P. Henson) and
Peanut (Tamara Bass). But, he doesn't have a job, still lives with his
mother and seems incapable of taking responsibility for himself or the
babies he has made. He also has to contend with the volatility of his best
friend Sweetpea (Omar Gooding), a young gang-banger who spends his life in
and out of prison and in and out of trouble.
Meanwhile, Jody's 36-year old mother, Juanita (A.J. Johnson) is finding a
new life for herself, a life that includes less and less her son and more
and more her new boyfriend, Melvin (Ving Rhames), a reformed O.G. (old
gangster). Mom wants to enjoy, finally, the simple things in her life, like
her garden and her man. Jody is not part of this picture anymore and the
boy resents it, especially the intrusion of Melvin as the man of the house.
Jody is faced with more than just finding a place to stay as his past
actions and inability to take responsibility for them force him to the
crossroads of his life. Can he put aside his past mistakes and take control
of his life, like Melvin? Or, is he simply going to let it slide and let
the mammas take care of him and his babies?
Singleton has a lot to say on how he feels about the society that spawned
him. For generations, now, the black man in the 'hood has allowed the women
of his life to bear the brunt of being the sole parent and breadwinner in
the home. Unemployment and crime, with its inherent dangers to life and
limb, dominate the day-to-day life for black men and, if it continues
unchecked, it will be irreversible. The writer/helmer makes a strong
statement on the need for these boy/men to take control of their lives and,
basically, do the right thing.
The script, by the helmer, is oftentimes hit-you-over-the-head as it
preaches, repeatedly, the need for black men to take back their role of
family patriarch and leader. Juanita's emphatic declaration to Jody that
"you're not a baby no more" is both a plaintive plea and galvanizing demand
by black women that they are tired of footing the entire load in raising a
family. Singleton makes this statement, frequently, during the course of
"Baby Boy" and this becomes a flaw that keeps the film from being a great
one. A subtler approach to the pronouncement of the author's obvious deep
feelings about the subject would have made the film more effective.
The strong ensemble cast is capably led by newcomer Tyrese Gibson (you
might recognize him from his Guess? ads and MTV). He gives a solid,
three-dimensional performance as the confused, but intelligent, Jody,
effectively depicting the anger at being ejected from the safety of home in
favor of Melvin and confusion about just how to become a man. A.J. Johnson,
as his mom, puts a wonderful arc on her perf as a lady who has had enough.
She has worked all of her adult life coping with the crime and the
violence, which killed Jody's father years before, and raising a son to the
best of her ability as a single, working mom. Johnson puts just the right
spin on her mama who decides to cut the umbilical cord herself.
The rest of the supporting cast provides a wealth of talent. Ving Rhames
has proven himself to be one of the most versatile character actors in the
business. He can play comedy or drama and, here, he is both menacing -
toward Jody, who rejects his friendly overtures - and loving, as a reformed
O.G. who has turned his life around, started a business and fallen in love
with Juanita. Rhames puts flesh and blood into the symbol of Singleton's
idea of a good role model for the boys in the 'hood. Omar Gooding is first
rate as the explosive, loyal Sweetpea and reps the life Jody must leave
behind. Taraji P. Henson also stands out as Jody's main squeeze and mother
of his second child. She represents well the fears and the hopes of a young
woman and mother in the inner city. Snoop Dog is quite good as the sinister
element, ex-con Rodney, but the character is unnecessary and a big
distraction in the otherwise solid story.
Photography by Charles E. Mills captures the South Central locale well and,
with stylish editing by Bruce Cannon, keeps the film visually entertaining.
Costume, by Ruth Carter, is notable in that it does not call attention to
itself in its natural flow. The frequent use of old Popeye cartoons (and
Sweetpea) gives the "I am what I am" theme a humorous, retro feel that may
be lost on younger auds, but is a nice weave in the film's tapestry.
More subtlety and some judicious cutting to trim the 2+ hour runtime would
have made a better film, but I have to congratulate Singleton for his
dedication to his race and his desire to put forth a positive message that
young black men and women can be proud of. I give "Baby Boy" a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tigerland (2000)
The Vietnam War is in its dying throes but that doesn't mean that fresh
meat isn't needed to feed the grinder of war. Draftees make up the bulk of
the Army whose job it is to push these boys-turned-men through basic and
advanced infantry training into a place that is "as close to the war as we
can make it" in "Tigerland."
Joel Schumacher's latest opus is an old-fashioned, coming of age film, set
on a southern Army base as the war in Vietnam winds down. Even with the war
drawing to a close, the military machine keeps cranking out soldiers from
its camps and sending them off to battle. For the conscripts it is a
frightening journey that they know will end half way around the world. Into
this scary world of violence and, to some, near-torture comes another
draftee, Roland Bozz (Colin Farrell).
There is one thing that differs Bozz from the rest of the inductees. He
doesn't care and he doesn't mind letting his superiors know it. He is a
rebel with a cause as he makes it known that having him court-martialed for
his insubordination will give him what he wants - to be as far away from
the war as possible. Since he has nothing to lose, his superiors leave him
alone and Bozz attains an odd kind of freedom in the constricting confines
of the Army. He befriends a hardship case, Cantwell (Thomas Guiry), whose
child bride is very ill and needs his care. The unit captain (Nick Searcy)
has refused to even consider Cantwell's pleas, until Bozz intercedes and
tells his friend just what to do and say. When Cantwell confronts his
captain again, he is armed with military chapter and verse. The kid gets
out.
>From here, the story becomes a series of quests by Bozz to save his friends
from the meatgrinder of the war. He is a tragic figure from the start,
destined to a fate that will bring him to the place he denied for so long -
Vietnam. But this is all conjecture as the story really follows
conventional lines as the soldiers are bullied and beaten by Sgt. Thomas
(James McDonald) in preparation for their journey to Tigerland, the place
that will make or break them. Not all the noncoms are bad guys, though, as
the film shows how it takes all kinds to make an army, good and bad. Some
of the men training the boys are compassionate and caring. One Tigerland
NCO (Cole Hauser) admonishes his wards "to listen and to learn" because
what he has to teach them may save their lives in combat.
The ensemble acting effort by those surrounding Bozz is well played. Thomas
Guiry garners sympathy as the not-too-bright Cantwell. Clifton Collins,
Jr., as the mentally ailing Miter, is another one of Bozz's missions. Bozz
also saves his friend Paxton (Matthew Davis), the only enlistee in the
outfit, from the war whether the volunteer wants his life saved or not.
Shea Whigham, as Bozz's main adversary among the draftees, Wilson, is a
two-dimensional bad guy whose comeuppance is assured. The rest of the cast
is played as two-dimensional figures, simply filling in the background.
The production has the appropriate look and feel of a place where men
prepare for war. When the troops finally ship out to Tigerland for their
last week of on-the-job training, they make a journey that is a cross
between "Apocalypse Now" and the entry into "Jurassic Park." At one point
one of the soldiers even says, "It's a war theme park." I half expected to
see T-Rex poke his head out of the jungle. But for all of the cliché,
"Tigerland" is a well-crafted, though predictable, parable about a man so
bent on saving others that he may not be able to save himself. The myths
that spring up among the soldiers about our hero, Bozz, in the end are
handled as a coda that ends the film with a positive note of hope. I give
it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Osmosis Jones (2001)
Frank (Bill Murray) is not what you'd call a health nut. His idea of haute
cuisine is to smear a boiled egg with mayonnaise and load it with salt.
When, after dropping said egg on the ground at the zoo where he works and,
against his daughter Shane's (Elena Franklin) advice, he eats it, he
doesn't realize the trouble he is in? He ingests a deadly virus and it's up
to the denizens within Frank's body, led by a cocky white blood cell, to
save him from himself in "Osmosis Jones."
Peter and Bobby Ferrule enter a brave new world when they take us into the
less-than-healthy body known to its inhabitants as the City of Frank.
Osmosis Jones (Chris Rock), an anti-body with an attitude, is a member of
the Frank PD and is always getting into trouble with his boss, the Chief,
for his renegade moves. When the deadly virus named Thorax (Laurence
Fishburne) invades Frank's body, only Osmosis sees that their host is in
great peril. That is, until he is joined by Drib (David Hide Pierce), a
twelve-hour time-release cold pill with germ-fighting power. It's up to
this unlikely duo to search out the evil Thorax and eliminate him.
Watching "Osmosis Jones," I kept having a feeling of familiarity with the
concept. What came to mind most strongly, at first, was the 1966 sci-fi
flick "Fantastic Voyage." That F/X extravaganza took us inside the human
body for the first time to show us what makes it tick. But, it didn't
attempt to bring anthropomorphic life to the inner workings of the body.
Then, it struck me - Woody Allen had just such a vignette in his ambitious
1972 comedy "Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex (but Were
Afraid to Ask)" where the inhabitants of a man's body work together to help
him get laid. It was an amusing short that used actors (such as Burt
Reynolds and Tony Randall) to give human faces to the various internal
parts of the body.
The Farrelly brothers take the idea a quantum leap from short vignette to a
feature length animation that is part cop show, part action flick and
populated with police, crooks, corrupt government officials, laborers,
white collar workers, villains and a sexy babe. They combine the
live-action story about Frank, a widower that, when his wife died, lost
nearly everything - his job, his life and, very nearly, his mind. He gave
up caring about himself, eats junk food and doesn't exercise, much to the
chagrin and concern of his daughter, Shane. When he invokes the "ten second
rule" (if you drop something on the ground for less than ten second, it's
edible) at the zoo he now works at, he unknowingly introduce the Red Death,
Thrax, into his body. The killer virus, which has a string of victims under
his belt, vows to finish the City of Frank off in less than 48 hours.
Thrax sets up shop with his henchmen in the festering in-grown toenail on
Frank's foot and mercilessly plots to set a fever ablaze within their host
and add Frank to his growing list of casualties. No one in the city, save
Osmosis Jones, recognize the peril the city is in. With only the help of
Drix and a sexy little red blood cell, Leah (Brandy Norwood), to depend on,
Osmosis begins his own fantastic voyage as he hunts down the deadly virus
to put a stop to his mayhem.
Utilizing the talents of Hollywood's top animators and CGI artists, the
Farrellys have created a unique city within the man. Combining a
hard-boiled detective story with animation fantasy is no easy task and the
Farrellys are partially successful with their effort. It helps that Bill
Murray is willing to get down, dirty and disgusting as the bedraggled Frank
who wants to do the right thing for his daughter but is mired so deeply in
his grief, he doesn't care what damage he inflicts on himself. The makers
flash back and forth between Frank's self-abuse and the citizens of the
city trying to cope with his bad habits.
The vocal talents that give life to the inhabitants of Frank are focused on
Rock, the always-amusing Hyde Pierce, TV's "Moesha" star Brandy and, as the
incumbent, corrupt mayor of the City of Frank, William Shatner. None,
however, with the exception of Drix, do much in the way of creating
memorable animated characters. The same goes for the limited live-action
cast. Murray, as always, is one funny guy and gives "disgusting" new
meaning. Wasted are Molly Shannon as Shane's teacher, Mrs. Boyd, and Chris
Elliot as Frank's sidekick and coworker, Bob. Young Elena Franklin is fine
as Frank's loving, caring daughter.
Animation is first rate, with a variety of settings in the human body. The
lymph nodes are the headquarters for the ever-vigilant Frank PD where
Osmosis is routinely told by his boss, the Chief, to "get out of my
office!" in typical cop show fashion. The stomach is the terminus for all
incoming nourishment while the cardiovascular system reps the highways that
the citizens of Frank use to get around. It is all very clever and
entertaining to watch, but like other aspects of the film, is not
particularly memorable.
The gross-out equation that permeates much of the film is obviously geared
to entertain the youngsters that "Osmosis Jones" is out to attract, and
there is plenty to gross them (and you) out. The Farrellys, with Marc
Hyman's original script, do inject some clever humor and visual cues that
are made to entertain the adults who will, inevitably, attend the film with
the kids. It's an ambitious animation effort, but lacks that certain charm
to make it remarkable work. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Golden Bowl, The (2000)
Adultery is the key word in the latest effort by the directing, producing 
and writing team of James Ivory, Ishmael Merchant and Ruth Prawer Jhabvala 
as they bring yet another Henry James novel to screen life in "The Golden 
Bowl." 
Adam Verver (Nick Nolte) is a fabulously wealthy American industrialist, 
possibly the world's first billionaire, living in the lap of luxury in 
Europe with daughter, Maggie (Kate Beckinsale). They meet, in their 
travels, a self-styled matchmaker, Fanny Assingham (Anjelica Huston), who 
does her darnedest to get Maggie together with handsome, penniless Prince 
Amerigo (Jeremy Northam) from Italy. Fanny also pushes Adam into the arms 
of Charlotte Stant (Uma Thurman), Maggie's closest friend. Unknown to the 
Ververs, their soon-to-be spouses have just recently ended their own torrid 
love affair because the poor prince could not possibly marry an equally 
poor commoner. But, is the affair really over? 
This is the third film that Merchant/Ivory/Jhabvala have adapted from the 
collected works of turn of the 19th century American novelist James. ("The 
Europeans" and "The Bostonians" were their previous efforts.) I have never 
been a fan of James's late 1800's era stories, finding his work too stern 
and without humor, unlike, for instance, Jane Austen, whose earlier period 
work - of Englishmen, rather than Americans - are bright and full of wit. 
James is more concerned with the darker side of the human psyche and "The 
Golden Bowl" is burdened with an almost relentless dourness with it's tale 
of deceit and infidelity. 
The story keeps its focus on the four principals and the dynamics of the 
weird quadrangle of relationships. There's the close, almost spousal, bond 
between Adam and Maggie, as the father and daughter have had to depend on 
only each other for many years. A formal link exists between Maggie and 
Amerigo as the princely pauper uses his wife's vast wealth to rebuild his 
family estate. Amerigo is devoted to Maggie, but it's a devotion based on 
selfish motives, not love. Charlotte still actively lusts after Amerigo, 
but plays the game of loyal and loving wife to Adam. She and Maggie retain 
their best friendship even as she cuckolds her friend, but rends soon form 
in the delicate fabric of the relationships of the four. It's a lusty story 
that must have titillated the libidos of the reading public at the time the 
book was published. 
Nick Nolte is proving to be one of the best senior actors in the business. 
He plays, basically, the other side of the coin of the character he created 
in Oliver Stone's "U-Turn." But, where that film's Jake McKenna (Nolte) was 
rich, powerful and ruthlessly evil, Adam Verver is rich and powerful, too, 
but also kind, generous and zealously devoted to his daughter. Nolte puts 
completely different spins on his characters, always making them unique. 
Beckinsale's Maggie is such a good, loving person, that she is almost too 
good to be a real person. The actress gives dimension to her performance 
and a believable, loving grace to Maggie that garners sympathy. Northam 
seemed miscast, at first, as the Italian-accented Prince Amerigo, but soon 
displays the selfish weakness of the man convincingly. Uma Thurman, never 
one of my favorite actresses, is terrific as the hedonistic, conniving 
Charlotte and reps one of her best perfs to date. Award considerations are 
not out of line. 
Supporting cast is limited, but there are a couple of interesting 
characters floating around in the background. Huston, as Fanny, plays that 
catalyst that gets things in motion among the principals. Her accent strays 
between American/Southern and American/Neutral, but the role she plays is 
important to the fabric of the film. James Fox does a fine job in the small 
role of Fanny's husband and confidant, building his Bob Assingham into a 
real, and amusing, person. 
The symbolism of the titular object is wrought throughout the film as the 
apparent perfection of the golden bowl, like the perfection of the 
marriages, is suspect and the flaws become obvious to the players and the 
viewer alike. The juxtaposition of the cracks in the bowl and obvious 
marital flaws of the characters is obvious, and a little heavy-handed, 
symbolically. 
The production, as expected from this team, is sumptuous. The film looks 
terrific with authentic-feeling period sets and costumes, showing off the 
talents of a veteran group of behind-the-camera craftspeople. The lush, 
crisp photography by Tony Pierce-Roberts captures, vividly, the actions of 
these aristocrats and their times. Director Merchant musters his forces 
well, but, in the end, the story doesn't compel me, making the film feel 
too long. 
"The Golden Bowl" is a strong effort that is burdened by the source 
material or its adaptation - not having read the novel, it's hard to tell. 
I give it a B. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Drôle de Félix (2000)
Felix (Sami Bouajila, "The Siege") lives a contented life with his
boyfriend Daniel (Pierre-Loup Rajot) in the little town of Dieppe in
Northern France. When he is laid off from his job, after discovering the
address of the father who abandoned him before he was born, he decides to
journey to Marseilles, in the south, to find the man he never met in "The
Adventures of Felix."
Writers/directors Olivier Ducastel and Jacques Martineau made their debut
with the musical comedy "Jeanne and the Perfect Guy," embracing that
typically American genre. Their second effort, "The Adventures of Felix,"
once again borrows from America with a tale of a young man who hits the
road to find himself. Felix is happy with his life in Dieppe, but when the
ferry company he works for falls prey to the economics of the Chunnel, he
is out of a job and at loose ends. When he goes through his late mother's
papers he learns that the father he never knew is living in Marseilles,
hundreds of miles away.
Felix makes the snap decision to journey to the south, puts together a
supply of "cocktails" for his HIV virus, kisses Daniel goodbye and heads
off on foot. He refuses to use trains and wants to avoid big cities as he
hitchhikes across France to find his destiny. Along the way, a series of
chance encounters with various strangers teaches Felix that family is not
always made up of blood relations. On the road, he witnesses a race-related
mugging that turns into murder and, frightened for his own safety, runs
away without telling the police.
Following this harrowing experience, he has his first chance meeting that
begins the unconscious construction of his ideal family. His journey brings
him to Rouen, and the film's first title section, "my little brother,"
where he meets Jules, a young art student who becomes smitten with Felix.
They steal a car and develop a chaste, brotherly affection before Felix
must move on. He next meets elderly Mathilde (Patachou), in the chapter
titled "my grandmother," and soon learns that she, too, has a fondness for
the same TV soap opera that Felix has grown addicted to. She wants him to
stay with her, but he must continue on his way to find his father.
In the weakest chapter of Felix's road trip, titled "my cousin," he meets a
railroad worker (Philippe Garziano) and has a brief sexual encounter before
heading off, once again, toward Marseilles. He next helps a stranded lady
motorist, Isabelle (Ariane Ascaride), and shags a ride with her and her
three kids (each with a different daddy) in the sequence titled "my
sister." He is torn by the inner turmoil of not going to the police about
the murder he witnessed and Isabelle comforts him just as a sister would.
On the final leg of the journey titled "my father," he meets an older man,
a fisherman (Maurice Benichou), who enlightens him about the real facts of
life and family while they fly Felix's kite, just like a father and son.
"The Adventures of Felix" has a number of things going for it as we follow
Felix on his journey of discovery. First and foremost is the charming
performance by Sami Bouajila as Felix. He is a likable guy, fighting his
HIV with his doses of "cocktails," and lights up the screen as he makes the
long walk, often with dance and song, to find his father and himself. As he
encounters each member of his new family, promising each that he will send
a postcard when he arrives at his final destination, he grows a little bit
more spiritually and emotionally. Bouajila does a terrific job holding
center stage on the screen.
The cast of characters making up Felix's new-found family are nearly as
charming as the star, each in their own way. Patachou, especially, is
wonderful as the grandma character and a kindred spirit to Felix. Ariane
Ascaride, along with her kids, gives a perf that really makes you think of
her as the sister that the young man never had. Only the "cousin" chapter
lacks the emotional depth of the rest and feels like a perfunctory addition
to Felix's "family."
"The Adventures of Felix" does not reinvent the road movie, but it does
provide a charismatic telling of a young man's journey to find himself and,
to his surprise, his discovery is dramatically different than he expected
at the beginning. It helps that cinematographer Matthieu Poirot-Delpech's
crisp lensing compliments the story perfectly as Felix moves across the
French countryside. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tillsammans (2000)
When the Vietnam War ended in 1975, it also spelled the end of the hippie
movement in America forever. But, in Sweden, freethinking, free-loving
idealism still lives and communes still flourish. At one such cooperative,
the delicate balance needed for a large number of people, all very
different, to live together in harmony is strained by the arrival of a
family of outsiders in the Swedish comedy "Together."
When the leader of the Tillsammans (Together) commune, Goran (Gustaf
Hammarsten), gets a plaintive phone call from his sister Elisabeth (Lisa
Lindgren) he can't help but to take her and her kids into the house. Her
husband, Rolf (Michael Nyqvist), has a drinking problem and, drunk again,
he struck his wife in the face. Hard. Goran picks up Elisabeth and her two
kids and drives them, in a VW microbus of course, back to Together for
safety. Once there, the stable dynamics of the group home go completely a
kilter as the family's arrival disrupts the delicate social balance - not
that things weren't about to go awry anyway - in the house.
Goran is coupled with a sex-crazed, free love advocate, Lena (Anja
Lundqvist), who decides to test her significant other's idealism and beds
down, with vocal verve, the commune's irritable, radical, resident
Communist, Erik (Olle Sarri). The cynical med-school member of the house,
Lasse (Ola Norell), has to contend with his ex-wife Anna (Jessica
Liedberg), who divorced him to become a lesbian. They also have their
8-year-old son, Tet (Axel Zuber), to raise amidst the varied group of
freethinkers. Lasse has to cope, too, with Klas (Shanti Roney), a
homosexual member of the household who has a crush on the
doctor-in-training.
When Elisabeth and her children, Eva (Emma Samuelsson) and Stephan (Sam
Kessel), invade the collective with their own set of middle-class problems
and lifestyle, they introduce bourgeois elements into the communal. Two of
Together's most idealistic and fanatical members, Signe (Cecilia Frode) and
her stubborn husband Sigvard (Lars Frode), are appalled by the intrusion
and the disruption the outsiders cause. When their idealism is questioned -
Is Pippi Longstocking really a capitalist? Is a little meat with a meal so
bad? Or, is TV really so evil? - the couple decides to leave for another
commune where their values will be kept intact. Together begins its
metamorphosis from the group concepts of the 60's to the self-centered
cynicism of the 70's.
"Together," at its core, makes interesting social statements about the
state of mind of the world in the 70's. The controversy of the Vietnam War
is over, but the impact of that conflict and its effect on the world has
made impossible the continuation of the altruism spawned in the previous
decade. World society, now free of the political mess in Indochina, is
taking on a self-awareness that spawned the "me" generation and the good of
mankind takes a back seat to individual self-indulgence. Sophomore
helmet/writer Lukas Moodysson, from a narrative viewpoint, does a fine job
of recreating the philosophical transformation as seen in the tiny
microcosm of Swedish communal society.
Technically, though, the film is second rate and diminishes the subject
matter. Most annoying is the hand held, jerky camera work by Ulf Bantams.
The lender was shooting for a documentary look with his rapidly moving,
erratic camera but that is no excuse for bad photographic composition and
look. At times the filming takes on the feel of an amateur given his first
video camera and told to go shoot a feature film. Other techs are routine,
except, possibly, for the costuming by Matte Muller that belies the obvious
small budget of the film. One amusing distraction is the wig that character
Klas is saddled with. It looks like he raided his mother's wig supply -
blindfolded.
The ensemble cast is large with all of the actors (about 18 in all) each
given some level of shrift throughout the film. Notable are Gusted
Hammarsten as the kindly doormat Goran and his sister Elisabeth (Lindgren)
who is attracted to the freedom of Together but still yearns to have a
stable home life. Everyone in he cast delivers the good.
The combination of thoughtful period slice-of-life and the amateur-feeling
production make me have mixed feelings about "Together." I like the idea
but, regretfully, have major problems with the execution and give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Blow Dry (2001)
It is time, once again, for Britain's annual National Hair Championship and
the mayor of the town of Keighley, England has fought for the honor to host
the affair. But, the town folk don't hold the same enthusiasm for the event
until a local, estranged family decides to get back together and enter the
competition in "Blow Dry."
"Blow Dry" has its heart in the right place but the screenplay by Simon
Beaufoy, in the hands of director Paddy Breathnach, doesn't fulfill the
potential of either the family drama or the hairdressing competition. There
are two different movies playing here, one a melodrama and the other a
flashy contest, but neither gets more than shallow coverage.
The core melodrama begins with Shelley (Natasha Richardson) leaving her
hairdressing salon and her lover, Sandra (Rachel Griffiths), for a doctor's
appointment. The news isn't good, but Shelley puts up a brave front, as if
all is well. At the same time, the Nation Hair Championship competition is
heating up and members of the hair care community from all over Britain are
heading to Keighley.
The lead competitor, Raymond Robertson (Bill Nighy), wants to win at
whatever cost and begins a campaign of sabotage on the other players to
assure his victory. This includes checking on an old opponent living in
Keighley, Phil Allen (Alan Rickman). Phil was married to Shelley when, 10
years before, she left him for Sandra the night before the hair finals that
year. The bitter Phil, now just a town barber, had given up competing
forever - until Ray visits him and  he learns of Shelley's terminal
illness. It becomes a battle of the best in Britain when Phil, Shelley,
their son Brian and Sandra go against Ray and the rest for the coveted
Silver Scissors trophy
This mix of family drama and the glitter of the championship work against
each other in "Blow Dry." On one hand the story tries to tug at our
heartstrings with Shelley's plight against cancer, a broken family and the
need to get it all together one last time for the competition. This part
meanders as she tries to rally her ex-spouse, Phil, and son Brian to join
her, break the news of her illness to Sandra and keep her cancer under
control. This tear-jerking tale is diametrically opposed to the glitzy
world of the hair championship.
The competition is handled in a light-hearted way that has the requisite
outrageous hair-dos, egotistical cutters, cute team monikers (The Kilburne
Kutters, The Style Warriors) that sound like gang names, and a lot of
glitter. This goofy humor conflicts with Shelley's serious dilemma and
family woes, forcing the viewer to shift gears between the comedy and the
drama. By the time it was all over, I didn't know whether I should laugh or
cry, so I did neither.
The talented cast, led by Richardson and Rickman, are given little to do to
develop their stick character into real people. The backdrop of the
championship intrudes into the family drama, abruptly shifting the focus to
comedy and glitz. The actors try, but can't get past the material.
Richardson's Shelley is a stoic and pragmatic woman. Rickman looks
uncomfortable with his character, Phil, and doesn't do anything to show the
inner turmoil caused by the current events. The rest - Griffiths, Josh
Hartnett and Rachael Leigh Cook - are little more than background window
dressing.
The melding of seriocomic material can be done well, but not in "Blow Dry."
I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Virgen de los sicarios, La (2000)
Writer Fernando Vallejo (German Jaramillo) comes home to the tumultuous 
city of Medellin, Colombia after 30 years of absence. At a gay brothel run 
by an old friend he meets Alexis (Anderson Ballesteros), a teenaged boy toy 
who Fernando immediately takes a liking to. The boy moves into the older 
man's sparsely furnished apartment and the two explore the vibrancy and the 
violence of the city made infamous by drug trafficking in "Our Lady of the 
Assassins." 
Fernando, as close as I can figure, is a writer of some fame and fortune 
returning home, as he puts it, to die. (Ambiguous and enigmatic are two 
words I would use to describe "Our Lady of the Assassins.") He teams up, at 
once, with pretty, young Alexis, a tough-minded street kid who fears 
nothing and packs a big gun - for his own protection, he says. The pair set 
off into the modern/old city of Medellin, now called Medello according to 
Alexis, to satisfy the boy's desire for rampant consumerism. Fernando buys 
an expensive stereo and any other trinkets that Alexis wants and, for a 
while, they have a relationship that borders on being father/son-like 
(except for the sex part). There is a price to pay for this time of bliss 
and the violence that clutches the citizens of Medellin will inevitably 
visit the couple. 
Violent confrontation on the mean streets of city is a way life, especially 
if you are young, male and armed with a semi-automatic pistol - one gift 
Alexis and other boys ask for is a mini Uzi submachine gun, just to give 
you some perspective. Car jacking is a popular sport in town and Fernando 
watches as a guy who owns a car resists and is gunned down in cold blood by 
the 'jacker. Alexis, himself, is involved in one shooting after another as 
he protects himself from endless assaults from countless enemies on the 
street. With sudden death a real possibility for teenaged Colombian boys, 
the lives of the street kids burns brighter than for kids elsewhere, making 
the consumer ideology a thriving one in Medellin. Live fast and die young 
is the motto these kids live by. 
Fernando is an enigma as a man returning home to a world that is completely 
different from the one he left so long ago. The rise and fall of Pablo 
Escobar, the yoke put upon the country by the drug trade, the violence 
perpetrated by the country's rulers and, particularly, its youth all washes 
over Fernando but, apart from a frequently used look of melancholy, he 
seems unmoved by the events. (The man is humanized when he uses, and loses, 
Alexis's gun to put an injured dog out of its misery. You know that this is 
the film's pivotal scene and will color later events dramatically.) 
The autobiographical screenplay, by Fernando Vallejo, keeps the central 
figure, the writer, at arm's length from the events around him, even when 
tragedy strikes. There are lessons to be learned here but they are muted by 
keeping the audience from embracing the man. Jaravillo is too much of an 
enigma and being an observer of his observer, I never embraced the 
character or cared about the lessons to be learned. Anderson Ballesteros, 
on the other hand, is quite charismatic as the cocky, violent Alexis who 
thinks nothing of gunning down a cabbie who threatens Fernando. His lack of 
concern for life, even his own, is conveyed in a professional manner by the 
young actor. 
Barbet Schroeder, with lensing capably handled by Rodrigo Lalinde, uses 
high-definition digital video to capture the garish look of Medello, a city 
that was made modern on a foundation of illicit drugs. The utter 
believability of the violence, its sudden and final nature, that grip the 
city is palpably felt. I don't think that Schroeder is embellishing on the 
violence that routinely takes place  and gives the film a realistic tenor. 
The tone of this part of the film put me in mind of the 1981 Brazilian 
film, "Pixote," an even grittier look at the street life of homeless kids 
in a violent urban arena. 
"Our Lady of the Assassins" succeeds in taking you into the heart of 
Colombia and showing a violence-laden world that few will ever go to see. 
The main flaw is I never empathize, or even sympathize, with too enigmatic 
Fernando. I give it a B-. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Keep the River on Your Right: A Modern Cannibal Tale (2000)
"Keep the River On Your Right - A Modern Cannibal Tale"
Artist, anthropologist, archaeologist and writer Tobias Schneebaum has led,
to say the very least, a colorful life. 45 years ago and funded by a
Fulbright grant, this renaissance man walked into the jungles of Peru in a
pair of canvas sneakers and the clothes on his back and spent a year living
with a cannibal tribe. But there is a lot more to tell about the man in
documentary filmmakers David Shapiro and Laurie Gwen Shapiro's thought
provoking work, "Keep the River On Your Right - A Modern Cannibal Tale."
I knew nothing, a few days ago, about Tobias Schneebaum, his fascinating
life and studies about primitive cultures. "Keep the River?" opened my eyes
to the story of this incredible man who, at age 78, is brought back to
those places he explored, alone, so many years ago. We learn, early on,
that Tobias was, at one time, an accomplished painter who gave up his art
to study anthropology. Taking his new knowledge and the Fulbright money he
cast aside the trappings of civilization to enter the primitive, cannibal
culture of the Harakambuit tribe of the Amazon.
This journey, though, is not all that "Keep the River?" is about. Tobias
made a similar trip, some years later, into the jungles of New Guinea to
live with another cannibal tribe, the Asmat. He is taken, by the Shapiros,
on a new trek that will bring him back to his past lives in those distant
places. At first, the septuagenarian is reluctant to make the arduous trip.
He's afraid that his frailty may betray him and the possibility of breaking
a hip, again, is genuine. More telling, though, is his fear of facing his
past. It has been so long since he ventured to those distant places, he is
sure that nothing and no one from that past is even left.
One of the many joys of "Keep the River On Your Right" is to see Tobias's
reluctance to take the journey replaced with a real satisfaction and
happiness for having made the enormous effort. Almost miraculously, in both
Peru and Borneo, he meets old friends from his time in the jungle decades
before. Most striking is his reunion with Aipat, an Asmat tribesman who was
Tobias's best friend and lover those many years ago. The wash of emotions
that Tobias feels are palpably depicted and both gladness and sadness come
through. Another poignant moment happens when Schneebaum returns to Peru
and meets, again, a tribesman who remembers him from 45 years ago. It's an
amazing story all around.
The Shapiros have crafted a docu work that utilizes modern footage (shot
terrifically by Jonathan Kobel), archival file film recordings, excerpts
from Tobia's files, clips from the feature film "Trader Horn" and the
anthropologist's interview on The Mike Douglas Show from 1969. The Douglas
show, in particular, is most revealing as Tobias tells the emcee and his
guests that he did, in fact, eat human flesh when living in Peru. The
reaction, universally, is one of revulsion by the host and his panel, with
the almost instantaneous follow-up question, "what did it taste like?"
showing our morbid curiosity about such things. ("It tastes like pork"
according to Tobias.)
The unbridled honesty of Tobias's telling of his story - he pulls no
punches when he talks about his homosexuality or of eating another person -
is an unexpected treat. He shares his years of experience with us as he
talks about life and its wonders, of death and aging, and about living life
to its fullest. You can't help but come out of the theater feeling the
positive vibes of this fascinating little man.
There have been some first rate documentary films making it to theaters in
recent years. "One Day in September" is a gripping document about the
Jewish hostages taken by Arab terrorists during the 1972 Munich Olympics.
"Sound and Fury" chronicles the real controversy of curing deafness in
children. "Keep the River On Your Right - A Modern Cannibal Tale" brings us
into the life and times of Tobias Schneebaum, a truly remarkable man. Even
is you don't like documentary films, this is one worth seeing. I give it an
A.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)
Russ Richards is the TV weatherman at WPTA in Harrisburg PA and a local
celebrity who has his own, reserved table at Denny's. He is also about to
lose his shirt in an unsuccessful snowmobile franchise as the city basks in
the spring-like December weather. Russ, desperate to avoid financial ruin,
teams up with the station's Lotto girl, Crystal Latroy (Lisa Kudrow), to
pull off a scam and rig the state's lottery. Everything works out,
initially, but the scheme unravels in a big way in "Lucky Numbers."
Nora Ephron, director of such sentimental schmarm as "Sleepless in Seattle"
and "You've Got Mail," takes a turn with "Lucky Numbers" and enters the
realm of the caper flick. Other such crime comedies, like the 1951 marvel,
"The Lavender Hill Mob," or the 1972 Robert Redford starrer, "The Hot
Rock," set the standard for the genre with their mixture of
action/suspense, satire and broad comedy. The charm of these films lay in
their strong build-up of the caper and the gyrations the principle must
undertake as the well-laid plans go awry.
Ephron's entry into the genre of crime caper movies, while not at the same
level as the older films, is a solid, entertaining flick that benefits from
a superb cast that transcends the formula of the script by Adam Resnick.
Based on the 1980 Pennsylvania State Lottery scandal, the story is by the
numbers as we meet Russ Richards, a man on top of the celebrity pile in his
little burg who enjoys the perks of his minor fame. His big ambition is to
get out of Harrisburg and head for the big times - host of his own TV game
show. But, bad investments, unseasonably warm weather and a taste of the
good life are driving Russ to bankruptcy.
First, Russ tries to get a salary advance form his hard-ass boss, Dick
Simmons, and is unceremoniously turned down. He next tries to hit up his
old buddy, Gig, a strip club owner, but gets turned down by him, too. Gig
does offer some advise, though it is highly illegal - find a beard to play
a particular Lotto number and rig the daily lottery to come up with that
number. And, it looks like it may be an easy thing when Russ approaches
Lotto girl Crystal, a sexy and greedy young lady, with the plan and she
jumps at the chance to make millions. The ball is in play, so to speak, as
the couple conspires to rip the state off for a fortune.
The inept pair, against all odds, is able to pull the scam off without a
hitch. Crystal's cousin Walter (documentary filmmaker Michael Moore) is
pulled in to be the front man, purchasing the winning ticket. Everything
seems to going fine as they successfully rig the drawing. Then things start
to fall apart. Walter, realizing the ticket's worth, is no longer happy
with the paltry $20000 he was first offered. He wants an equal share of the
winnings and won't give up the ticket unless he gets it. Gig also wants a
piece of the pie and demands a 20% cut of the total. Then, a local bookie
gets wind of the scheme, prompting Gig to have the guy bumped off by his
crony, the loony Dale the Thug (Michael Rapaport). Once Dale finishes his
lethal task, he demands $500000 from the hapless, now scared, Russ. Things
are further complicated when a malingering cop, Pat Lakewood (Bill
Pullman), and his gung-ho partner Chambers (Daryl Mitchell) are put on the
case of the missing bookie. Another wrench hits the works when station boss
Dick figures out the crime and wants half of the money. Soon, Russ is
financially worse off than before he committed the crime.
Despite the large cast of characters, the movie moves along at a brisk pace
as the crime and its aftermath of greed unfold and Russ finds himself in a
place, among ruthless people, that he just wants out of. Travolta, who
seems to be beefing up to Marlon Brando proportions, plays Russ Richards
with a mix of confidence of a big fish in the small pond of Harrisburg TV
and fear of losing everything when his plans backfire. He's fine while in
control of things, but breaks down quickly when they go to hell in a hand
basket. Travolta is the straight man of the cast, but gets good moments as
he tries, and repeatedly fails, to get out of his predicament.
The rest of the cast ably handles their various tasks. Kudrow plays
completely out of her usual ditzy characters as the hard-bitten, greedy
Lotto babe who thinks nothing of using her body to get what she wants. It's
a different kind of roll for Kudrow, though not one I necessarily liked -
Crystal may be good looking, but she is no Mother Theresa. Tim Roth and Ed
O'Neill lend their professionalism to their perfs as Gig and Dick. The real
comic relief, though, comes from Michael Rapaport and Bill Pullman.
Rapaport's Dale is over-the-top crazy as a very loose canon. Dale, and his
World Series commemorative baseball bat, does drastic damage to the various
players. He's all hopped up on wine coolers and anti-depressants and will
not take "no" for an answer. He's also not very bright as he tries to get
rid of Jerry the bookie by taping a small brick to his wrist and dumps the
body in the river. Pullman has some goofy fun as the inept cop who
unwittingly breaks the case.
I have never been a fan of Nora Ephron's film work, but I have to admit
that the lady does surround herself with top-notch talent behind the
camera. The capable and varied lensing by John Lindley ("Pleasantville")
gives the film a crisp look. Production designer Dan Davis, a three-time
Ephron collaborator, catches the 80's feel, though that period is less
distinctive than the 60's and 70's. Other tech tasks are also well handled.
"Lucky Numbers" isn't hurt by the formula story and benefits greatly from
the talented cast. There is ample humor, though little suspense. Nora
Ephron proves herself a competent filmmaker and takes on the crime caper
with professional ability. It's not as wild and wacky as "The Hot Rock" (a
film I highly recommend), but it has its moments and its laughs. I had a
good time and give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
British MI-6 agent Andrew Osnard (Pierce Brosnan) really screwed up his
last assignment and is reassigned to the armpit of the Foreign Service -
Panama. Trying to make the best of a bad assignment, Andrew recruits the
local tailor to the Panamanian elite, Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush), for
information and unleashes a series of events that may lead to America
taking back the Canal in the John Le Carre story, "The Tailor of Panama."
Andrew Osnard is the antithesis of the always-honorable James Bond
character that we have viewed, for many years, as the quintessential
example of the British secret agent. Brosnan, himself, has made a career
playing the legendary 007, and takes a dark departure with his spy who is
left out in the cold by his bosses for his previous "indiscretions." Andrew
is the kind of suave, yet slimy, guy who can seize opportunity when he sees
it. That's when he has the idea to bring Harry into his control and milk
the tailor for information about his well-to-do clients, to get the pulse
of Panama, so to speak.
Harry has built his business on a Saville Row reputation and has become
quite well off as the clothier to Panama's stars. But, a bad, costly
investment in a failing farm forces Harry to act as an info-for-pay
resource for Andrew. To get enough money to cover his debts, Harry invents
a story about the country's "Silent Opposition," led by a former Noriega
foe, Michelangelo Abraxus (Brendan Gleeson). Mickey, Harry reports to
Andrew, is the new hope of the Panamanian people to end the government's
continued repression. The only trouble is, Mickey, Harry's good friend,
isn't told about the deception. As the money starts to roll in, the
indebted tailor perpetuates his lies with even bigger ones, digging himself
in deeper and deeper into a quagmire.
Andrew's controllers in Britain aren't satisfied with Harry's reports and
demand hard proof before giving their tailor a penny more. Desperate, Harry
involves his own wife, Louisa (Jamie Lee Curtis), assistant to the manager
of the entire Canal, without her knowledge. As things spiral out of Harry's
control, he sees everything he has so carefully built for so many years
come crashing around him.
As I watched the first two thirds of "The Tailor of Panama" I could not
help but to compare it to the 1960 Alec Guinness spy spoof, "Our Man in
Havana." Both films are about a hapless everyman who is drawn into the spy
game. But, since there is nothing, really, to spy on, he invents intrigue
and develops a fake spy network. In both films, the hero's intentions are
the best, but go wrong nonetheless. Both start out whimsically, but only
"Our Man in Havana" sustains it. Le Carre's story departs as it moves away
from its early whimsy and takes on a dramatic tone that reps a sudden
change of direction for the story.
This is where "The Tailor of Panama" runs into problems. The light-hearted
nature of the bulk of the film is smothered by the serious episodes that
represents Harry's final fall, losing him nearly everything he has worked
for - including his beloved wife. This sharp turn in the story occurs very
late in the film and is handled perfunctorily, making the viewer shift
gears abruptly. This may be faithful to Le Carre's novel, but the
screenplay, cowritten by the author, is, on the whole, unsatisfying in its
conclusion.
Performances, both in front of and behind the camera, are uniformly solid.
Geoffrey Rush is always a pleasure to watch and he gives nuance and
dimension to his Harry Pendel. Harry is not all he seems or says, but
preserving his family and life are his reason for his deceptions. He is a
good man who, in the end, must pay the price for trying to grab the gold
ring.
Pierce Brosnan appears to being having one heck of a good time as the
anti-Bond. His out-of-favor Andrew is cunning and underhanded enough to get
his way. He is not beyond using Harry's misinformation for his own gain,
even feathering his own nest with millions of dollars of espionage funds.
Brosnan comes across as sexy and sleazy at the same time.
The rest of the cast is made up by a bevy of talented actors, from Curtis
and Gleeson to Leanor Varela as Harry's disfigured (from the Noriega days)
secretary Martha, keeping the supporting cast close to the central action.
There is also a plethora of small and cameo performances, including
Catherine McCormack as Andrew's foreign service lover, Francesca, Jon
Polito as a deceitful banker and Harry's supposed friend, and Dylan Baker
as a gung ho US Army general. Playwright Harold Pintner plays the pivotal
role as Harry's dead Uncle Bennie, who appears to the tailor at critical
times, advising his nephew to give up his dangerous life.
Cinematographer Philippe Rousselot gives the film a lush, crisp look that
has a coolness belying the heat and humidity of the Panama location. As you
would expect from a story about a tailor, costuming, by Maeve Paterson, is
exceptional, especially the suits of Harry's design and the casual suavity
of Brosnan's attire.
"The Tailor of Panama" had me for the bulk of the film, but its sudden turn
from whimsy to drama left me out in the cold. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Trumpet of the Swan, The (2000)
A mute little swan named Louie just wants a voice of his own. His
well-meaning dad steals a trumpet, and wreaks havoc in the music store, to
help his son. But Louie seeks the help of a young boy, Sammy, to learn to
read and write so he can communicate with his swan friends. Still, even
after all of his hard work, no one understands him and Louie takes up the
stolen trumpet to try and find his voice. He uses his musical gift to
redeem his father and repay his debt in "The Trumpet of the Swan."
This is Saturday morning TV fare, at best, that should not subject the
viewer with the expense and hassle of seeing it at the theater. Because of
its Boston locales, especially the Public Garden, "The Trumpet of the Swan"
is released theatrically in this regional. But, parents, be forewarned that
you should wait for the video release which will happen very soon. This is
the type of movie used as a baby-sitter for the age 3 to 6 age demographic
it is so obviously aimed at. The simple story of the handicapped Louie
using his God-given gifts to overcome his disabilities (and get the
girl-swan, Serena, too) is full of good, easy to understand moral messages
suitable for young kids.
The importance of learning to read and write, overcoming disability,
finding your own voice, honor, family love, and more lessons of life are
dealt out in simple ways that won't be lost on young kids. Lots of pastel
colors and perky little songs are used to accompany the short attention
span episodes of Louie's adventures. He also gets the help of a little
beatnik squirrel who uses the "Internut" to communicate and teaches Louie
to play his trumpet from the heart. There are a bunch of other
cookie-cutter characters, but there's not much substance to any of them.
It's not that "The Trumpet of the Swan" is a bad movie, it's just not a
good one. Kid's movies don't have to be bland. Just look at a film like
"The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland" for intelligence and wit in kids'
entertainment. The stellar vocal cast - including Carol Burnett, Jason
Alexander and Mary Steenbergen - is far too potent for the material and can
only be another reason to try and capitalize on a theatrical run.
The television feel, flat production and bland characters of "The Trumpet
of the Swan" should relegate it to the small screen pretty quickly, so
don't waste your heard-earned cash taking the kids to see it at a matinee.
I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
It's a dog eat dog world out there and the tension is tangible as hundreds
of contestants from across America come together to participate in the
greatest event of their lives - the Mayflower Kennel Club Dog Show.
Director Christopher Guest follows five sets of contestants and their prize
canines as they journey to Philadelphia to compete in the prestigious event
in the mock documentary, "Best in Show."
Helmer and co-writer Guest got his mockumentary chops when he teamed with
Rob Reiner, Michael McKean and Harry Shearer in creating the brilliant fake
docu in the 1984 film, "This is Spinal Tap." In 1996, Guest joined with
Eugene Levy to create another mock doc in the charming tale about the
trials and tribulations putting together a small town pageant in "Waiting
for Guffman." Now, again with Levy, he tackles the wild and wacky world of
dog shows. Inspired by the trappings and scope of the famous Westminster
Kennel Club's annual event, Guest and his ensemble cast of the usual
suspects bring us into a world where pooches reign and owners vie for that
precious blue ribbon of a winner.
Joining Guest is a bevy of regulars who have worked with the helmer over
the years, along with some newcomers to his creative acting team. Michael
McKean is New York City hair salon owner Stefan Vanderhoof whose longtime
partner, professional dog handler Scott Donlan (John Michael Higgins), has
entered their precious Shih Tzu, Miss Agnes, as a contender for the
Mayflower doggie throne. Gerry and Cookie Fleck (Levy and Catherine
O'Hara), a mild-mannered salesman and his popular wife from Fern City,
Florida, have entered their handsome Norwich Terrier, Winky, as a
contestant in the show. Meanwhile, a pair of neurotic yuppie lawyers, Meg
(Parker Posey) and Hamilton Swan (Michael Hitchcock), have hopes that their
nervous Weimaraner, Beatrice, will be the big winner. Harlan Pepper (Guest)
from Pine Nut, North Carolina, thinks that his prime specimen of a
Bloodhound, Hubert, is the one to win. Finally, the wealthy and very aged
Leslie Ward Cabot (Patrick Cranshaw) and his voluptuous trophy wife, Sherri
Ann (Jennifer Coolidge), are certain that their two-time champion Standard
Poodle, Rhapsody in White, will once again go home with the gold.
Guest follows this group of contestants as they prepare to leave for the
Mayflower show, interviewing each as they tell him their hopes and
aspirations to win the prestigious event. They all take to the road, in a
variety of ways, and head toward their collective destinies at the
important canine event. Color is added to the various preparations and
journeys, particularly for Gerry and Cookie as she convinces her husband,
against his will, to make a side trip to visit an old boyfriend. Gerry soon
learns that Cookie didn't have dozens of boyfriends before meeting him, she
had hundreds! And these old boyfriends keep popping up though out the film,
much to Gerry's chagrin and our amusement.
The film meanders through the first half with the preparation and journey
to Philly for each team of dog and owner(s). At the mid-point, I was
declaring "Waiting for Guffman" as far better than "Best in Show." Then,
the "show" really begins. The second half takes an upturn as the filmmakers
recreate the pageantry of a top-notch, pure-breed dog show while the actors
interleave their improvisational humor with the seriousness of the event.
If you've ever spent the two days a year watching the Westminster dog show
on TV, you'll find that Guest and company did their homework well.
The mainstay of part two, in addition to the little, humorous dramas
unfolding for the contestants, is Fred Willard's outrageous perf as the
unlikely color man for the TV coverage of the Mayflower show. Buck Laughlin
is a sportscaster by trade who is brought in to commentate on the action
with the real dog show expert, Trevor Beckwith (Jim Piddock). Buck doesn't
have a clue about dogs and dog shows, but that doesn't stop him from making
off-color remarks and non-sequiturs about the action on the floor.
Willard's not stop, wacky chatter helps make the second half the funniest.
The large ensemble cast is given a lot of latitude in their mostly
ad-libbed performances of some rather eccentric characters. Chris Guest is
a true chameleon and puts a deft spin on his North Carolina bait shop
owner, Harlan, coming across every bit as the kind cracker who loves his
dawg Hubert. John Michael Higgins steals the show as the flamboyant dog
handler extraordinare and Stefan's lover. He plays up his naughty role,
making lewd sexual innuendo one of his favorite pastimes. Of the rest of
the cast Jane Lynch makes the next greatest impression as the self-assured
dog handler Christy Cummings, who trains Sherri Ann's prize poodle and has
a thing for her boss, too.
Coolidge, as Sherri Ann, strikes the right bosomy bimbo note as a lady who
didn't get to where she is, fabulously wealthy, because of her brains.
Guest's frequent collaborators -  Levy, O'Hara, McKean and Bob Balaban, as
Mayflower Kennel Club President Dr. Theodore W. Millbank III - all give
funny perfs and put a human spin on their individual characters. Another of
the director's regulars, Parker Posey, and Michael Hitchcock, fare the
least well as a pair of shrill, noisy yuppies who are the reason their dog
is neurotic. The dogs are champions, every one.
Guest and crew do a decent job of creating a real looking mock doc that
captures the essence of a big deal dog show. The characters that he follows
are uniformly amusing (though Meg and Hamilton grate on the nerves early
on) and their ability to improvise give the film the feel of a real group
effort.
The behind the camera efforts are first rate. "Waiting for Guffman"
cinematographer Roberto Schaefer creates a genuine looking faux doc,
shooting in super 16mm with handheld camerawork to add to the reality.
Another of Guest's usual suspects, Joseph T. Garrity, handles the
production design, from the households of the contestants to the show
itself, with distinctive flair.
"Best in Show" doesn't have the homey, even-handed charm of "Waiting for
Guffman," but it stands on all fours as a movie for and about dog lovers
and what those, at the levels shown here, are willing to go through to
bring their beloved pets to victory. The first half bogs down, but once the
show itself starts up, it all becomes OK. This is good, clean fun (there's
even a bit by Ed Begley Jr. that discusses the merits of doggie cleanup
products) that is true family entertainment. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit us at www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Cats & Dogs (2001)
Since time began, the fight for world domination has been going on between
two powerful and intelligent adversaries. Unknown to mankind, cats had once
wielded supreme power until the canines of the world threw out these feline
dictators. Since then, the struggle has continued until now when kitty-cat
leader, Mr. Tinkles (voice of Sean Hayes) has come up with a plan for him
and his minion to take back power and rule the world once again in "Cats &
Dogs."
Just look at the concept presented here: talking, smart cats and dogs wage
a war - the cats want to take over and the dogs, the loyal creature that
they are, want to save man from feline tyranny. Throw into this mix a mad
scientist, Professor Brody (Jeff Goldblum,) who is on the brink of finding
a permanent cure for dog allergies, a cure that would make it possible for
every man woman and child to own a dog. The cats, led by Mr. Tinkles, will
stop at nothing to destroy the formula and put Mr. T at the helm of a
kitty-dominated world.
When the Brodys' canine guardian Buddy is catnapped, a new protector must
been put in the old bloodhound's place to make sure the family is safe and
unaware of any danger. Circumstance pushes a cute beagle pup into their
household and the little guy soon learns of the evil feline plan. He is
recruited by doggie secret agent Butch (Alec Baldwin) and undergoes an
intensive course of training to fulfill his mission - protect the formula
and the family. When the Brody son, Scotty (Alexander Pollock), rejects the
puppy, calling him "Loser," or "Lou" for short, it becomes the little dog's
additional mission to become the boy's best friend.
This all sounds like a great idea - on paper, at least. Talking cats and
dogs, high-tech special F/X and a story concept that seems like a real
winner should make this a good, if not great, kids' movie. It isn't and
fails, miserably, in bringing any life to the wooden, unfunny screenplay by
John Requa and Glenn Ficarra. The elements of a successful film are there,
but the unentertaining story that should bring the animals and the F/X
together falls flat on its face. What we get is a routine fantasy with bad
kitties trying to take over the world and the good doggies out to stop
them. Throwing in numerous James Bond references - like an evil Russian
Blue cat hurling a knife at Lou, saying it's "from Russia with love," get
it? - and lots of high-tech gear like doggie rocket sleds is supposed to
make it exciting. Well, maybe for very small kids, but I think not for
anyone else.
The vocal talents used to give voice to the cats and dogs are okay, but
none of them breaths real life into their animal personas. Compare this
film, for example, with the much funnier anthropomorphic efforts in the
recent "Dr. Dolittle 2," where a few lines by a raccoon with rabies
provides more laughs than the entirety of "Cats & Dogs." Toby Maguire is
bland as the voice of little Lou. Alec Baldwin gives strength to his
vocalization of Butch, but he fights a losing battle. Sean Hayes is more
annoying than sinister as the power hungry feline, Mr. Tinkles. Wasted are
the vocal efforts of Susan Sarandon, Joe Pantoliano, Michael Clarke Duncan,
Jon Lovitz (who should have had a heck of a lot more fun as the toady
hench-kitty, Calico) and, especially, Charleton Heston. Live action players
Goldblum and Elizabeth Perkins must be told they made a horrible career
decision showing up here.
It is unfortunate that the special F/X team, led by Ed Jones and utilizing
the talents of Jim Henson's Creature Shop, are saddled with the incredibly
lame story. These folks make the animals do the impossible - talk, fly,
engage in martial arts and operate a rocket sled - and could have, with a
well-written, intelligent story and its execution, made this a fun summer
flick. As I have said many times before, special F/X, alone, do not make a
movie and even a kiddie pick should have intelligence and wit. "Cats &
Dogs" just batters you with the inane and lots of it.
Whoever created the theatrical trailer should be applauded (or disdained)
for doing such a great job in making a bad movie look good. Maybe that crew
should have made "Cats & Dogs." This is a case of shoot those responsible
and forgive the technicians. I give it a D.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
There has been a great deal of hoopla, over the past months, about the
coming of the big-screen recreation of the Grinch tale that debuted in 1966
as the Boris Karloff-narrated, Dr. Seuss classic. As everyone must know,
feel good director Ron Howard was teamed with zany Jim Carrey to bring the
animated tale to live action life and create the feature length fantasy,
"How the Grinch Stole Christmas."
The anticipation of this new rendition of the Christmas TV classic has
probably set expectations extremely high for fans who have eagerly awaited
the new Grinch. As such, I think that there may be some disappointment on
the entertainment horizon for many of us. And, I think this is due to our
fond memories of the original that color our recollection of that venerable
oeuvre. If you think about it, the original "Grinch" had four things going
for it - the Grinch, his faithful dog Max, the wonderful reading by Boris
Karloff and the brilliant imagination of Theodor S. Geisel, A.K.A. Dr.
Seuss. Beyond these four things (and the great songs - make that five
things), there are the Whos and they are really boring. The Whos could be
interchanged with Munchkins or Ewoks and it wouldn't have mattered. I never
liked any of the little buggers anyway.
In the modern remake, produced by longtime partners Howard and Brian
Grazer, we pretty much get the same thing, but with an attempt to flesh out
the Who society. Unfortunately and inexplicably, the Whos are shown from
the very start to be a culture of crass consumerism where buy, buy, buy is
the name of the game and the spirit of Christmas is completely lost -
except for little Cindy Lou Who (Taylor Momsen). The best things in the
movie are still the Grinch (Jim Carrey) and Max (Kelley), but there is an
effort to create a complete world on the screen.
Helmer Howard evokes a vision that is reminiscent of the one that Robert
Altman created in his interesting and artistic flop, "Popeye," with Robin
Williams. There, too, a fantasy world is built around a strange central
figure and is populated by all manners of cartoon creatures. In both films
the protagonists are loners who aren't accepted by society. The difference
between the two films, and the thing that will make the new flick a success
to Altman's ambitious failure, is Jim Carrey.
In a scant hour and a half or so of screen time, Carrey and makeup maestro
Rick Baker have created a living, breathing version of the creature that
came to life for so many of us in the Chuck Jones cartoon of 35 years ago.
Way back then, the Grinch became a sustained Christmas icon and Carrey and
crew have reinvented the creature whose heart "grew three times that day."
The best moments on the screen are when the Grinch is giving his mordant
soliloquies to no one save his faithful dog, Max. Remember how much you
liked Max in the original? You're going to like the new Max at least as
much, maybe more.
The Who world we are shown is glitzy and spangled with holiday cheer, but
it is a forced world, at best. The makeup for the adult Who population
takes on a feral quality that isn't very pleasant to look at and the petty
and selfish dealings of the Whoville mayor, May Who (Jeffrey Tambor), are
to be loathed. Only Cindy and her father Lou Lou Who (Bill Irwin) come
across with any intelligence or integrity. Momsen may be a little too old
to be an appropriate Cindy Lou Who, but the young actress makes her a real
person, I mean, Who. The rest of the Who world are consumed by their
rampant Christmas buying and holiday competition. Cindy's mom, Betty Lou
Who (Molly Shannon), is obsessed with having the best Christmas light
display and competes fanatically with her neighbor Martha May Whovier
(Christine Baranski), who, we come to find out, has the hots for the
Grinch.
Tech credits beyond Rick Baker's marvelous makeup are first-rate. Whoville,
created by production designer Michael Corenblith, is bright and colorful
with a slight off-kilter look that keeps up the fantasy flavor of the film.
The Grinch's lair has all the paraphernalia necessary for him to perpetrate
his grand theft of Who Christmas, including the requisite antler to
disguise Max as a reindeer. High marks are due costume designer Rita Ryack
who creates a furry skin for Carrey that is a match for Baker's makeup.
Lenser Don Petermen does a yeoman's job capturing the action on film.
The part of the story that recreates the venerable 30 minute TV show and
shows the Grinch go from lonely ogre to loving friend of the Whos is
captured with care by the filmmakers. Those things that are invented
specifically for the film - Who society, the flashback story on how the
Grinch became the lonely creature he is - do not have the same imagination
as the original Dr. Seuss work and it shows.
The brilliant casting of Jim Carrey and the intelligence to allow the actor
to become the character are what make "How the Grinch Stole Christmas" a
must see for the holiday season. It is certainly going to be a staple for
holiday video watching that will be a perfect companion piece to the
original. Carrey gives one of the most memorable performances of his career
and is a new Grinch icon. I'm still not a fan of the Whos, though, and I
give it a B.

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
Darren Aronofsky made an indelible splash with his debut film, the unique
science-fictionesque mathematical thriller called "Pi." That black and white
film, written by the director, is a stylish, intellectual flick that left a deep
impression on the viewer. Now, Aronofsky gives us his sophomore effort based on
the novel by Hubert Selby Jr. in a story of drug addiction that crosses
generations in "Requiem for a Dream."
Ellen Burstyn is Sara Goldfarb, a lonely, aging Jewish matron who lives for the
chance to appear on her favorite TV game show hosted by Tappy Tibbons (Chris
McDonald). Recently released from a mental care facility, Sara also lives under
the delusion that her junkie son Harry (Jared Leto) is a successful young man
with a beautiful fiancee who he plans to marry and produce a grandchild for
Sara.
Harry is on a fast track to disaster with his girlfriend Marion (Jennifer
Connelly) and best friend Tyrone (Marlon Wayans). Harry, the man with the plan,
has the idea that they should pool their cash, make a big score of smack, cut it
up and sell it for a profit, continuing the process until they have enough money
to buy a corner grocery store and live happily ever after. One problem. They
make the deal and agree to "let's do a little taste. It's business." One taste
leads to another and the downward spiral continues.
Meanwhile, poor, deluded Sara learns that she has been selected as a possible
candidate to appear on her beloved game show. Convinced that she is going to be
on national TV and loved by millions, she further fools herself that Harry is
doing fine and will soon marry. Gazing at a photo of her and Harry when he
graduated high school, she vows to go on a crash diet until she can again wear
the slinky dress from the picture. Normal dieting doesn't work, but a friend
tells her that a local doctor can take care of the problem easily. Sara takes
the advice and begins a legal amphetamine addiction that rivals her son's
illegal heroin needs.
While "Requiem for a Dream" is a finely crafted film that benefits from good
acting, especially Burstyn, a well-written script by Aronofsky and the novelist,
and confident direction by the second-time helmer, it is, in a word, a bummer. I
don't mean that it is a bad film, but the subject matter and the depiction of
uncontrolled addition, especially of the aging Sara, are gut wrenching in
display and detail of the despair. As things spin out of control for the four
addicts there is a palpable feel of hopelessness permeating the movie.
Things start off pretty shaky from the beginning and deteriorate fast for all
the principles, reminding me of the early Al Pacino film, "Panic in Needle
Park." In the 30-year interim between the 1971 film and "Requiem for a Dream"
there has not been any changes in the world of drug addiction. Now, as then,
drugs, whether legal or not, can destroy lives and filmmakers like Aronofsky
seem to revel in the depravity of this subject.
The helmer gives weight to each of his characters' stories. Sara is sadly
sympathetic as we watch this lonely lady cling to the false hope of fame, while
falling prey to legally sanctioned addition in the form of prescribed diet
pills. Burstyn gives a solid, harrowing character study that is also an
indictment against the incompetent medical industry that permits the legal
creation of such hapless victims. The actress deserves acclaim come year's end.
The youthful trio led by Leto are pathetic in both their needs and their
desires. Their united front to become heavy-hitting drug dealers soon falls
apart as the need to shoot up overrides all else. Harry ends up losing his arm
to dirty needles, Marion debases herself sexually for a fix and Tyrone ends up
doing hard time for dealing. All in all, these folks are not poster children
used to extol the use of heroin. The ending, with all of the victims curled into
the fetal position, pretty much punctuates the powerful anti-drug theme of
"Requiem for a Dream."
Aronofsky makes no bones about dealing with unconventional film fare in his
first features, displaying a dark, educated intelligence in filmmaking and
storytelling. Neither of his films is compelling from a mainstream sense and
"Requiem" delves into the darker side of human existence and waves it before us
like a flag, daring us to watch. His depiction of the addictions and the
treatments that our society provides to its addicts is hard stuff to watch and
should not be approached blithely.
"Requiem for a Dream" is not for the average movie-going bear and is geared for
the hard core film nut who relish addiction flicks such as the aforementioned
"Panic in Needle Park," "Lost Weekend" and, even, "Trainspotting" (though the
latter is almost lighthearted in its treatment of substance abuse). The
demographic target for "Requiem" is focused on a extremely tight viewing
audience with a specific agenda. I doubt if it will get beyond the art
house/film buff exposure. It's a harsh film but with excellent technical
attributes and fine performances by Burstyn and all. Think about it but be
prepared to be shocked. I give it a B.
For more Reeling Reviews visit us at www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Va savoir (2000)
French stage star, Camille (Jeanne Balibar), is returning to Paris after
three successful years working in Italy. She left the City of Lights after
breaking up with her pretentious boyfriend, Pierre (Jacques Bonnaffe), and
has since been living with the owner of the theater company, Ugo (Sergio
Castellitto), in which she performs. When he moves his troupe to Paris for
a run of the play "As You Desire Me," Camille's interest in Pierre is
rekindled and she has to make some life-changing decisions in "Va Savoir."
73-year old veteran helmer Jacques Rivette was one of the original
contributors to the legendary French film critique publication, Cahiers du
Cinema, with the likes of Francois Truffaut, Alain Resnais, Jean-Luc Godard
and Claude Chabrol. He, and the rest, began the French New Wave movement
and Rivette was the first of these film icons to make a feature film under
this aesthetic. He is best known for his memorable "Celine and Julie Go
Boating" (1974), establishing his technique of a story-within-a-story.
With "Va Savoir," Rivette utilizes this method once again, this time
leafing in bits of performances of a play while following three women and
three men as they become entangled in each other lives during the play's
run in Paris. Camille has lived, for the past two years, in Italy with Ugo
and starred in his troupe of players. He made plans to take their current
theatrical production on the road to France, but poor advance ticket sales
have the director/actor worried. He is also unaware of his lover's
still-smoldering feelings for Frenchman Pierre, an intellectual working on
a treatise about German philosopher Heidegger.
Once in Paris, Camille is distracted by her memories of Pierre and it shows
in her performance in the play. She forgets her lines, at one point, and
relies on other members of the troupe to help her out. She knows, at this
point, that she must find Pierre and goes to their old apartment, finding
not Pierre but his significant other, Sonia (Marianne Basler). Camille
leaves without telling her name, but fully intends to find her ex and
confront her past.
Though Ugo is worried over the poor ticket sales for his play, he is also
obsessed with searching for an unpublished manuscript by 18th century
Italian dramatist, Carlo Goldoni. While poring through the archives in
Italy, he meets a beautiful young student, Do (Helene de Fougerrolles), who
helps him in his quest. The pretty researcher is very attracted to the
actor and she guides him to a small, private library in Paris that may have
just what he seeks. He meets the proprietor, Madame Desprez (Catherine
Rouvel), only to find out that the lady is Do's mother. While there, he
also meets Do's half-brother Arthur, a shady, possessive guy who, we find
out, uses his seductive powers for his own larcenous gains. Arthur, it
turns out, is bent on seducing Sonia for whatever he can get from her to
fuel his gambling habit.
Rivette (who co wrote the script with Pascal Bonitzer and Christine
Laurent) keeps it light as each player has his/her own agenda of love. This
is the kind of romantic comedy that forgoes a simple triangle of
relationships as Camille seeks to find out if her decision to leave Pierre,
three years ago, was the right one. Complicating this is the fact that she
has also developed an affection for Sonia following a disastrous dinner
where Ugo, knowing about Camille's past with Pierre, is less than civil to
his girlfriend's former lover. Ugo is also distracted by his search for the
missing Goldoni script, "The Destiny of Venice," and by the attentions of
Do, who challenges the Italian with the choice of a Venetian destiny or a
Parisian chance. There may also be something going on between Do and
Arthur, too.
The comedy of "Va Savoir" is not nearly as broad as would be seen in an
American or British sex farce. It is much more subtle and makes you grin at
times but doesn't generate any real laughs. This is part of the
sophisticated French attitude toward sex where infidelity is not overtly
confronted, but accepted as a Francophile way of life. This isn't to say
that the members of the each of the couples in the flick tacitly accept
their other's infidelities, real or imagined. When Ugo joins Camille for
dinner at the home of Pierre and Sonia, his body language - wolfing down
dinner, terse responses to questions and a generally uptight demeanor -
speaks for itself the discomfort he has with the situation.
Jeanne Balibar gives an aloof, almost detached performance as Camille. Her
character, the temperamental actress, sees life only from her viewpoint,
expecting those around her to accept her self indulgence as she decides
which man she will end up with - Pierre or Hugo. There is also a dalliance
with Arthur, but that is for more altruistic reasons that revolve around
Sonia. Sergio Castellitto is terrific as Ugo. He is obviously torn up by
Camille's past and, possibly, future, but is also smitten by the attention
by Do and there is a palpable sexual attraction between the two. His search
for the missing Goldoni is really an aside to the film's romantic comedy
but there is a natural feel to his obsession that fits the film's flow.
Marianne Basler and Helene de Fougerolles are both beautiful and talented
in their portrayals of Sonia and Do, respectively. Jacques Bonnaffe, as
Pierre, is dead on as the intellectual who can be, initially, attractive
but, with his own boring obsession with Heidegger, he soon wears on you. I
wondered why Camille and Sonia would even be attracted to such a twit.
Bonnaffe is good in his performance as the self-possessed Pierre. Bruno
Todeschini is suitably slimy as the conniving, selfish Arthur who, we hope,
will get his deserved comeuppance.
The structure of the film keeps it from being stodgy and stage bound by
interleaving pieces from different parts of different performances of Ugo's
play. By the time the movie is over you build up a pretty fair
understanding of the plot of "As You Desire Me" and it helps to keep the
film moving along even while making it longer than it would be without this
device. Rivette and his co writers do a good job of combining the play
within the movie. Cinematography, by frequent Rivette collaborator William
Lubtchansky, is static, giving the flick the feel of a stage play being
filmed. Other techs are adequate if unremarkable.
"Va Savoir" is the obvious work of a veteran filmmaker who maintains a sure
hand on things, gleaning good performances out of his actors even with the
sparse, conventional material at hand. It lacks the sparkle that an
outstanding romantic comedy should have, but is an entertaining little
farce, still. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Valentine (2001)
Valentines Day is usually a holiday of romance and love. But, not this
year, it isn't. When the delivery of a threatening Valentine card is
followed by a brutal murder of a young med student, her friends soon learn
that someone from their past is stalking them all in "Valentine."
Been there. Seen that. This pretty much sums up the 90+ minutes you'll
spend if you decide to waste your hard earned dollars on a ticket for
"Valentine." Director Jamie Blanks ("Urban Legends") and a battery of
writers bring the adaptation of Tom Savage's novel to the screen in a
pretty production that is all good looks and absolutely no substance.
The story rehashes the horror genre in an unoriginal and uninvolving way
that simply marks its time and body count until the muddled and silly
ending. This is a shame since the production values deserve to be in a much
better film. Every horror movie cliché - cheap jump-out-of-the-dark scares,
the mandatory masked/faceless killer,
go-into-the-dark-room-and-see-what-made-that-noise, pretty victims - are
used frequently but to little good effect.
In the movie's prologue, a school dance for teens is marred by an incident
involving the school dork, Jeremy Melton (Joel Palmer), and one of his
female classmates. Jeremy is accused of molesting the girl and is sent to
reform school. Years later, one of the girls who made fun of Jeremy,
Shelley (Katherine Heigl), receives a death threat Valentine's card and is
soon the victim of a brutal murder at the hands of a butcher
knife-wielding, cherub-masked killer.
Soon, Shelley's friends begin to fall victim to more Valentines and
violence as, one by one, they are slain in a variety of ways, from bow and
arrow to electrocution to bludgeoning with a steam iron. The body count
steadily rises as the killer stalks and kills, one by one, each of the
friends until only one, Kate (Marley Shelton), is left to face the
murderer.
Movie slight of hand and the expectation of audience acceptance of any and
all illogic are the fodder that drives "Valentine." The ambiguity of the
killer - the threatening cards are invariably signed "JM" - leads us to
believe that young Jeremy is the culprit. Along the way, misleads and
maguffins prevail as the storytellers try a shell game to keep us guessing
just who the killer is. Unfortunately, they only kept me guessing for the
first 20 minutes. After that, I marked time until proved correct, in the
end. This certainly takes the thrill out of "thriller."
The unfortunate cast is populated with a bevy of pretty young women who
provide the victim pool with candidates for the escalating body count. TV's
"Angel," David Boreanaz, is ostensibly the film's star, what with being top
billed and everything. But, the actor wanders through his role looking as
if he's in the wrong movie. Denise Ricahards, on the heels of being a Bond
girl, seems to have made a very bad career choice as just another slasher
victim. The rest are pretty and bland. Jessica Capshaw gets the most
mileage as the formerly fat girl who bears a grudge against her prettier
friends.
As I said, the production is far superior to the story, with stylish
photography by Rick Bota giving things a slick look. Set design, too, by
Stephen Gaeghan, lends a terrific appearance with some inventive sets,
including a video art gallery that is visual eye candy. Too bad the rest of
the film fails to meet the production standards. Helmer Blanks should
rethink his dedication to the horror genre.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001)
Young Milo Thatch (voice of Michael J. Fox) has the heart of an adventurer.
When a long lost and very old journal, once found by his explorer
grandfather, surfaces, the cartographer/linguistics expert becomes the key
to unraveling an ancient mystery in Disney's latest animation, "Atlantis:
The Lost Empire."
Disney Studios has played the release of "Atlantis" very close, too close,
to the chest for a potential animation blockbuster, so I had mixed feelings
of anticipation when we attended a Saturday morning kids' screening. Then,
the MPAA rating came up on the screen - Rated PG. What's this? A Disney
summer anime with a PG rating? I suspected, at this point, that something
good was up.
The movie starts with our soon-to-be hero, Milo, lecturing his "colleagues"
on the existence of the lost continent of Atlantis. It turns out he's just
pretending as he prepares to present his theory to his doubtful boss, Mr.
Harcourt (voice of David Ogden Stiers). Unfortunately for Milo, Harcourt
considers the theory - Atlantis is in Iceland - absurd. But, when a
gorgeous blonde, Helga (voice of Claudia Christian), sets up a meeting with
eccentric billionaire Preston B. Whitmore (voice of John Mahoney), Milo
finally finds someone who will listen to him.
Not only does Whitmore listen, he has already invested enormous sums of
money preparing for an expedition to find lost Atlantis and has been
waiting for someone with Milo's unique talents to join his team. In charge
of the mission is the burly Commander Rourke (voice of James Garner) who
leads his crew, in an enormous submarine, to the map coordinates dictated
by Milo from the ancient journal.
When the team reaches the undersea entrance to Atlantis, Leviathan, a huge,
metal, lobster-like guarding the doorway to the lost land, attacks them.
Rourke orders an attack on the beast and launches a phalanx of mini-subs.
They are only partly effective in stopping the metal monster and most of
the crew of 200 is lost. As the remaining explorers journey, heavily armed
and equipped, into Atlantis, Milo and the rest soon learn that they are not
entering a dead archaeological site but a living, breathing land teaming
with life, including the Atlanteans, and Milo is the only one who speaks
the language.
It's at this point that the story shifts gears from adventure and a search
for the ancient culture to one of intrigue. The mythical power source that
allowed the advanced evolution of the Atlaneans comes to the attention of
Rourke and his henchmen and they plan to take the treasured crystal for
their own gain. At the same time, Milo falls for a beautiful Atlantean,
Princess Kida (Cree Summer), and learns that the land and its power supply
are slowly dying. Only he can read the ancient runes and save Atlantis, but
is it too little, too late in the face of the invaders?
Much in the tradition of Jules Verne adventures, "Atlantis: the Lost
Empire" melds past period setting with the futuristic. Such adventures as
"20,000 Leagues Under the Sea" and "Journey to the Center of the Earth"
come to mind as the high-tech action of "Atlantis" kicks in and animated
splendor of Disney comes to the fore. This is, visually, one of the most
advanced animation works to come out of the industry giant. The deep canvas
background animation developed for "Tarzan" is used liberally, giving the
proceeds a live action look and feel. The combination of traditional cell
animation and computer-generated imagery (CGI) is seamless, with fluidity
of movement that, too, harkens to live adventure/action films.
There is a big cast of vocal talent accompanying Michael J. Fox - who gives
naďve, boyish charm to his intelligent, kind Milo. James Garner gives a
good twist as his Commander Rourke shifts from benign leader to ruthless
mercenary, along with his babe henchlady, Helga (Christian), who is one
tough chick. There is an ample supply of comic relief provided by the other
vocal cast and their characters. The late Jim Varney lends his drawl one
last time in the guise of Cookie, whose idea of nutrition is meat along
with great quantities of grease. Don Novello (Father Guido Sarducci) lends
his vocal talent as the sardonic, carefree explosives expert, Vinny
Santorini. Florence Stanley (TV's "Barney Miller" and "Fish") is a riot as
the chain-smoking, curmudgeon communications office, Mrs. Packard, in a
vocal perf that would have made Thelma Ritter proud. Vocal talent Corey
Burton provides and outrageous French accent to his character "Mole"
Moliere, the team's earth digger. Leonard Nimoy provides dignity to the
voice of the king of Atlantis.
The production owes a great deal to other animations that have preceded it.
Elements from such films as Ralph Bakshi's "Wizards," "The Iron Giant" and
"Beauty and the Beast" are evident, as are the aforementioned Jules Verne
adaptations to the screen. These various antecedents may have influenced
"Atlantis," but the makers take these elements and spin them into a fresh,
rip-roaring action/adventure that will please older kids through to the
adults. Younger kids will be left behind with this more adult-oriented
Disney animation, so send them to see "Shrek" instead.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
During the Reign of Terror of the French Revolution, the infamous Marquis
de Sade (Geoffrey Rush) narrowly avoided an appointment with Madame
Guillotine. Instead of losing his head, the randy aristocrat was given over
to the care of Abbe Coulmier (Joaquim Phoenix), the  head of the Charenton
Asylum for the Insane. The Marquis, whose writings were sexually
inflammatory, produced some of his most notorious works with the unwitting
help of the Abbe and the more than willing help of Madeleine (Kate
Winslet), a smart, inquisitive laundress at the asylum in director Philip
Kaufman's "Quills."
Philip Kaufman doesn't make a lot of movies. He certainly is not known for
his ability to "crank out" films on a quick and regular basis. Instead, the
helmer provides quality, and sometimes groundbreaking work, like the paean
to America's space program, "The Right Stuff," and his controversial, NC-17
(the very first movie rated as such) "Henry & June."
Now, he adapts the play by Doug Wright (who also wrote the screenplay) on
the last, imprisoned years of one of the most famous authors and men of his
time.
Today, the word sadism - which refers to sexual pleasure derived from pain
- draws a picture in our minds of a man who has forsaken propriety for the
satiation of his carnal and prurient pleasures. The Marquis de Sade may
have epitomized the definition of the word that bears his name, but
scripter Wright takes us down a very different path in his examination of a
man who, at the very basis of he accomplished, was the devout proponent for
the freedom of speech and artistic creativity.
We first meet Sade as the guillotine is falling on those hapless folks who
were on the wrong side of the Revolution. The story begins with the Marquis
telling what sounds like a bawdy story of a comely young woman only to have
the action change from lustiness to carnage as the razor sharp blade of the
guillotine snuffs out her life. It's a shocking opening to a film that
proceeds to tell us about the man, Sade, who is compelled to tell his tales
in a way that both shocks and titillates the reader. His unwillingness to
compromise his work causes his imprisonment (in relative luxury) by the
leaders of the revolt. His brief stint of freedom, following the
Revolution, is ended when he is committed to the Charenton Asylum by the
Emperor Napoleon for publishing erotic novels.
Wright's screenplay follows the last years of Sade as the man subverts the
system that imprisons him by secretly spiriting new manuscripts to his
publishers with the help of Madeleine, the laundress. Sade and Madeleine
form a chaste, though laden with sexuality, relationship that allows the
confined aristocrat a distraction from his confinement. Madeleine proves to
be extraordinarily intelligent, learning to read and write from the Abbe,
and using her education to read Sade's 'scripts to the unwashed masses
working at the asylum. (Madeleine is kind of like an 18th century book on
tape.) With her help, and the unknowing cooperation of the naďve Abbe, one
of Sade's most notorious works, Justine, hits the streets, eventually
falling into the hands of Napoleon, who "leafed through the most abominable
book that a depraved imagination ever conceived."
The Emperor's less than kindly attention results in the assignment of Dr.
Antoine Royer-Collard (Michael Caine) to act as "advisor" to the Abbe. The
doctor's methods of treatment for "psychiatric" patients crosses the border
to the barbaric, making the viewer wonder who the true sadist is. During
this period, the Abbe is ordered to curb the work coming from Sade's cell
and the cleric begins by removing all the author's quills (hence, the
title), ink and parchment. Not one to be easily stymied in his creativity,
Sade uses chicken bones and red wine as his writing implements and his
sheets as paper to get his stories out to Madeleine. When even these meager
tools re removed, the resourceful Marquis uses bits of broken glass as
pens, his blood for ink and his very clothes for parchment. Besides the
obvious free speech theme of the story, you also get the moral that you
can't keep a good man down.
The acting amongst the three principles - Rush, Winslet and Phoenix - is
superb. There is a triangle of sorts but in a different way than one would
expect. Sade and Madeleine have a teacher/student relationship through most
of the film. It's not that the randy-minded marquis wouldn't like to jump
the pretty laundress's bones, he respects her too much to insult her or
drive her away. Madeleine and the Abbe also have a flirtatious
relationship, but, again, one that remains chaste through to the tragic
end. Sade and Abbe Coulmier strike up a long-term friendship with the
enlightened priest allowing Sade to oversee Charenton's theater as a form
of therapy. Each of the actors puts a convincing spin on their perfs with
Rush standing tallest. Caine's Royer-Collard is the symbol of the
oppression of free expression and isn't allowed beyond the symbolic nature
of the character. The members of the asylum provide an interesting,
sometimes bizarre, backdrop.
The claustrophobic feel of the play is carried to the screen and is
effective in showing the imprisonment of the remarkable marquis. I found it
to be a bit too constrained, not translating to the big screen as well as
other plays turned screenplays, like "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest."
But, this is a minor complaint on a uniformly solid work.
Tech credits are exemplary with production designer Martin Childs lending
his Oscar-winning talents in creating the Marquis's prison as it
deteriorates from comfortable chambers to a bare prison cell. Costuming, by
Jacqueline West, isn't pretty - it does take place in an insane asylum,
after all - but it certainly fits the tone and period of the story.
Newcomer to American film, lenser Rogier Stoffers, captures the
claustrophobic feel of Sade's prison.
Philip Kaufman may not come out with a film but once every several years,
but they are worth waiting for. The quality work in "Quills" is no
exception and worth the effort. You won't get big, flash F/X and explosions
or lines like "I'll be back," but you will get a thought provoking yarn
about a man whose name is in the dictionary. How many people can you say
that about. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Made (2001)
Bobby (Jon Favreau) is a small-time hood who wants to become a champion
boxer, but, with a 5-5-1 record, he is going nowhere fast. His girlfriend,
Jessica (Famke Janssen), is a lap dancer, a fact he has a hard time with,
especially when he escorts her to client bachelor parties. His boss, Max
(Peter Falk), likes Bobby and wants to help the troubled pug, so he sends
him across country to make an important drop. With his best friend, the
very problematic Ricky (Vince Vaughn), in tow, Bobby heads for big trouble
in the Big Apple in "Made."
"Made" tries to be a number of different things and, unfortunately, doesn't
do any of them well. Bobby wants to be a champ, seems dedicated, and gives
up. He wants to have a normal relationship with stripper girlfriend Jessica
(Famke Janssen), but that falls apart. He wants out from his mob
connections but continues to do Max's bidding out of loyalty. He knows his
best friend is an obnoxious, troublemaking bore, but persists in putting up
with every stupid thing Ricky does. There are also mob dealings, gangland
ambushes, an ambiguous shady deal, a Scotsman called "The Welshman" (David
O'Hare) and an unsung hero, limo-driver Jimmy (Vincent Pastore). There is
plenty going on, but none of it has focus.
There is an amusing chemistry between Favreau and Vaughn as best friend
characters, but, a few minutes into "Made" I'm asking myself "why in heaven
would Bobby ever put up with the obnoxious Ricky?" When Bobby gets his
friend a job as a driver for connected Max, Ricky sells the truck and
pockets the money. When they go on the "job" to New York City, Ricky does
everything he can to prove he is a jerk - over-bearing, he'll hit the
flight attendant call button with the most inane requests just because he
can, regardless of how annoying he is. When Max gives strict orders to stay
sober and keep a low profile, Ricky gets hammered and lets everyone know
he's there. And Bobby just puts up with it. The relationship never makes
sense and Favreau doesn't try to explain the why of it except to say that
they were boyhood friends. Vaughn's is a reprise of the same character he
played in "Swingers," but even more insufferable.
While the camera centers on the antics of Ricky and Bobby, there are a
couple of perfs worth mentioning. Sean "Puffy" Combs gives a good badass
tough guy persona to New York-based Ruiz, an "associate" of Max. It's
always a pleasure to watch Peter Falk even if his Max character only gets a
few minutes screen time. Friends of Favreau make up much of the cast with
cameos and small roles abounding with the director's buddies.
Favreau is trying for a gritty look and feel and uses hand-held cameras to
an annoying degree. Too many tangents hurts the flow of the film and Vince
Vaughn, while sickly funny, gets to be too much to take. "Made" doesn't
make it and I give it a C.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bandits (2001)
Joe Blake (Bruce Willis) and Terry Collins (Billy Bob Thornton) are bank
robbers looking to make the string of scores necessary to allow them to
retire, in comfort, south of the border. Their M.O. as the non-violent
Sleepover Bandits has earned them the reputation as the most famous thieves
in American history and their plan looks like it just might work. But, when
a pretty, unhappy housewife, Kate Wheeler (Cate Blanchett), joins the tiny
gang she steals something, too - their hearts - in Barry Levinson's
"Bandits."
Joe is an irresistible felon who, with a word and a smile, can melt any
woman's heart and just wants to enjoy life. Terry is a hypochondriac who is
obsessed with his imaginary diseases and worries over every day-to-day
detail. They seem like the unlikeliest team of bank robbers but, as they
say, opposites attract and between the two of them they make the ideal man
and crook. Joe, always one to shoot from the hip, breaks them out of prison
in a daring, impromptu escape aboard a cement truck. The pair, on the lam
now, talk about their future and decide that they will head down to Mexico
where Joe's uncle runs a struggling hotel. They figure that the can turn
the place into a successful nightclub if only they can lay their hands the
cash to do it. But, how to do it?
Terry, the smart one, comes up with a plan that is brilliant in its
simplicity. Since their usual trade of robbing banks, with guns and guards
abundant during a busy business day, is risky, to say the least, he devises
a way to avoid getting shot and caught. The idea is, kidnap the bank
manager, hold him/her hostage with the family overnight, have a nice dinner
and sleepover, then go to the bank before it opens with the manager,
collect all the cash and split. No fuss and no muss. They enlist Joe's
loyal young cousin, Harvey J. Pollard (Troy Garrity), to be their getaway
driver, put the plan into action and, to Joe and Terry's surprise, it all
works! They split the loot and go their separate ways until the next heist.
Things go as planned for the next robbery, too, but after they separate,
Terry's car runs out of gas and, before he can get more and take off, the
cops show up. He needs another set of wheels in a hurry and decides to
carjack a ride. Enter Kate, a lonely, unhappy housewife whose husband pays
her scant attention. Distraught after his latest bout of ignoring her, she
takes her Mercedes for a spin to clear her head and, literally, runs into
Terry. He is totally disoriented, thinks he has a concussion and makes the
mistake of taking a ride with the hysterical Kate. He takes her to the
"gang's" hideout and, unless they shoot her and bury the body in the woods,
Terry and Joe are stuck with the haus frau. This isn't a problem for Joe,
who immediately takes a liking to the pretty housewife and she joins them
in their spree. Things get complicated as Kate falls for both guys (and
vice versa), which leads to a dramatic standoff with the police on their
last, big job.
Levinson and screenwriter Harley Peyton, with their talented trio of stars,
have succeeded in creating a modern day version of "Butch Cassidy and the
Sundance Kid," but with a twist. In this new millennium bank robbery
western Kate replaces Etta Place (Katherine Ross) from the '69 flick as the
romantic interest, this time showing her love for both of her versions of
Butch and Sundance. It is obvious from the beginning that the very
different Joe and Terry, though flawed, do have their good points. Together
they make the perfect man - strong, sensitive, intelligent and capable -
and Kate refuses to choose between them. This makes "Bandits" a fine
buddy/road/romantic comedy film that wears its non-violent larceny as a
benevolent badge of honor.
Willis, Thornton and Blanchett are a solid triumvirate of actors who forgo
the usual star power and work hard to be convincing as the characters the
play. Bruce Willis is understated as the charismatic, action-oriented Joe
and plays well as part of the ensemble instead of his usual focal star
persona. His onscreen charm is obvious and he keeps it in part with his
costars. Billy Bob Thornton, once again, shows his mettle as an
experienced, convincing character actor. He puts a solid spin on his Terry,
creating a nerdy, smart felon who, though a rampant hypochondriac, is able
to survive life day by day. Cate Blanchett, once again, proves herself to
be one of the finest actors in the business. The Australian is capable of
playing any kind of character and is able to do an American accent that
would make a native proud. The three actors display a chemistry that allows
you to lose yourself in their interplay and believe them as real people.
Supporting cast is limited, mainly, to a funny, goofy performance by Troy
Garrity as the none-too-bright Harvey. The newcomer portrays his character
as what Joe says is "honest and follows good." He doesn't have the stomach
for a direct part in the larceny but he is loyal and does what he can for
his older cousin, Joe. What Harvey really wants is to be a movie stunt man
and this career endeavor makes for some of the film's best slapstick
moments. The rest of the cast is there to fill the void around the stars
and not much more. One exception is Peggy Miley as Mildred Kronenberg, a
bank manager who is thrilled to be one of the Sleepover Bandits hostage
victims but refuses to give the crooks a red cent, knowing that she will
not be harmed in the least by her captors. Willis fans will note that two
of the stars kid's, Scout and Tallulah, appear as the daughters of one of
the kidnapped bank bosses.
As one expects in a film by Levinson, techs are solid. Veteran lenser Dante
Spinotti gives the film a cool, clean look and adjusts smoothly between the
warmth of those intimate moments between the three principle and the almost
clinical look of the heists. Costumes, by Gloria Gresham, is Oscar caliber
as Joe and Terry (and, eventually, Kate) are clothed in funky, funny
disguises that are more subtly funny than outrageous. Pop music plays a
prominent part in the film, especially for Kate who's a sap for sentimental
tunes like "Walk on By" and "Just the Two of Us."
"Bandits" is a little on the long side, clocking in at over two hours, and
could have been trimmed of some of its fat, but that's a relatively minor
nitpick. All in all, I had a rip roarin' good time and liked the story
about these amiable crooks. I give it an B+
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Legally Blonde (2001)
The burden of carrying "Legally Blonde" falls upon the shoulders of Reese 
Witherspoon and, with confidence and capability, she pulls it off. There is 
little beneath the surface of the story as we watch Elle prove herself 
smart time and time again. She is not just pretty and soon proves herself 
equal to any intellectual task presented her.. She is, of course, selected 
by one of her professors (Victor Garber) to be a law clerk on a high 
profile murder case. Her ex-boyfriend, Warner, and his new, serious (i.e. 
not blonde) girlfriend Vivian (Selma Blair) are also part of the team and 
Elle has to prove, repeatedly, that her blonde roots have not dumbed her 
down. Eventually, everyone gets the point. 
There is little going on with the supporting cast, mainly due to the 
shallow script that develops no one besides Elle. Luke Wilson is an obvious 
romantic interest, but that whole development is left as a footnote at the 
end of the film. Selma Blair, who made such a funny, charming splash in 
"Cruel Intentions," is left out in the cold as non-blonde Vivian. Matthew 
Davis is clueless as Warner and it makes one wonder just what Elle would 
see in such a narrow-minded and not that bright a guy. The rest of the cast 
members are more symbolic than real. 
Overall, production values are on the cheap side and, like the screenplay, 
shallow. Photography, by Anthony B. Richmond, looks murky and, except for 
some nice shots of Boston and Cambridge, is not notable. Kudos to Sophie de 
Rakoff Carbonell for her costuming of Witherspoon and her pet Chihuahua, 
Bruiser. 
There is more than just a passing similarity to the comedy hit, "Clueless," 
as Elle goes about improving the quality of life for those around her, 
including making a dorky law student a babe magnet. We've been here before 
and seen it done better. But, Witherspoon holds her own and makes "Legally 
Blonde" watchable, at least. I give it a C. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
An infamous psychopath, called "the Citizen," has terrorized the nation
with a rampage of bombings, shootings and arson. His next chosen target is
the hallowed home of American beauty, the Miss United States Pageant, and
it's up to the FBI to stop him. Enter Special Agent Grace Heart (Sandra
Bullock), pretty but lacking, shall we say, in the social graces, who is
chosen to go undercover as a contestant in the national beauty contest and
nab the felon in "Miss Congeniality."
Sandra Bullock has come a long way since her star-making debut in 1994's
blockbuster, "Speed." Since then the actress has turned producer and "Miss
Congeniality" is the product of that change. Working from a script by Marc
Lawrence, Katie Ford and Caryn Lucas, the film is a combo of crime caper
and "Pygmalion," with Bullock as a super cop crossed with Elisa Doolittle.
A Unibomber style nutcase is terrorizing the country with his senseless
mayhem. When another of "the Citizen's" cryptic letter arrives at the FBI,
Special Agent Eric Matthews (Benjamin Bratt) is put in charge of the case.
The letter is deciphered and shows that the Miss United States Beauty
Pageant is the target for his next nefarious crime. The only way to uncover
the madman, the plan and his victim is to place an agent into the pageant
as a contestant. The only agent that fits the bill (read that: looks good
in a swimsuit) is Grace Heart. There is only one problem. Grace acts more
like a guy than the guys around her do.
The Bureau hires a master beauty pageant consultant, Victor Melling
(Michael Caine), to turn the sow's ear that is Grace into a silk purse.
Henry Higgins has nothing on the challenge that Vic must face in trying to
change the uncooperative agent not just into a beautiful woman, but one who
is good enough to make it as one of the pageant's final five contestants.
Special Agent Heart is against the plan and refuses to join a "bunch of
bikini stuffers who only want world peace." But, her career is on the line
and, reluctantly, she undergoes the make over that will turn her into Miss
New Jersey.
This is all a cute premise for a film and the story takes the direction
that one expects. As Grace undergoes her metamorphosis from bedraggled,
cynical and tough law officer to sleek, poised and elegant national beauty
contestant, she realizes that changes are happening within her, too.
Against her prejudiced will, Grace begins to get to know the other
contestants and realizes that they aren't the bikini stuffers she thought
they were. In particular, Cheryl (Heather Burns), Miss Rhode Island, takes
a liking to Grace and, against the agent's will, she makes friends. Grace's
mission to protect her, now, friends takes on an even greater urgency when
she learns that pageant organizer and former contestant, Kathy Morningside
(Candice Bergen), is a prime suspect. You can take it from there.
"Miss Congeniality" has a hard time getting past its by-the-numbers,
routine plot that pulls in the usual chestnuts of undercover cop tale, "My
Fair Lady," fish-out-of-water story and, for good measure, a romance. It
also attempts to show the makings of a big-time beauty pageant and how they
are really scholarship programs and not just swimsuit shows. There is a lot
of stuff going on here and it gets muddled as the story progresses.
This is the likable Sandra Bullock's show. The writing focuses of Grace and
her gruff personality that you know will undergo a change the same way her
whole look is altered by artiste Victor Manning. The camera never leaves
the actress for long as we see her go from mannish FBI Agent Grace Heart to
megababe and beauty finalist Gracie Lou Freebrush. Bullock has the
personality and a comic ability to hold the center of the film, but this is
virtually a one-woman show. The only exception is the funny, fey
performance by Michael Caine as the mysteriously blackballed pageant
consultant. Caine gets the only chance to steel the star's limelight and is
an epiphany in a nicely developed comic role.
The rest of the cast, including Benjamin Bratt, get little to do but fill
the screen around Bullock. Bratt is handsome enough and may have talent,
but he has yet to get a role that is a break through. Other characters are
generic and unmemorable. William Shatner is wasted as Stan Fields, the long
time pageant emcee who is being fired because he is "too old," a la Bert
Parks and the Miss America pageant. Nothing ever happens with the character
or his dilemma in a poor piece of story crafting. I could not watch Candice
Bergen without thinking, "Murphy Brown."
"Miss Congeniality" doesn't bring you any closer to the world of beauty
pageants. Nor does it deliver more than a few chuckles as we see Agent
Grace stumble and fall repeatedly because of her high heels. It worked
once, maybe twice, but not six or seven times. There could have been a
better film in there. I give it a C+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Rush Hour 2 (2001)
In 1998, director Brett Ratner and his stars, Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker,
breathed new life into the buddy-action film genre with the cross-cultural
"Rush Hour" - to the tune of about $250 million. You don't mess with
success, so the team is back again, and better, in "Rush Hour 2."
The combo of the terrific physical talents of Chan and the non-stop motor
mouth of Tucker made for an ethnically unusual duet in "Rush Hour" that
played well to audiences around the world. The formula worked so well, in
fact, that the sequel was inevitable. I'm never thrilled with the idea of a
follow-up to a successful original since they rarely meet the previously
set expectations. Surprisingly, "Rush Hour 2" wastes no time getting down
to business and turns out to be better than the flick that spawned it.
The script, by Jeff Nathanson (utilizing the characters developed by Ross
LaManna in the first film), wastes no time getting to the point right from
the start. Terrorists have bombed the US embassy in Hong Kong, killing two
American translators, and Chief Inspector Lee (Jackie Chan) is handed the
job of solving the crime. Concurrently, his friend James Carter (Chris
Tucker) arrives on the island for some much needed R&R and expects his
friend to spend some time and show him the sights. Instead, Lee drags
Carter into the case and the duo get involved in stopping a conspiracy to
counterfeit hundreds of million of US dollars.
The makers of "Rush Hour 2" are working at a distinct advantage over the
original. We, the viewer, are familiar with the two lead characters and the
already-existing chemistry that Chan and Tucker developed so well the first
time around. That chemistry was a high point (and probably the saving
point) before and, now, the pair wears their friendship like a comfortable
suit. Little time is wasted in getting to know the key players so the
screenplay capitalizes on those things we liked best in "Rush Hour."
First and foremost to me, in "RH2," is the immense pleasure in watching
Jackie Chan's artistry in fight choreography. The 47-year old martial arts
master has a renowned reputation for doing all of his own stunt work and,
here, he does not disappoint. Chan's use of props when battling bad guys
continues as he pulverizes his opponents with whatever item comes to hand,
such as a trash bucket. His moves look every bit as good as they ever did
as he fights four or five nemesis at once on bamboo scaffolding, on the
tail end of a yacht, in a Hong Kong massage parlor and, for the finale, in
a Las Vegas casino. Like Harold Lloyd or Buster Keaton, Chan takes pride in
putting his physical self on the line in pursuit of his artistry and is a
joy to watch.
Chris Tucker reprises his role as the motor mouthed LA cop, Carter, who
teams, again, with Lee to put down the bad guys. When he is unceremoniously
pulled from his vacation to help his colleague and friend with the big
case, he still looks to have some fun. When Lee goes into a karaoke bar,
the lair of chief bad guy Ricky Tan (John Lone) and his hoods, Carter takes
the spotlight on stage with a credible Michael Jackson riff. The comedian
made the move from the improv stage to the big screen and, with Jackie
Chan, has a franchise to hang his coat on to pay the bills. The combo of
Chan's flying feet and fists with Tucker's fast mouth make a duet more
endearing than Riggs and Murtaugh in the "Lethal Weapon" films.
The supporting cast is here to move things along efficiently. John Lone, as
Ricky Tan, is a suave villain who is the real power behind the throne of
American bigwig Steven Reign (Alan King in a walk through performance).
Lone doesn't chew scenery or make pronouncements to "get Lee and Carter,"
but gives the chief bad guy elegance. Zhang Zi-Yi ("Crouching Tiger, Hidden
Dragon") continues to display her martial arts skills as Ricky's taciturn
henchlady, Hu Li, who carries on an ongoing battle with Carter. (Carter has
a problem, through most of the film, with hitting a woman, but this falls
aside with their eventual one-on-one melee at the conclusion.) Roselyn
Sanchez is knockdown gorgeous (and resembles Sandra Bullock) as undercover
agent Isabella Molina - she doesn't add much to the equation but is
terrific to watch.
Director Ratner and the original "Rush Hour" production team have assembled
a crew of skilled craftsmen to work behind the camera. Cinematographer
Matthew F. Leonetti has had a long career of shooting action flicks and
gives "RH2" the fluid camera movement the genre film needs. Production
design by Terrence Marsh spans continents and gives the right look, whether
it is in a Hong Kong karaoke bar or a high stakes Las Vegas casino. The
rest of the techs are of the same high quality.
I'm surprised to even say that "Rush Hour 2" is the most entertaining of
the summer blockbuster movies. It takes the best of the first film and
kicks Jurassic dino butt in its fun, frolic and fast pace and is the best
mainstream thing out, so far, this summer. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
Betty Sizemore (Renee Zellweger) is a waitress at a little diner in
Kansas City.  She's married to an abusive bully named Del (Aaron
Eckhart) who sells used cars and is involved in some pretty shady
dealings. It's no wonder that the highlight of Betty's day is to watch
the videotape of her favorite soap opera, "A Reason to Love" each
evening. While watching her show one night, she witnesses the murder
of her husband by two strangers over a drug deal. The killers don't
see her and Betty goes into a kind of amnesiac state, forgetting her
real life and suddenly believes she is the ex-fiance of the fictional
Dr. David Ravell (Greg Kinnear) from her television story. She leaves
Kansas for LA in search of her beloved (in her mind) doctor, not
knowing she has two very upset hit men on her trail in director Neil
LaBute's "Nurse Betty."
Neil LaBute is not known for his bouts of lighthearted whimsy - if you
witnessed his previous films, "In the Company of Men" and "Your
Friends and Neighbors," you'll know what I mean. "Nurse Betty" hardly
seems the kind of story the more darkly natured director would take on
for his third work. But, it is a good decision and marks LaBute as a
multitalented up and comer in the industry.
The rather conventional concept of the heroine going on the lam to
escape the vengeful bad guys is skewed 180 degrees, in the script by
newcomer James Flanberg, with the intro of Betty's unusual amnesia,
triggered by Del's untimely, violent (though not entirely undeserved)
death. The sudden shock to the system propels her to fall under the
delusion that "A Reason to Love" is real life and that she jilted
Dr. David a year and a half before. Realizing the error of her ways,
in her confused mind, she packs her stuff up and heads to LA to make
things right with her handsome ex-fiance.
Meanwhile, the two hit men, Charlie (Morgan Freeman) and Wesley (Chris
Rock), are frantic when they realize that both Betty and a Buick
loaded with their drugs are gone. They, too, head across country
looking for clues as to where Betty will show up. Charlie, at first,
thinks that Betty is a "cunning, ruthless woman" who coldly took off
with the drugs that were the cause of Del's death. As he and his
cynical partner Wes try to find her trail, Charlie begins to fall for
the pretty Betty as he gazes at her photo and builds an image of her
in his mind as they cross the country. By the time the pair hit LA,
Charlie is thoroughly smitten by the idea that he has fallen for
Betty.
Just when I was wondering how the heck the upcoming collision between
Betty and the boys would be handled, the charming, darkly funny
screenplay by Flanberg takes a twisty turn when Betty performs a
heroic act while searching for her beloved Dr. David. (This is where
the "nurse" in "Nurse Betty" comes into play.) The real fun of the
film is watching this part of the story unfold, so I'm not going to
discuss it. Let it be said that LaBute and his team of filmmakers - on
both sides of the camera - make the twists work in a way that is
funny, sad, entertaining and, in the end, extremely satisfying.
Renee Zellweger is an interesting actress who made a successful splash
with "Jerry Maguire," but hasn't had a chance, since, to show her
acting talent in a larger venue. With "Nurse Betty," this
changes. Zellweger shows the comedic talent to hold the lead of the
film and acquits herself in both the funny and dramatic bits. Morgan
Freeman, one of America's finest actors, hasn't had the chance to
really show his acting chops for quite a while. (Of course, the great
actor always gives his best to his films, even if the films themselves
don't.) Here, he gets the chance to create an interesting, sympathetic
character - who happens to kill people for a living. As Freeman goes
from the tough, deadly businessman to the romantic, smitten "suitor"
of Betty, you can see why he is one of the best in the business. The
rest of the cast is first rate, too. Chris Rock, as the acerbic,
cynical Wesley has an inherent mean streak that gives his no-nonsense
killer an edginess that lingers right to the end. The comedic
background of the actor helps to lend a dark funniness to the edge.
Crispin Glover ("Wild at Heart"), as Kansas reporter Roy, and Pruitt
Taylor Vince ("Heavy") as Sheriff Eldon Ballard have small, but
significant roles - displaying good humor, too - especially in the
film's shoot 'em up finale. Greg Kinnear gives the right note to his
dual perf as soap star George McCord and his TV doctor
persona. Allison Janney, as George's producer, helps flesh out the
background with a tight, funny performance. Tia Texada ("Paulie") is
both bright and sassy as the Hispanic women who befriends Betty
(remember the heroic act I mentioned?) after "Nurse" Betty saves her
boy friend.
The production team behind the camera complements the telling of this
offbeat tale with a nice harmony. Veteran cinematographer Jean-Yves
Escoffier ("Cradle Will Rock") gives a unique and interesting look to
each locale the characters visit in their separate journeys. Costume,
by Lynette Meyer ("Your Friends & Neighbors"), is sometimes kitschy,
especially with Betty dressed in her waitress outfit looking like
Dorothy from "The Wizard of Oz." (To reinforce the Kansas image, Betty
is called "Dorothy" at one point.) Helmer LaBute moves the story and
its characters right along with nary a moment wasted.
If you're looking for a dark, funny, sometimes caustic, comedy that is
a challenge to the mind - something the summer film fling doesn't
often allow - make tracks to the theater and ask to see "Nurse Betty."
It will be the right prescription. I give it an A-.

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
The world of international drug trafficking is a high stakes and high-risk
world where billions of dollars can be made pandering to the addictions of
American society. Steven Soderbergh's latest work, "Traffic," explores that
world and its players while showing the tragic results of addiction on the
family.
Soderbergh, since his radical debut in 1989 with "sex, lies and video
tape," has marched to his own filmmaking drummer and, though not always
successful ("Kafka"), has always been interesting. He not only proves to be
innovative, he can also wow the movie-going public with mainstream stuff,
too ("Erin Brockovitch"). On the heels of the latter film, Soderbergh could
have rested on his laurels but, instead, hits us with one of the best films
released in 2000.
The huge ensemble cast is wonderfully utilized to tell the several
different stories that inexorably intertwine and come together in the end.
Mexican cop Javier Rodriguez (Benicio Del Toro) works the border around
Tijuana with his friend and partner Manolo Sanchez (Jacob Vargas) under
Mexico's numero uno crime fighter, General Salazar (Tomas Milian). Their
job is to destroy the powerful Obregon drug cartel that is funneling
billions of dollars of illicit narcotics into the US.
Across the border, pretty housewife, Helena Ayala (Catherine Zeta-Jones),
is shocked to learn that her businessman husband Carl (Steven Bauer) was
arrested for drug trafficking. Her greatest fear in life, that she be left
a "debt-ridden 30-year old mother of two," is about to be realized if she
can't figure a way out. She is in hock to the cartel for millions and her
life threatened, forcing the innocent women to become a ruthless
businesswoman in her own right as survival, then greed, take over.
Michael Douglas is Ohio Supreme Court Justice Robert Wakefield, a
conservative, anti-drug advocate recruited by the President to become the
new US drug czar. While Wakefield throws himself into learning all he can
about drug smuggling, his teenage daughter, Caroline (Erika Christensen),
is a willing participant in the drug culture her father is tasked to
destroy. For Caroline, it is a steady downward spiral as she, first,
experiments with cocaine and freebase, then gives herself over sexually for
the intoxicating numbness of heroin.
Undercover DEA agents Montel Gordon (Don Cheadle) and Ray Castro (Luis
Guzman) rep the US involvement in the War on Drugs as they work overtime to
build their own case against the Obregon drug cartel. They bust mid-level
drug dealer Eduardo Ruiz (Mel Ferrer) and cut a deal to get him to testify
against Helena's husband. From here, the stories take on a further
complexity as the inexorably intertwine.
Soderbergh musters the best ensemble performance of the year from this big
cast that is also supplemented with a plethora of cameo perfs that flesh
out the complexly crafted tale. Michael Douglas and Benicio Del Toro give
Oscar-worthy performances as Judge Wakefield and honest cop Rodriguez. The
beauty about these and other perfs in the film is the depth the actors get
to plumb with their characters. Without a great deal of screen time, each
actor develops his or her role into multi-dimensional people. This is a
combination of fine acting and a deft hand by the helmer.
Catherine Zeta-Jones is cast in the less than glamorous role of a
protective mom. The pretty actress is given a character, in Helena, which
arcs across the screen. The confused, scared wife and mother is not someone
to be taken lightly as she learns of the extent of her financial burden. As
Helena takes control of her destiny, we see a frightening ruthlessness
develop. When she orders, "I want the principal witness against my husband
killed," she knows what she is doing and what she wants. It's the first
film where Zeta-Jones isn't just a pretty face and she acquits herself
well.
Don Cheadle and Luis Guzman ably man the action north of the border in
their own quest to bring down Juan Obregon. They have the more meat and
potatoes story as they catch, then turn state's witness, trafficker Ruiz.
This part of the tale is reminiscent of Steve McQueen's "Bullitt" as the
two cops struggle to keep their ward alive long enough to testify.
There are, as I said, lots of cameos and small roles with the likes of
James Brolin, Peter Riegert and Albert Finney showing up. Dennis Quaid is a
prominent background character as Helena's attorney and advisor. Amy Irving
is effective as the judge's wife, Barbara.
Tech credits are the best. Photography, by Soderbergh himself, is striking
as it changes from crisp, colder images when north of the border to soft,
sepia tones when south. The rest of the techs are just as notable. Stephen
Gaghan's script is as remarkable as the rest of the efforts on this film,
weaving a complex tale that loses none of its threads.
Steven Soderbergh gives a double whammy this year and could have simply
rode on the popular coattails of "Erin Brockovitch" and its star Julia
Roberts. Instead, he produced one of the best, if not the best, American
films of year 2000. I give "Traffic" an A.
For more Reeing reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
"102 Dalmatians" & "How the Grinch Stole Christmas"
I just had some major minor surgery and I was in need of some entertainment
and distraction from my own personal plight. Opportunity reared its furry
head for me with a Saturday morning screening of Disney's sequel "102
Dalmatians." What better way to get my mind off of my own aches and pains
than watching Glenn Close bring new outrageous behavior to my favorite
villain of all time - Cruella De Vil. I ensconce myself in a comfortable
seat and settled down with the other kids in the audience to see Cruella,
once again, foiled in her nefarious plans to create the ultimate spotted
puppy coat.
The holiday release of "102 Dalmatians" comes as no surprise following the
$300-million plus worldwide gross for the 1996 live action remake of the
1961 seminal Disney animation, "101 Dalmatians." The focus of the new film
is on Cruella De Vil right from the start as we meet the penitent
psychiatric patient who has learned to love animals, not wear them. But, we
know something is going to wrong, drastically wrong, and the wicked Cruella
will turn to her old, evil ways. This time, it's up to the spotless little
Dalmatian Oddball and the rest of the canine crew to put a stop to
Cruella's latest, wicked plans.
When Cruella leaves the psychiatric care of Doctor Pavlov (David Horovitch)
she is fully cured of her infamous fur fetish and the terms of her parole
dictate that she never steal another puppy. If she violates the rules of
her release, her remaining wealth, 8-million pounds, will be given to the
dog shelters in the county. But, Cruella has become "Ella" and is a changed
woman who dedicates her life to the safety and well being of the canine
population. She selects a failing, ramshackle animal shelter, The 2nd
Chance, run by kindly naďf Kevin Shephard (Ioan Gruffudd), as her
rehabilitation project and throws herself into her philanthropic work.
Kevin honestly believes that Ella is a changed person and lets her fund the
shelter's rebuild. Not so for Ella's doubtful parole officer Chloe Simon
(Alice Evans), a Dalmatian owner herself, who doesn't think that a leopard
like Cruella can ever really change her spots.
Chloe is proven right when the striking of the bells of Big Ben toll the
end of Dr. Pavlov's experiment as Ella disappears and Cruella De Vil
reemerges in all her wicked glory. She is now bound and determined to get
her precious spotted coat and even enlists the help of her arch rival in
the fur world, Jean Pierre Le Pelt (Gerard Depardieu), to collect the 102
Dalmatian puppies she'll need to create her ultimate design - now with
hood. Kevin and Chloe are pretty helpless in stopping Cruella with Kevin
being framed and arrested for the theft of some of the pups, so it's up to
Chloe's canine companions, Dipstick (son of Pongo), his mate, Dottie, and
their puppies, Little Dipper, Domino and Oddball, to foil Cruella's cruel
plans. Oddball is the only spotless one in the clan, which makes him the
over-achiever needed to lead the puppies and the other canine colleagues
against Cruella and her lethal scheme.
One area where "102 Dalmatians" misses the mark is its audience aim. There
is far too much talky dialogue and adult level humor and too little stuff
for the smaller kids. Don't get me wrong, the puppy (or "poopy" as Le Pelt
calls them) action is fun and exciting, especially the big climax/chase
that enters an enormous automated bakery that proves to be Cruella's
downfall. But, there isn't enough of this kiddy-level action. You could
hear the noise level increase in the theater as the smaller kids got bored
with the plot hatching between Cruella and the fur-clad Le Pelt. Not giving
the younger kids something to occupy their attention is going to be very
annoying at full theaters where the adults won't be able to hear the higher
brow humor because of the din of the youngsters.
The humor is, overall, more geared to the adults and older kids in the
audience. There is a dark, sinister nature to the film in the second half,
culminating in Cruella being thrust into an oven a la the wicked witch in
the "Hansel and Gretel" fairytale that provides some disturbing images. The
mayhem is only implied and never realized through the film, but the idea of
a just dessert ending for Cruella borders on the scary, especially for
younger auds.
While the animal stars don't speak (with one notable exception that I'll
get to in a moment), the filmmakers still get some remarkable performances
out of the canine cast. Mom and Dad Dalmatians, Dipstick and Dottie, are
shown as a loving couple who adore their kids. The human-like spin that is
put on their interaction has the same anthropomorphic feel as Disney's
animation, "Lady and the Tramp." (The spaghetti scene from the older
animation is used to propel the love story between the good guys, Kevin and
Chloe.) My favorite animal "performance," though, is voiced by Eric Idle as
the neurotic Macaw, Waddlesworth. The parrot, it seems, believes that he
is, in fact, a dog and not a bird at all. His neurosis, coupled with
sharp-tongued, witty dialog, makes the very vocal bird an odd but endearing
member of the team. Even when Waddlesworth does fly like an eagle, he
declares, "I'm not a rottweiler, I'm a retriever." He steals the show
whenever he gets a word in.
The human actors don't fare quite as well as their furry and feathered
counterparts, though. Except for Glenn Close, who has a remarkably good
time and gives her all to the character of Cruella - the actress does much
of her stunt work in the big climax - the other humans aren't given much to
do. Depardieu's Le Pelt must have looked good on paper, but the big actor
just seems out of place. Gruffudd and Evans, as Kevin and Chloe are there,
well, because the script says the characters exist. Neither actor is given
a real character to work with and there isn't much the amiable-seeming
thesps can do to reverse this. Tim McInnerny, as Cruella's manservant
Alonso, is the only other human, besides Close, who gets to put any meat on
his character's bones. Alonso suffers from conflicted loyalty as he is
faithful to his employer but also has a good heart and is against the plot
to create the "hooded spotted poopy coat."
Costuming by Academy Award winner Anthony Powell is a major asset for the
film. Cruella is outfitted in some of the most bizarre and interesting
creations since Queen Whatsherface in "The Phantom Menace." From the very
start, when we meet her, fully rehabbed, in her striped prison togs with
the jaunty cap emblazoned with her prisoner number, "6660," we are seeing a
tour de force in costumes. Most interesting are the "Ella" outfits as the
reformed Cruella shuns furs and takes on a clever political correctness. (I
was even told that one outfit is in a houndstooth pattern - hee hee.) Ella
is a true matron of her cause and looks every bit the lacquered lady -
check out her "nun's habit" outfit she wears as she emerges from prison.
It's brilliant. Her change back into Cruella literally springs out at us as
it harks back to the 1996 film with fur taking over, once again, as the
principle material du costume. The fur motif doesn't work anywhere near as
well for Gerard Depardieu, who looks more like a well-groomed bear in the
furry costumes for Le Pelt.
Everything around the action - the aforementioned costumes, the innovative
sets by Assheton Gorton and the sparkling photography by veteran lenser
Adrian Biddle - help keep the production on an even and high quality keel.
First time live action helmer Kevin Lima, who so able handled the Disney
film "Tarzan," utilizes his animation skills to bring the necessary cartoon
quality that marked the original as a hallmark family film. The weakest
point is the script by a gaggle of writers - Kristen Buckley & Brian Regan
(from their original story) and Bob Tzudiker & Noni White - which has to
follow up on the charm of the original story by Dodie Smith. The scribes do
a fair job, but the story feels like it's done by committee. The ending
drags on too long so the whole effort seems more extended than its 90+
minutes.
The puppies are cute and Cruella remains an icon of wickedness, but I hope
that "102 Dalmatians" is it. I don't think I can take "103 Dalmatians." I
give it a B-.
For more Reeling review visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
Elliot Richards (Brendan Fraser) is a socially inept guy who alienates
those around him with his overbearing manner, constantly failing when he
tries to be hip. He's also had a years-long crush on a co-worker, Alison
Gardner (Frances O'Connor), but she barely knows he even exists. Desperate,
he asks God to help him. Instead, a knockout, gorgeous woman (Elizabeth
Hurley), claiming to be the Devil, offers him a deal - seven wishes in
exchange for his mortal soul, in director Harold Ramis's update of the 1967
flick, "Bedazzled."
It has been many years since I saw the original "Bedazzled" with Dudley
Moore as Faust and Peter Cook in the Mephistophelean role. The inherent
silliness of the earlier movie - at one point, Moore bounces on a
trampoline while dressed as a nun - didn't appeal to me. I had hopes that
the modern update would be an improvement, especially with the likable
Brenda Fraser taking on the Faustian role.
The new "Bedazzled" may not garner any awards or attention for its actors
at the end of the year, but it is still a fun little flick that is easy on
the head and, with Hurley as a sexy Devil, easy on the eyes, too. It's also
a good showcase for the comedy and acting talents of Fraser. I liked the
young actor from the very beginning when he appeared as a caveman thrust
into modern times in "Encino Man," He also held his own, in a serious perf,
opposite Ian McKellar in the marvelous 1998 movie, "Gods and Monsters."
Here, in "Bedazzled," Fraser gets the chance to play a variety of
characters, all as Elliot, as he takes on a new lifestyle with each of his
wishes.
Wishes, let me say, are handled a little differently here than one would
traditionally expect. To me, one wish would be for one thing - money or
fame or power, whatever. In "Bedazzled," wishes are actually packages. One
wish, by Elliot, is for marriage, money and power. Another is to be
brilliant, articulate, sophisticated and charming. It's not such a bad deal
if you ever get your own seven wishes. Elliot, though, has to deal with the
Devil's interpretation of what a wish actually means and suffers the
consequences of her mischief.
I can forgive the Hollywoodization of the wish thing, mainly because it
gives Fraser the chance to play a variety of different roles, putting a
unique spin on each. Best of all is when Elliot gets his first wish and
unknowingly ends up as a Colombian drug lord - this sequence provides the
film's best belly laugh as our hero realizes that he can speak Spanish
fluently. As each wish goes awry, Elliot experiences different lives in his
quest for Alison, who is the focus of all his wishes. He asks to be the
most emotionally sensitive guy in the world, but puts Alison off with his
constant crying at the beauty of the sunset. He asks to be a famous
basketball star, but is disappointed when his "equipment" is lacking. When
he wishes to be smart, the Devil puts a twist on the request and makes him
gay, too. With each failed wish, Elliot becomes more and more desperate and
gets arrested at a church when he demands to talk to God.
Rife within this amusing little tale is a bunch of practical messages that
eventually have an impact on Elliot. Morals like: be careful of what you
wish for, you might just get it; and, you can't get what you want out of
life just by wishing, are peppered through the film. The biggest impact on
Elliot, though, comes from a chance meeting with an enigmatic guy in jail
who tells Elliot that he can't sell his soul because it is not his to sell.
His soul, the stranger tells him, belongs to God. His advice is to "open
your heart and open your mind. You'll get it." These few words of wisdom
give Elliot the impetus to confront the Devil and, in the end, redeem
himself. Elliot changes from the overbearing, insecure doofus from the
beginning to become a wiser, selfless individual in the end.
Elizabeth Hurley has a damn (pun intended) good time as the Prince, let's
make that Princess, of Darkness who sees her role as a perpetual thorn in
God's side. She takes enormous pleasure as she screws up Elliot's wishes
for her own amusement. She also gets to change from one devilishly sexy
costume to another, drive a Lamborghini Diablo and corrupt a classroom full
of pubescent boys. Hurley doesn't do a lot of thesping here, but enjoys
herself nonetheless. Frances O'Connor, as the love interest and object of
Elliot's desire doesn't get much of a chance to stretch as she has to play
opposite Fraser's broadly comedic perf.
Techs, as expected in a Harold Ramis film, are first rate. Academy Award
winning production designer Rick Heinrichs ("Sleepy Hollow") provides
varied and imaginative sets, including a vision of Hell as designed by our
she Devil in her nightclub, DV8. We get two glimpses, over the course of
the film, into this demonic world. The first time we enter, things appear
pretty benign, but, as Elliot comes more and more under the Devil's
influence, our next journey into the Miltonesque Underworld takes on a
bizarre, satanic tone.
The camera work, provided by veteran lenser Bill Pope, perfectly suits the
action. Special visual F/X are ably handled by four-time Oscar winner
Richard Edlund - one sequence, near the end, has Elliot thrust down into
the fiery inferno of Hell and confronted by a giant version of the Devil.
The F/X are matter-of-fact and don't draw the viewer's attention away from
the comedy and action, even when a 7'6" Elliot comes onto the scene. Notice
also needs to be made for the variety of makeup schemes, by Ben Nye Jr.,
for Elliot as he goes from one wish to the next, dramatically changing his
appearance for each life.
"Bedazzled" is plain, old-fashioned fun with lots of humor and a colorful
production - and it clocks in at about 90 minutes. Fraser further
establishes himself as a solid comic performer, easily able to carry a
film. I was pleasantly surprised and give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit us at www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Innocence (2000)
Five decades ago, Andreas (Charles Tingwell) and Claire (Julia Blake)
shared a passionate romance in Belgium, following World War II, then went
their separate ways. Now, a half-century later, they discover that they
live in the same Australian city and it soon becomes evident that their
love of so long ago has not faded. Although Andreas is a widower, Claire is
married and is torn between her loyalty to husband John (Terry Norris) and
the passion she still feels for her former lover in "Innocence."
Director Paul Cox is known for his artistic portrayals of life, such as
that of a lonely, aging voyeur in "A Man of Flowers" and a woman dying with
dignity in "A Woman's Tale." With "Innocence" the helmer/writer takes a
radically different filmic path with a subject matter - a long parted
couple, now aged, and their rekindled passion - that is not the kind of
thing one gets from Hollywood. With its theme of senior love, it is the
kind of thing that the internationally acclaimed filmmaker would explore,
though, and he is moderately successful in his effort. High marks go to Cox
for having the gonads to depict life during the twilight years where love
and passion are still real.
Using ample, even overused, flashbacks shot with a handheld camera and
exhibiting a grainy garishness, we see Claire (Kristine Van Pellicom) and
Andreas (Kenny Aernouts), 50-years younger, walking hand in hand,
frolicking around Belgium and making mad, passionate love. (Truth be told,
the flashbacks are the biggest problem with the film, taking up too much
time showing a young couple almost void of any real personality.) This sets
the stage for what will happen many years later to the young lovers after
they are, seemingly, parted forever.
We come to the present and meet septuagenarian Andreas, whose wife died
some 30 years ago and, since that time, he has reminisced about his first
love, Claire. When he learns that she lives nearby, he writes to her,
almost begging to see her again. Although Claire is married now, old
feelings flood back and she agrees to meet with her old flame. Their
passions are rekindled and Claire must make a choice between her
long-standing marriage and her newly re-sparked relationship with Andreas.
This study in elderly romance is handled with dignity as Cox shifts between
the modern-day love affair of Claire and Andreas and the long ago, though
not forgotten, involvement when the two were so much younger (but,
definitely, not more impassioned). The story segues between the quiet,
loving romance of the elder couple and the more energetic ardor when they
were young. The present-day interlude, as the couple beds down together
after half a century apart, is handled with sensitivity as the camera
lingers over their quiet loving that still has the fire (though a bit more
slowly generated) of their younger years..
Cox kicks it up a notch as he throws Claire's marriage into the mixture
with she and husband John coping with their side of this aging love
triangle. Married for over 40 years ("44 years, 3 months and 6 days,"
Claire informs John), there has not been a physical relationship between
them for two decades. When she drops the news of her newly awakened desires
for Andreas, John, at first, simply doesn't believe it, then, as the
reality sinks in, is angered, hurt and confused. Claire decides to accept
the consequences of her action and a tense truce is arrived at, but not
before John sends his physician son David (Robert Menzies ) to find out
what's wrong. Meanwhile, the widowed Andreas confides his feelings to his
incredulous daughter, Monique (Marta Dusseldorp), and garners her support.
Julia Blake takes charismatic hold of the screen as the still beautiful
Claire. The actress is the one in charge here as Claire is the one who
makes the decisions concerning her life and those of Andreas and John.
Blake has regal good looks and comes across as attractive and a convincing
object of desire for both of her men. Blake's real-life husband Norris
gives a solid tragic/comic performance as movie husband, John, who is torn
between maintaining the failing status quo of his marriage and the desire
to keep his wife, no matter what the cost. Charles Tingwell (one of the
heroes in the wonderful Aussie comedy, "The Castle") is two dimensional, at
best, and acts mainly as the catalyst for the changes that are to be
visited on the three senior citizens. The limited supporting cast helps to
give some depth to the background, but the focus is on the three principles
throughout the film.
There is a staginess to the proceedings that gives the film a static,
TV-like look that is more suited to the small screen. If an actress of a
lesser caliber than Blake were the focus of the film, I'd say that it
should go directly to television. Her performance, though, is worth the
price of theater admission. The subject matter is so fresh and untrammeled
it begs to draw in more mature audiences to this sweet, melancholy story of
love at the end of life, though I doubt that you'll see it at the local
multiplex. "Innocence" travels ground that is rarely seen on the screen and
is handle with sensitive care. I give it a B.
For more Reeeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for American Rhapsody, An (2001)
When the oppression of the Communist regime running 1950's Hungary proved 
too much, Margit (Nastassja Kinski) and Peter (Tony Goldwyn) take their 
eldest daughter and flee for the refuge of America. But, they are forced to 
leave their baby, Suzanne, behind to be raised by a kind, childless couple 
for six years until they can manage to bring the little girl here, too. 
Longtime film editor Eva Gardos takes the helm and tells her own story 
about coming to America in "An American Rhapsody." 
Working from her own script, Gardos brings us back to a tumultuous time as 
the specter of communism descends upon the people of Central Europe, 
bringing to a halt the hopes of freedom that arose from the ashes of World 
War II. Book publisher Peter see the writing on the wall of Stalin's 
growing hegemony on his beloved Hungary and makes plans to spirit his 
family out of the country. His scheme go awry when he and his wife, Margit, 
are forced to leave baby Suzanne in the hands of the child's grandma, Helen 
(Agnes Banfalvy). Helen is soon arrested for her complicity in the couple's 
escape and Suzanne spends her formative years with Jeno (Balazs Galko) and 
Teri (Zsuzsa Czinkoczi) on an idyllic farm in the country. 
Margit, in the meantime, has not forgotten her baby and lobbies untiringly 
to get her daughter back. She succeeds and, in a flurry of media attention, 
six-year old Suzanne (Kelly Endresz Banlaki) arrives on American soil. But, 
the little girl has only known Teri and Jeno as her parents and, while 
growing close to Peter, has never embraced Margit as her mother. The 
estrangement deepens when Suzanne reaches teen hood and the young girl 
rebels at the overprotective hand of her birth mother. Things come to a 
head when mom puts bars on her daughter's windows and an outside lock on 
her door. Suzanne calls in a promise made to her years before by Peter to 
go back to Hungary to the "parents" she loves. Margit, reluctantly, lets 
her daughter go. Once back "home" again, the young woman comes of age and 
realizes the importance and love of her real family. 
I must laud Eva Gardos for her dedication in bringing her story to the 
screen. Her effort borders on amateur at times and the overall work comes 
across as something made-for-television, but there are some good things 
about it, too. The best little thing in "An American Rhapsody" is the 
charming performance by Kelly Endresz Banlaki as six-year-old Suzanne. The 
diminutive actress comes across as a real little girl who makes the best of 
being a stranger in a strange land. When, one day, she dresses in her 
Hungarian clothing and sets off to play, unknown to her parents, we see 
America through her innocent eyes. 
Unfortunately, the story jumps ahead to teenage Suzanne (Scarlett 
Johansson), a selfish young woman who stays out all night, drinks and hangs 
out with her older boyfriend, much to Margit's despair. Johansson comes 
across more like a spoiled brat than a genuine young rebel. The tone of the 
film takes a down turn during this transition and the impact of Suzanne's 
revelations about life when she returns to Hungary is diminished. She sees 
her grandmother again and all of her teen angst and rejection of her mother 
is changed when she hears "the real story." It all wraps up neatly, but 
without much satisfaction. 
The end of the Cold War opened up Eastern Europe to filmmakers and Gardos 
makes the best out of the lovely old city of Budapest. We get a travelogue 
presentation of the bridges and buildings that make up the city, but the 
nice scenery does not help the change in pace from the film's first half or 
draw you close to the older Suzanne. This part keeps the viewer at arm's 
length from characters and loses the involvement gained when watching the 
charismatic younger Suzanne. 
The production has an artificial feel to it as the period touches - things 
like hula-hoops - are used to show the timeframes the film follows. I would 
have to watch again, but it seems that the attention to such details is 
less than accurate, bringing my mind to question the chronicle of events 
depicted. 
"An American Rhapsody" is a heartfelt film and an obvious labor of love by 
Eva Gardos, but the story loses steam when it leaves little Suzanne's 
viewpoint, becoming a conventional coming of age tale, albeit one with 
Budapest as a backdrop. I give it a C. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Scary Movie 2 (2001)
Last year, Keenen Ivory Wayans and his brothers Marlon and Shawn promised
us "No sequel!" as part of the advert blurb for their enormously popular
"Scary Movie." But, a domestic take of $200 million is apparently enough to
make them to go back on their word and the result is "Scary Movie 2."
I wish the Wayans had kept their pledge, after spending an interminable 85
minutes suffering through "Scary Movie 2." If you are a fan of urine, feces
and semen jokes, you will probably like this bomb. You get ample, even
copious, amounts of each. For more discerning filmgoers (i.e. anyone over
the mental age of 12), be warned, this second installment to the new Wayans
franchise lacks the rapid-fire humor of the original. The first flick made
fun of the modern horror film genre, like "Airplane!" with one gag after
another coming at you. If you didn't like one joke, you just had a few
seconds to wait for the next. Overall, they hit a lot more than they
missed.
With "Scary Movie 2" the Wayans brothers decided to forgo the
one-gag-after-another formula and, instead, use a plot-driven story that is
mainly a parody of the recent mediocre horror movie, "The Haunting." Sure,
there are a whole bunch of other movies and pop culture references
throughout - "The Exorcist," "The Amityville Horror," "Dracula," "Dirty
Harry," "Mission Impossible 2," "Charlie's Angels," "Hannibal" and those
noisy basketball commercials all get their due. The problem with "Scary
Movie 2" is it spoofs a movie that, if you saw the original "The Haunting,"
is really a parody of that classic horror flick. You would think that the
seven credited writers could come up with a better idea.
Coupling the lame plot line of "The Haunting" with buckets of bodily fluids
makes this venture very unfunny, indeed. The opening "Exorcist" parody,
before the credits, turns out to be the funniest part of "Scary Movie 2,"
thanks to an outrageous twist on the Father Merrin character by James
Woods. His unholy holy man made me feel that we might be in for a
continuation of the first flick. Then the credits roll and we get the
aforementioned buckets. All the original characters are here, but they are
simply going through the motions. The filmmakers had something going the
first time around, but they lost it here. Even a foul-mouthed parrot named
Polly isn't funny, and I love foul-mouthed birds.
Techs are probably OK. I was too numbed by the non-humor of "Scary Movie 2"
to notice. You're better off renting the original and getting yourself a
pizza with what you'll save by not going to see "Scary Movie 2." They said,
the first time, "no sequel." I wish they kept their promise. I give it a D.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Mummy Returns, The (2001)
It has been eight years since our favorite legionnaire Rick O'Connell 
(Brendan Fraser) and beautiful Egyptologist Evelyn (Rachel Weisz) battled 
against a 3000-year old nemesis named Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo.) Now, it's 
1933 and deep within the bowels of the British Museum of London an ancient 
terror is about to be released on the unsuspecting world in "The Mummy 
Returns." 
When "The Mummy," loosely based on the 1932 classic starring Boris Karloff, 
opened in 1999 it was to record breaking box office numbers. Eventually 
racking up over $400-mil worldwide, it is the 31st highest grossing film, 
ever. So, you didn't expect a sequel? 
And, quite a sequel it is. Writer/director Stephen Sommers paid close 
attention to what worked and didn't in the first flick and honed it into a 
well-paced, sometimes funny, sometimes exciting, and always good looking, 
action adventure tale. 
Brendan Fraser and Rachel Weisz get the chance to develop, more fully, 
their characters from the '99 film. Rick O'Connell used to be an 
independent-minded adventurer who only had himself to care about. Now, he's 
a husband and a father and has a whole new set of responsibilities, but he 
still has the heart and soul of a swashbuckler. Fraser melds the two sides 
of Rick together with a skill and charm that I've grown to appreciate in 
the actor. Rachel Weisz gets to be an action heroine a la "Crouching Tiger, 
Hidden Dragon," as she goes toe-to-toe with her old nemesis, Anck-Su-Namun 
(Patricia Velasquez). Weisz handles the action stuff well and plays Evelyn 
as smart, capable and every bit as venturesome as Rick. 
There are other familiar faces from the first film with Arnold Vosloo 
reprising his role as the ferocious Imhotep, who wants to take over the 
world and still has the hots for Anck-Su-Namun. Oded Fehr is, once again, 
the stoic Ardeth Bay, a proud member of the Medjai, defender of the 
righteous and enemy of Imhotep. Both characters are more symbol than 
anything else. John Hannah is back as Evelyn's sniveling, high-maintenance 
brother Jonathan. 
Some new faces show up, too, with young Freddie Boath playing Rick and 
Evelyn's son, Alex. At first, the kid comes across as too cute. Oh, boy, I 
thought, another pretty, precocious child actor. But, Boath hangs in there 
and, as the story progresses, you begin to like the boy. Comic relief is 
provided on a couple of fronts with the evil Lock-Nah (Adewale 
Akinnuoye-Agbaje) determined to personally kill Alex and thwarted, by the 
boy, every time. Shaun Parkes provides both comedy and heroism as the owner 
of Magic Carpet Airways, a company that eschews conventional airplanes in 
favor of Izzy's homemade "dirigible." WWF champion Dwayne "The Rock" 
Johnson makes his "acting" debut as the Scorpion King who sold his soul to 
Anubis, but the incredible physical presence of the wrestling star is 
really relegated to special effects in the big finale. 
Of course, the reason most of us want to see "The Mummy Returns" is for the 
anticipated kick-ass F/X and they are in ample quantity here. The 
computer-generated images are used throughout, from the big battle scenes 
with a cast of thousands of CG creatures, like the dog-headed warriors of 
the dark lord, Anubis. There are lots of killer mummy effects, including 
hundreds of pygmy mummies that decimate the numbers of the bad guys. These 
little fellers have a distinctly spooky quality about them. 
The production is lavishly handled on all accounts. Veteran lenser Adrian 
Biddle gives the same quality look to the film that he provided for the 
first. When the action shifts from Egypt to London, the colors change from 
golden, warm hues to dark, colder colors. Costume and production 
effectively capture the 30's period details. There is a goodly influence 
from such groundbreaking adventures as "Raiders of the Lost Ark," 
"Gremlins" and "Around the World in 80 Days." 
"The Mummy Returns" is a full 2+ hours long but is so evenly paced and well 
told that you don't even notice the time. It's fun and full of adventure 
and has enough F/X to satisfy the most jaded action fan. I give it a B. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Bridget Jones's Diary (2001)
Bridget Jones (Renee Zellweger) is 32 years old, 138 pounds, smokes like a
chimney, drinks too much and, worst of all, is still single. But, after
coping with a particularly nasty hangover following her company Christmas
party, she promises to turn over a new leaf in "Bridget Jones's Diary."
Book adaptations, especially one as narration heavy as Helen Fielding's
tome about a single woman in London, are a tough bet to put up on the big
screen successfully. It's nice to see the case where a good, entertaining
book is translated into a good, entertaining movie and director Sharon
McGuire and company give us exactly that in "Bridget Jones's Diary."
The story spans a year in the life of Bridget Jones, a researcher in a
publishing house who is constantly reminded by her family and friends that
she isn't getting any younger and it's time she found a man and settled
down. But this is not quite as easy as it sounds as the pool of eligible
single men dwindles with every passing year. When her boss, Daniel Cleaver
(Hugh Grant), begins to flirt with her via e-mail, she responds in kind and
a whirlwind romance ensues.
In the meantime, her mother (Gemma Jones) tries to set her up with a
barrister, Mark Darcy (Colin Firth), at Christmas, but he thinks that
Bridget is an unintelligent young woman who smokes and drinks too much. It
doesn't help things when Bridget's mom reminds them that, as a little girl,
Bridget used to run around Mark's yard stark naked. As time passes, Miss
Jones realizes that Daniel is a two-faced liar and Mark is the one she
should be with for the rest of her life. But, will it happen?
You don't have to be a fan of the book to enjoy the movie, but that
familiarity does add an interesting dimension. One always has a critical
eye when it comes to a movie adapted from a book you enjoyed. "Bridget
Jones's Diary" also had some negative publicity over the fact that
Texas-born Zellweger was cast to play the quintessentially British Bridget.
In both cases, adaptation and actor, there is nothing to fear. The
screenplay, by veteran scribes Richard Curtis, Andrew Davies and the author
herself, captures the tone of the book perfectly and brings a sweet
romantic comedy to the screen. The humor is funny throughout and sometimes
bawdy, but there is virtually no nudity and the sex is almost chaste.
Renee Zellweger does a fabulous job as the weight and bad habit conscious
Bridget who decides that she will change herself and her life and begins
the title diary. Exercise and clean living are the keys to her change and
she makes a valiant stab at following through, but romance screws up her
plans when she falls for her slimy boss. Zellweger is perfect with her
understated London accent and put on weight to flesh out, so to speak, her
character. Within minutes of the start of the film, you see her as Bridget.
And Zellweger is willing to put, quite literally, her butt on the line, to
give a top comedy perf.
Supporting the inspired comic performance by the star are first class
showings by Grant, Firth and the rest of the cast. Hugh Grant does a turn
from his usual awe-shucks, bumbling nice guy and plays Daniel as a conniver
that will say and do anything to get his way. It's a good louse-of-a-guy
role and Grant does it justice. Colin Firth is also fine as the
stiff-as-a-board Mark who is initially turned off by the outspoken, brazen
Bridget. As he gets to know her, you watch his formality soften and he
falls, full smit, for the pretty Miss Jones.
Jim Broadbent and Gemma Jones provide dimension as Bridget's dad and mom
who are in the midst of their own marital crisis when mom leaves dad to
pursue a career as a shill for a sleazy salesman on a shopping channel.
Their side story helps to flesh out the life of Bridget into something that
feels genuine, even in its absurdity. Embeth Davidtz, Shirley Henderson,
Sally Phillips and James Callis, as Bridget's supportive and sometime
critical friends, fit the bill.
Production credits are first rate with crisp, clear lensing by Stuart
Dryburgh complementing Bridget's costuming, by Rachael Fleming, and
production design, by Gemma Jackson.
"Bridget Jones's Diary" is the best date flick to come down the pike in an
awfully long time and may well bring in a new generation of fans to Miss
Jones and her diary. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Goűt des autres, Le (1999)
Jean-Jacques Castella (Jean-Pierre Bacri) is an unpolished industrialist
whose social contacts are only through the efforts of his condescending
wife, Angelique (Christiane Millet). Things change when he reluctantly
attends a play featuring his niece in a small role and he becomes smitten
with an actress, Clara (Anne Alvaro). Though she thinks he's just a dolt,
he eventually charms her off her feet in "The Taste of Others."
Writer/director/actress Agnes Jaoui, with cowriter/costar, Bacri, have
crafted a terrific little slice of life in today's France, but the action
could take place anywhere. Monsieur Castella is a well-to-do businessman
whose steel barrel-making company is about to go international. His wife,
Angelique, is a demanding shrew who fashions herself to be a talented
interior decorator and arts patron. His driver, Bruno (Alain Chabat), meets
an old flame, Manie (Agnes Jaoui), but forgot that they made love one night
years before. Castella hires struggling actress Clara to teach him English
and falls for her in the process. And his temporary bodyguard, Frank,
begins a noncommittal romance with Manie. There is all this and more going
on in director Jaoui's Oscar nominated film.
In what may well be one of the best ensemble performances this year, "The
Taste of Others" is a simple tale of one man's mid-life crisis,
Jean-Jacques Castella, which takes place while life unfolds, too, for those
around him. Jean-Jacques is an uptight, aggressive manufacturer whose wife
dominates his home-life, along with her nasty little dog, Fluckie. When he
is forced to attend a play with his wife, becomes captivated with Clara. He
asks her to teach him English and, in his own sometimes-boorish ways, tries
to insinuate himself into her life. She resists - strongly. Meanwhile, life
goes on for everyone else and they have their own trials and tribulations.
Jaoui and Bacri don't tell us a conventional kind of story, opting instead
for the slice of life and love that centers on Castella, but fully involves
the rest, too. There is depth to all of the characters with Bacri first
among equals as Jean-Jacques. He is almost unlikable when we first meet
him. He is taciturn, almost rude, when he interviews Clara for a tutoring
job. When he realizes the actress in his niece's play is the same woman, he
becomes obsessed with her and realizes the sham his marriage has become. We
get to know the man and enjoy his metamorphosis into a kinder, gentler and
much more likable guy.
The rest of the cast is uniformly first rate with Anne Alvaro a standout as
Clara. She's 40 years old, still has to struggle to get decent roles and
has to teach English to make ends meet. The years of hard work and
dedication to her profession shows on her face and her attitude is
somewhere between despairing and pissed off. The friendships that develop
between Frank and Bruno, Bruno and Manie, and Frank and Manie are handled
neatly and with feeling by all three actors. Christine Millet, in the tough
role as the witchy wife, is funny, with her horrible taste in home
furnishings, and sad, as she fails to see the changes taking place in her
husband.
Helmer Jaoui does an exemplary job in mustering the numerous talents
(herself included) that appear on the screen. Besides the large principal
cast, there is also a bevy of supporting characters that flesh out the
background fully. "The Taste of Others" was France's submission for Oscar
contention this years (instead of the great "Girl on the Bridge," but I
digress) and is a sound introduction to America for Jaoui and the rest of
the talented cast and crew. I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bully (2001)
On 14 July 1993 teenager Bobby Kent disappeared without a trace in Florida.
Then, his friends were arrested and tried for his murder. The reason for
their heinous crime? He was their tormenter. Filmmaker Larry Clark ("Kids")
explores this incident in "Bully."
Bobby (Nick Stahl) has been a friend, since childhood, with Marty Puccio
(Brad Renfro). He has always held the dominant hand in the friendship,
though, abusing his buddy with the unexpected, painful punch for one
infraction or another. Up until now, Marty has accepted the abrupt
violence, but when he starts dating Lisa (Rachel Miner) and complains about
the abuse, she puts the bug in his ear that he can stop it. The seed of
murder is soon planted and a conspiracy begins to rid Marty and his friends
of Bobby and his abusive ways once and for all.
Larry Clark made splash for himself with his debut feature film, "Kids," an
unabashedly harsh look into the lives of a group of unthinking, selfish New
York City teens whose mission in life is to seek sex, drugs and trouble. It
was a hard film that looked, unblinkingly, at the ramifications of
promiscuity, unprotected sex and drug abuse in the AIDS era. If kids didn't
get the message, their parents sure couldn't miss it.
With "Bully," Clark changes his focus and locale and moves to Florida to
relate the account leading to the brutal group murder of Bobby Kent. Bobby,
raised in a normal-seeming family environment, has sociopath tendencies
that cause him to take violent action against his friend Marty for any
infraction, no matter how trivial. Marty, for years, has suffered under
this abusive friendship in a resigned, accepting way without striking back.
When timid Lisa falls for Marty, she can't stand to watch him succumb to
the tortures at Bobby's hands and soon convinces her none-too-bright
boyfriend that the best thing to do is to rid their lives of the bully.
Soon, others, like Ali (Bijou Phillips), a teen mother/sometimes prostitute
who also suffered abuse by Bobby, join the conspiracy and things get
totally out of control.
Enough about the story. What "Bully" is really about, in the hands of Larry
Clark, is a film that approaches soft-core pornography with a voyeur's look
at teen sex. It seems that fully half of the action shown in the film
involves young people screwing without concern for the consequences of
their libidinous actions. The inordinate amount of flesh-based antics among
the kids is geared to peeping tom status as Clark has his young actors
strip and have sex (I won't give the film credence by calling it "making
love"). There isn't much reason for all of the skin except to serve as
prurient titillation for the viewers.
"Bully" depicts a microcosm of our society of under-educated,
under-motivated, under-employed and over-sexed teenagers with too much free
time and, if Clark's assessment is correct, under-supervised by their
parents. Neither side comes across well in this tome of teen angst as the
kids wander around, without a clue, drinking, smoking dope and screwing
indiscriminately. The parents don't come across to well, either, being
shown as clueless, too, with their children operating beyond the pale of
any reasonable authority - they are kind of like juvenile versions of
Colonel Kurtz in "Apocalypse Now."
It's difficult to assess the acting of the various characters unless the
ability to perform simulated sex is considered thesping. Technical aspects,
too, are hard to judge since camera work is relegated to shooting the skin
of the young stars, with special attention given to shots of Bijou
Phillips's crotch - in close-up. The attention to sexual exploits pushes
the true story of murder into the background with the climax (no pun
intended) given the bum's rush in the end when all hell breaks loose and
the kids do in their nemesis, Bobby.
Larry Clark comes across more as a dirty old man and less a cutting edge
filmmaker with "Bully." I go to the movies to see a story unfold. If I want
to look at naked, sexy young women, I'll buy a copy of Playboy. I give it a
D.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Joe Dirt (2001)
In 1985, little Joe Dirt (Eric Per Sullivan) was abandoned by his white,
trailer-trash parents at a Grand Canyon tourist stop. He has had to fend
for himself ever since and, even though he has lived a life of hard knocks,
he has not forgotten his mom and dad. Now, 15 years later, Joe (David
Spade) decides it is time to find his roots and begins his quest in "Joe
Dirt."
David Spade, since the death of Chris Farley, has not been able to break
out on his own in feature films - see "Lost & Found" for bad starring
choices. Usually, he plays the caustic, wise-cracking smartass - a routine
that gets tired outside of his Dennis Finch character on TV's "Just Shoot
Me." In "Joe Dirt" there is a kinder and gentler Spade in the role of Joe,
a not-too-bright but genuinely nice guy. Unfortunately, the movie isn't too
good.
Joe Dirt is a pathetic little guy who sports a 70's style shag hairdo
because, when he was a baby, his skull did not close correctly, so his mom
put a wig on him. When his head finally closed up, she forgot to remove the
wig and he has been burdened with the out-of-date hairpiece ever since.
But, he has an intense joie de vie that keeps him going even when he gets
covered in pooh-pooh or picked on by school kids. Joe firmly believes that
if you are a good person, you will get what you want from life.
Joe begins a cross-country, crisscrossing journey to dig up clues and track
down the parents that dubbed him "Dirt." This consists of a series of
disjointed, short incidents involving various wacky characters. Some help
him, some hinder him and you get the whole story via a radio talk show
hosted by the sarcastic Zander Kelly (Dennis Miller). Joe is brought onto
the show by the bored emcee to discuss what a loser he is and Joe tells his
story. As the tale of his search unfolds it is so compelling Joe instantly
gets a huge listener following.
The script by Spade and Fred Wolf is a mishmash of goofy slapstick scenes,
emotional moments, an oddball love story (Joe gets the beautiful girl,
Brandy (Brittany Daniel)) and a whole bunch of positive messages to the
audience. Joe's life, as we see it, is a string of mishaps ranging from
falling out of a balloon shaped like a molar to sleeping in a house being
fumigated. There are laughs along the way, but most are forced and none too
funny.
This Adam Sandler produced effort attracts a whole bunch of comedy figures
to it, mostly in small, fleeting performances. Christopher Walken plays
Clem, a school janitor in a witness protection program, who helps Joe,
dignifies the film with his presence. The rest - Rosanna Arquette as an
alligator rancher who hates gators; Joe Don Baker as an abusive, drunken
parent to Joe's girlfriend (funny, huh?); Fred Ward as Joe's greedy, stupid
father; Carson Daly as Carson Daly; and others - walk in and out of their
scenes without note.
At the end of the screening for "Joe Dirt" I chatted with one of the
patrons and asked what he thought of the movie. His response was, "If you
want a no-brainer, it's just what the doctor ordered." Now, I see enough
no-thinking-required movies as it is without wanting/needing to see yet
another one, but I know what the guy means. I, personally, prefer to be
challenged to think about a movie, but, if you want to leave your brain at
home, maybe "Joe Dirt" is the prescription you need. I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Stille nach dem Schuß, Die (1999)
"Legend" - in Stasi-speak (East German Secret Police lingo), a term used to 
connote a false identity. 
In the 70's, militant idealism swept through the youth movement in West 
Germany. For Rita Vogt (Bibiana Beglau), it is the most exciting time of 
her life. She believes in a just world, built on violence if necessary, and 
is in love with charismatic leader, Andi (Harald Schott), of their little 
group of revolutionaries. The gang robs a bank as their first strike 
against capitalism and the die is cast for the rest of their lives. 
When Rita passes through East Berlin in transit from Beirut, a hidden 
pistol is found in her bag and she comes under the scrutiny of East German 
security in the person of Stasi officer Edwin Hull (Martin Wuttke). The 
secret policeman lets her pass through to the west, where Rita gets 
involved in a botched jailbreak for Andi. A guard is killed and the gang 
must go underground to avoid arrest. The movement remains stagnant for 
years and everyone grows complacent in their Parisian exile until, one day, 
Rita is stopped for a routine traffic violation. She tries to run for it 
and becomes a cop killer in the process. Her only out is asylum in East 
Germany and her first legend - factory worker Susanne Schmidt - is born. 
Rita/Susanne must now live the life she has idolized for all these years 
and is content with her new world where there is no wealth, but no poverty, 
either. These feelings aren't shared by her friend, Tatjana (Nadja Uhl), 
who just wants out of the East, even if it is with the help of a stolen 
bottle of vodka. Their deepening relationship is abruptly ended when the 
news reports Andi's death in a skirmish with the police. Rita's old wanted 
poster is broadcast on TV and she must seek a new legend. 
Hull arranges a new identity for Rita as Sabine Walter, a child-care 
worker, and she enters the happiest time of her life. She meets a young 
physicist, Jochen (Alexander Beyer), and, for the first time, falls in love 
with something other than the cause. Rita's dreams, that summer, of living 
happily ever after in the worker's paradise will soon be dashed when, in 
1989, the Berlin Wall came down and Rita loses her protectorate. 
Volker Schlondorff brings us a fictional look into a period of our history 
that is relatively virgin territory. Only the recent "Invisible Circus" 
comes to mind and that runs a pale second to "The Legend of Rita." The 
helmer, with screenwriter Wolfgang Kohlhasse, examines the life of one 
young German radical, Rita, and her flight from the law as she seeks asylum 
in East Germany. He succeeds in developing a character study of a woman 
whose rash youthful decisions marks her for life. Newcomer Beglau gives a 
commanding performance as Rita and matures nicely as she struggles to 
maintain her idealism after her fateful decision to pull the trigger on the 
gun and murder a policeman, a rash act that changed her life forever. 
Although the focus of the entire film is on Rita, the supporting cast does 
a good job in fleshing out those around her. Martin Wuttke is outstanding 
as Stasi copper, Hull, and conveys the controlling nature of the 
totalitarian Communist government whose policy is "we're for the people, 
that's why we're against them." Nadja Uhl is believable as the desperate 
Tatjana who doesn't see her "paradise" through same idealistic glasses as 
Rita. 
Schlondorff, with a veteran team behind the camera, gives the film a sound 
period feel of the 70's and 80's. The flick has a docu quality in its 
realism, provided by cinematographer Andreas Hofer. Costumer Anne-Gret 
Oehme and make-up artists Jeanette-Nicole Latzelsberger and Karin Stephan 
do a seamless job of clothing and aging the characters over a decade plus 
time, oftentimes as disguises to hide the fugitives' identities. Cheesy 
East German rock music works wonderfully in putting you where the filmmaker 
wants you to be. Rita's struggles with right versus wrong, good versus 
evil, makes for an interesting study of a world little known. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Training Day (2001)
Idealistic, rookie cop Jake Hoyt (Ethan Hawke) is about to face the most
important day in his life. He has 24-hours to prove himself worthy of a
detective's shield under the watchful eye and guidance of Detective
Sergeant Alonzo Harris (Denzel Washington), a 13-year veteran who lives and
breathes the streets. Jakes sense of honor and justice is about to be
challenged by the experience drug enforcement officer who has developed his
own sense of honor and justice in "Training Day."
Alonzo establishes his authority as the big dog right from the start when
he phones Jake in the wee hours of the rookie's test day, ordering the
younger man to meet him at a certain diner and hanging up as Hoyt begins to
thank him for his chance to make detective. From here, Alonzo maintains the
upper hand with Jake and forces him to do things that Hoyt knows are
downright wrong. Harris continues to challenge the newcomer, showing Jake
the real underbelly of the streets as he brings him through places where no
white guy, especially an eager young cop, has gone before. Almost from the
start of their relationship, Alonzo unabashedly declares that Jake will be
his "nigger" if he wants to get ahead.
Denzel Washington is being touted, in some circles as a contender for
awards come year's end. The actor gives a good, not a great, performance in
a solid role that is counter to his usual noble, kind persona he normally
takes one. His Alonzo Harris is a studied performance with the actor
getting down and dirty as a cop whose sense of justice has evolved away
from enforcing the written law to honoring what he calls "street justice."
When the naďve Jake makes him pull over to stop the rape of a 14-year-old
Catholic schoolgirl, Alonzo kicks the bejeezus out of the perps, steals
their money and sets them free, much to the rookie cop's amazement and
chagrin. King Kong, he tells us near the end, ain't got nothin' on him as
the veteran detective walks a dangerous line. A side story, important in
the finale, has Alonzo in deep with the Russian Mafia, further establishing
the vet's walking the dark edges of illegality, though this sidebar seems
unnecessary.
Ethan Hawke gives a convincing performance as Jake Hoyt. Jake kissed his
wife and baby in the morning and left home a fresh-faced idealist. He
returns, a day later, as a battered and bruised cynic, but, for all that, a
man transformed into an enlightened, better cop. Alonzo shook Jake's
concepts of "justice" and the younger man comes away with a more intense,
realistic understanding of right and wrong. Hawke gives an effective
character study to his perf and stands toe-to-toe with the much more
flamboyant Washington, whose Alonzo Harris is an unpredictable loose canon
who has been, unbeknownst to himself, completely changed, morally, by his
constant dealings in the mean streets of LA.
While few members (actually none) of the supporting are given a great deal
of screen time, there is a wealth of fine acting in what are,
unfortunately, very small rolls. Most notable is Macy Gray as the wife of a
drug dealer whose home Alonzo invades on the pretext of looking for drugs
but his real agenda is to rip off the merchant of his ill-gotten cash. The
newcomer makes a splash as the street-savvy housewife who sees Alonzo for
what he is. Snoop Dog is depravedly solid as a wheelchair bound crack
peddler that Alonzo forces information from. There are many more tight
little perfs given by mostly unknown thesps. For name actors we have Scott
Glenn as one of Harris's victim/criminals and Tom Berenger as one of
Alonzo's equally corrupt colleagues.
The screenplay, by David Ayer ("U-571" and "The Fast and the Furious"),
packs an awful lot of gritty activity into what is supposed to be a single
day. This throws the pace of the film off as it takes a suspension of
disbelief to accept that so much tension, angst, confrontation and violence
would happen in just 24-hours. After a day like this, Jake should be ready
to retire as Alonzo first coerces him into smoking PCP (jeopardizing Jake's
professional status as a cop), involves him in an unsavory bust that
results in cold-blooded murder, drags the rookie into an illegal shakedown
and strands him in a life-threatening situation in a place where no
inexperienced, young, white cop should ever find himself. I understand the
single-day story, but question the amount of action and narrative that is
compressed into the limited timeframe. By the end of Jake's first day at
school I felt like I needed a vacation.
Director Antoine Fuqua ("The Replacement Killer") keeps things tight and
moving along at a brisk pace, even when much of the action consists of the
two cops driving around with Alonzo pontificating to his latest disciple
about the rules of survival on the streets of Los Angeles. Relatively
unknown director of photography, Mauro Fiore, provides an active, fluid,
moving camera that helps get across the street flavor and danger. He
manipulates the normal color palette when Jake smokes PCP for the first
time and sees the world in screwed up colors and distorted images. The
night shoots are crisp and clear as Jake confronts his demon, Alonzo, to
stop his superior's personal, corrupt plans. Costuming, by Michele Michel,
maintains the look of the streets with Alonzo dressed all in black, like an
avenger descended upon the city, with his shield hung around his neck like
an over-gold gangsta.
The hype preceding "Training Day" makes expectations for the film high. It
is, like Washington's performance, good not great. Hawke gives one of his
best perfs to date. I only wish the wonderful supporting cast were given
more to do. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
Enid (Thora Birch) and Rebecca (Scarlet Johansson) are two malcontented
teenage girls on the brink of graduation from high school and the very
threshold of adulthood. Outsiders to their parents and peers, the girls
carry on an almost non-stop caustic commentary that spares no one. When
Enid points her poisoned wit in the direction of a hapless, alienated
grouch, Seymour (Steve Buscemi), she realizes the he is much like her and
an unusual friendship develops in "Ghost World."
Director Terry Zwigoff hit the big-time with his much-awarded 1995
documentary, "Crumb," about the life and family of cartoonist Robert Crumb
(of "Keep On Truckin'" fame). Zwigoff, a close friend to the artist,
created an evocative, sympathetic look into a truly bizarre genius. With
"Ghost World," he joins with Daniel Clowes as they adapt the graphic
novelist's comic book creation for the big screen. The story begins with
Enid and Rebecca as a pair of intellectual sophisticates who know they are
too cool and smart for words. Their outsider status gives them the right,
they think, to whatever they damn well please for their own amusement.
One day, while going through the personals, Enid stumbles upon a plaintive
ad by a lonely guy looking for a woman in a yellow dress that he,
literally, bumped into at the airport weeks before. The girls decide to
have some fun and call the guy, pretending to be "the woman," and leave a
message setting up a meet. As they watch, from a distance, the poor schmuck
sit and wait - for nothing - at a local diner, Enid has the first stirrings
that, maybe, this wasn't such a funny idea. She begins a personal campaign
to get to know the man, Seymour, who, oddly, holds much in common with the
troubled teen.
Meanwhile, Rebecca has graduated high school (Enid has to go to summer
school to finish her art class), secured a job and is saving for an
apartment that she and Enid have always talked of sharing. Becky is sorting
out her plans for the future while her friend rejects, outright, any notion
of conventionality. The two begin a parting of the ways as Enid grows
closer to Seymour, especially when her sad sack father (Bob Balaban) makes
noises about getting back together with his ex-wife, Maxine (Teri Garr),
whom the teenager can't stand. Enid makes it her goal to help Seymour find
the lady in the yellow dress, but this decision, and the separation from
Rebecca, leaves her to confront her coming of age alone.
Zwigoff performs the leap from documentary to feature films in a seamless
manner that makes "Ghost World" not seem like a freshman fiction flick.
There is some initial comparison to another teen angst film, "Heathers"
(1989), but where the older film, especially the violence, was fantasy
based, the comic book-inspired tale is firmly rooted in teen reality. Enid
and Becky aren't out to kill the popular people here, but are not beyond
using a sharp tongue to cut down "normal" people. The girls are not unique
in their views. Even I remember, as a teenager, knowing 10 times more than
any adult, holding the older folk in a benign, superior contempt. Enid,
especially, puts forth this teen philosophy when you don't quite fit in -
when in doubt, attack.
Thora Birch and Scarlett Johansson are co-billed in "Ghost World," but the
veteran Birch takes over early on and is the real star of the film. The
young actress has over a decade of experience under her belt, starting, at
age six in "The Purple People Eater" and made the leap to more adult roles
with her work in the Oscar-winning "American Beauty." As Enid, she's a
little over-weight and cloaks herself in Gothic-inspired costumes that
ensure that she hides her inherent prettiness. As she singles out Seymour
for her own brand of amusement, she begins to make the first, unconscious,
moves to maturity. Birch is solid in the role and puts a firm imprint on
the complexity and sometimes confusion that make up Enid.
In a brilliant bit of casting, Steve Buscemi is nothing less than terrific
as Seymour. The actor has a talent for playing the hapless misfit and can
be counted on to put a unique spin on each character. Seymour may be a
loser but, with his love for old jazz music and dedication to his old
78-rpm record collection, he has something that he believes in. Enid sees
that his geek world may not be much to look at, but it is his own. The
relationship and physical attraction that bond Enid and Seymour is frank,
believable and, sometimes, touching. Buscemi should get attention at year's
end for this gem of a performance.
Scarlett Johansson ("The Horse Whispered") starts off strong but, as
Rebecca starts to find herself, she sets what are, to Enid, conventional
goals and aspirations. As Becky gets "normal" she grows more and more
distant from her friend, eventually fading from the picture, both in screen
time and with her character's importance to the story. Johansson does a
solid job in the diminished role. The veteran actors that help to flesh out
the background are an odd, not always successful, mix. Illeana Douglas
gives a dead on perf as Enid's summer school art teacher, Roberta. The
woman is in a  position to help her wards, but is so inured in her own
vision of art that she is unable to recognize the talent behind Enid's
caricature drawings. Bob Balaban plays Enid's dad as a clueless dolt who
doesn't understand anything about his daughter. Teri Garr's cameo
appearance as Enid's soon-to-be-again stepmom does nothing for the film.
Brad Renfro, as the girls' friend, object of desire and target for teen
torment, gets little air time and less to do.
Techs are sharp, especially the outfitting of Thora Birch by Mary Zophres
("Fargo"). The music, especially, has a place as a character in "Ghost
World." Vintage jazz and blues tunes abound with particular attention paid
to the 1931 Skip James song, "Devil Got My Woman." Of course, contemporary
music is amply supplied, but the blues rules. Artwork, especially Seymour's
Cook's Chicken scrapbook and Enid's portfolio of drawing, are a nice
addition by Sophie Crumb, daughter of Robert.
"Ghost World" is a true teen movie, not just for girls. The angst,
confusion and growing pains depicted are not aimed at one sex or the other
and has a lot to say for both. I give it a B.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Bubble Boy (2001)
Jimmy Livingston (Jake Gyllenhaal) was born without immunities and, when he
was released from the hospital at age four, his mom (Swoozie Kurtz)
spirited him home in a protective, antiseptic bubble. Since then she has
been his mommy and muse and has shielded the germ-imperiled boy from the
dangers of the world - especially the "little slut" (mom's words) next
door, Chloe (Marley Shelton). Despite mom's objections Jimmy falls in love
with pretty, sweet Chloe and when she decides to marry another in Niagara
Falls, he creates a portable bubble and hits the road to find her in
"Bubble Boy."
Words that come to mind after watching "Bubble Boy" are politically
incorrect, subversive and anarchistic. Considering that this film springs
from the loins of parent company, Disney, I am amazed that it even got
released. The flick pokes fun at religion, motherhood, cults, freaks,
masturbation, immune systems (AIDS?) and more. But, my amazement is a good
thing, though, when it comes to a comedy that has the gonads to thumb its
nose in the face of convention. Because of this subversion, though, the
movie may suffer at the box office. I hope not.
For all his mother's interference and his plight of being without normal
immunities, Jimmy is a normal, well-adjusted young guy with needs, desires
and interests commensurate with almost any American teenager. He plays rock
music on his guitar and has a very normal interest in the newly moved in
girl next door, Chloe. That he lives in a sterile, habitrail-style
environment and his mom still reads him bedtime stories (although her
fairytales always end with the hero leaving his protective environment and
dying) don't deter him from ordinary emotions. He and Chloe become best
friends, but, without the ability to have physical contact, she soon starts
dating a rock star wannabe, Mark (Dave Sheridan), and, eventually, decides
to marry the sleazy guy - in Niagara Falls, thousands of miles away from
Jimmy's home in Palmdale, CA.
With the impromptu wedding only days away, Jimmy makes the life-threatening
decision to leave his safe, sterile habitat and go find Chloe to declare
his love. Being an intelligent, capable young guy, he builds himself a
portable bubble and hits the road. His adventure begins at a bus stop in
the middle of nowhere run by a less than friendly, deadpan attendant (Zach
Galifianakis). He is given a ride on a bus with the logo "Bright and Shiny"
(read "Up With People") only to be thrown out when he innocently calls his
generic looking companions (all named Todd and Lorraine) a cult. (Super
male model Fabio makes a cameo appearance as their leader.) From there he
meets and helps a surly biker named Slim (Danny Trejo) with a flat tire.
("Patches?" says Slim. "I could use some stinking patches!" in homage to
"The Treasure of the Sierra Madre.") Jimmy's adventures continue as he
slowly treks across the land and he teams up with the members of a circus
freak show led by a nasty little guy named Dr. Phreak (Vern Troyer). An
East Indian (Brian George) driving an ice cream and curry van gives B-Boy a
ride and his faith is sorely tested, to gross out effect. Meanwhile, his
overly protective mom and his dad also hit the road in search of their
wayward boy, crossing the same paths as their son.
There has been a lot of flack over the shots that "Bubble Boy" takes at the
various targets and sacred cows of our society. Religion, whether it be
Christianity, the Hindu faith or Judaism, is fired upon frequently and with
verve in the script by Cinco Paul and Ken Daurio. This alone seems to
offend troves of people. I guess some individuals have a problem with
politically incorrect satire. The use of circus freaks is being construed
as mean spirited, but these misshapen folk are good and caring (and, yes,
funny) characters, much the same way Alfred Hitchcock depicted them in
"Saboteur" (1942). Of course, no one gave Hitch any grief, but the present,
politically correct world we live in takes offense over showing others less
fortunate.
Jake Gyllenhaal ("October Sky") is dead on as the title boy and, with his
dramatic rather than comedic background, anchors the comedy with an earnest
stalwartness that, say, someone like Brendan Fraser may not have conveyed.
Jimmy is resourceful, capable and kind and so in love with Chloe (a
charming performance by pretty Marley Shelton) that he'll risk his very
life just to hold her. It's a sweet perf in a goofy, coming of age road
movie. Swoozie Kurtz is near evil as Jimmy's dominant mom, but the veteran
actress gives her character a caring personality, if only when it comes to
her son. The plethora of character actors filling out the roles of the wild
and wacky people Jimmy meets do yeoman's work and help contribute to the
subversive comedy. You might recognize a face or two with vet Danny Trejo
("Con Air") and Verne Troyer (Mini Me in "Austin Powers 2") doing their
bit.
Commercial director Blair Hayes makes his debut and keeps the pace brisk
but not hurried. Running about 90 minutes, it's the right length, to my
mind, for a screwball comedy and "Bubble Boy" exerts its right to satire
very well. Maybe I'm just thick skinned but I was not the least bit
offended by the offbeat humor, which pushes the envelope of good taste. I
think it walked the line admirably well for a lightweight summer comedy. I
guess it's all a matter of how you look at things. If you're the kind of
person offended by a film like "Bubble Boy" just say no and go see
something else. I, personally, like anarchy and give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Panic (2000)
Alex (William H. Macy) needs to see a shrink. He's facing a mid-life
crisis, is unhappy with his marriage and worried about his son. He also
wants to leave the family business. Alex is a hit man with a conscience and
wants out in "Panic."
When Alex first goes to see Dr. Josh Parks (John Ritter) he meets Sarah
(Neve Campbell), a pretty, severely neurotic young woman. They take an
immediate liking to each other and a tentative romance begins to blossom.
The reason Alex is seeing the doc in the first place is because of his
deep-seated feelings of guilt over his troubled marriage and deadly career.
When he meets Sarah, his problems are compounded, not improved, and Alex
continues an inexorable downward spiral.
William H. Macy is one of my favorite character actors and there are few
times he misses in a performance. In "Panic" he portrays the angst-ridden
Alex as a truly troubled man who doesn't want to make waves for his
family's murder-for-hire business but wants, desperately, out. His work
problems affect his marriage, too, as he grows distant from his loyal wife,
Martha (Tracey Ullman). His only solace is the time he spends with son,
gaining strength from the little boy's unconditional love for his dad.
Macy's character study of Alex overshadows the rest of the players
markedly. Donald Sutherland comes across not as a high powered,
mob-connected businessman whose commodity is murder but as a childish creep
who has no humanity - he even forces his grandson to gun down a squirrel.
Tracey Ullman has the thankless wife role, while John Ritter is merely an
object for the hit-man story to rest upon. Neve Campbell, as Sarah, has
nowhere to take her troubled character. For the most part, she has to go
one-on-one with  Alex or her shrink. She doesn't get the opportunity to
break out of her shell, acting only as a conscience for her would be lover.
Only Barbara Bain (remember her in the "Mission: Impossible" TV series?)
fares well as Alex's mother. She gets the chance to put a ruthless spin on
her outwardly kindly wife and mother, Deidre, who, in fact, brooks no
discontent from her son when he asks to get out of the killing business.
Newcomer writer/director Henry Bromwell joins the pantheon of
mobster-shrink flicks that began with TV's "The Sopranos" and the
DeNiro/Crystal movie "Analyze This." It's an interesting idea that could
have used a more experienced hand at the helm. The premise of a mob member
seeing a shrink about his guilt for his crimes should get some screen
mileage, but it falls flat in "Panic." I give it a C-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Sous le sable (2000)
Marie (Charlotte Rampling) and Jean (Bruno Cremer) have been married for 25
years and, to the entire world, appear to be quite happy together. While
vacationing at their summer home at Lit en Mix in southern France, Jean
decides to go for a swim. When, a little later, Marie turns to look for
him, he is nowhere to be found. A frantic search turns up nothing and Marie
returns home convinced, in her mind, that her husband is still alive in
"Under the Sand."
Charlotte Rampling commands the screen with her character study of a woman
walking the fine line between madness and sanity. The shock over the
disappearance of her husband drives her into a world of denial as she
carries on with her life, believing that Jean is still with her. When out
with friends, she talks of him in the present tense. When shopping for
herself, she picks out a tie that she thinks he would like. Her friends,
especially best friend Amanda (Alexandra Stewart), fear for her sanity.
Marie  undergoes  a  continuous struggle between acceptance and denial over
the  loss of Jean. Her friends realize her conflict and do what they can to
help,  but  Marie's  denial is too strong for anyone, even Amanda, to break
through to her. When she meets Vincent (Jacques Nolot), it appears that she
may,  finally, accept he loss and get on with her life. But, Jean's hold on
her is too strong and she continues to live in her own delusional world.
Rampling gives an unabashed performance as a woman on the brink of madness.
The mental turmoil she undergoes is plainly evident on her face as her mind
battles  between  denial  over  Jean's  disappearance and acceptance of the
fact. Director Francois Ozon uses the actress's exotic looks and expressive
features  to  show the fight taking place within her mind. The actress lays
it  all  on  the line and gives a notable performance. The rest of the cast
does  well  enough  fleshing  out the background, but it is Rampling's film
from beginning to end.
Madness  is a tough subject matter for film and could be a turn off for the
viewer. Films like "Diary of a Mad Housewife" (1970) gave a no holds barred
look  into  the  frightening  world of mental illness and are harsh in that
depiction. "Under the Sand" has the same relentless grip, but with an oddly
hopeful  feel.  Marie  is  a  likable, complex and beautiful character that
deserves  happiness  and  continues  to live in he deluded world where Jean
still  exists,  alive  and  well. Rampling's stunning performance makes you
want  to  believe she is sane, even as she falls deeper and deeper into her
psychosis.
Charlotte Rampling's performance, alone, is worth the price of admission to
"Under the Sand." I give it a B.
For mor Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com
robin@reelingreviews.com
laura@reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
In October of 1962 the United States found itself on the brink of nuclear 
holocaust when U2 spy plane fly-overs of Cuba revealed that the Soviet 
Union was actively deploying and installing medium range ballistic missiles 
90 miles from the US. President John Kennedy (Bruce Greenwood) and his 
staff must face this major threat to world peace and stop Soviet 
expansionism in director Roger Donaldson's dramatic recreation of the most 
dangerous crisis in American history in "Thirteen Days." 
One of the highlights to come out of made-for-TV movies was a 1974 entry 
called "Missiles of October" that also recreated the historic event that 
almost embroiled the US, USSR and the world in an all out nuclear showdown. 
That teleplay, starring William Devane and Martin Sheen as John and Bobby, 
showed the political tensions of the period that brought to the fore the 
danger the world faced in those two weeks in 1962. Now, a quarter of a 
century after the landmark TV movie, director Roger Donaldson and producer 
Kevin Costner team together again (the last time was for the taught spy 
thriller "No Way Out") to re-enact the events of that most dangerous time 
in America's and the world's history. 
Taken from the viewpoint of Special Assistant to the President Kenneth P. 
O'Donnell (Costner), Donaldson and crew recreate that volatile event, once 
again, as the country is plunged into what could have been total nuclear 
war. As O'Donnell gets ready to head to work one October morning, he deals 
with the usual family crises and problems. Meanwhile, a U2 spy plane photo 
mission over Cuba has produced some startling images - medium range nuclear 
missiles in the first stage of deployment. Suddenly, Ken's routine day 
switches into crisis mode as the President and his key advisor Bobby begin 
to muster the considerable forces of the US military to face the Soviet 
threat. 
Where "Thirteen Days" differs most from "Missiles of October" is, as 
expected, in the scope of the project. There is a big difference, 
budget-wise, between making a television docudrama and one that goes to the 
big screen. It shows as the makers of "Thirteen Days" craft a recreation of 
the Cuban Missile Crisis that encompasses not only the political intrigue 
within the White House, it also depicts the events that took place as 
America girds itself for nuclear confrontation. 
The cast, a true ensemble, is led, surprisingly, by Bruce Greenwood as JFK 
and not by Kevin Costner. Costner's O'Donnell represents the family guy 
thing as the drama of the crisis has its impact on him and his family. This 
puts a personal spin on the film as we see both the crisis and America's 
preparation for war and the pressure it brings to bear on those in the 
know. Kenny reassures his wife and kids that all will be okay and they will 
be safe, but he knows that, if the crisis comes to a head, his family will 
be no more. The meat of "Thirteen Days" is in the big picture, not the 
microcosm of family, though. 
This is where the film stands out as we see the workings of our government 
on the highest levels. The story does not just cover the face-off between 
the world's two most powerful countries; it also depicts the animosity 
between the president and the military/CIA. The disaster of the Bay of Pigs 
invasion the year before left a distrustful taste in the mouths of the 
generals and admirals who blame the Kennedys for not backing the Cuban 
expatriates fighting Fidel Castro. The missile crisis becomes a struggle 
for power as the Army/Navy/Air Force want to flex their might and invade 
Cuba, while JFK wants to end the confrontation peaceably but with America's 
dignity and world leadership intact. 
While the internal battle for power rages in the White House, with Air 
Force chief Curtis LeMay (Kevin Conway) advising the president to bomb Cuba 
into the stone age, our armed forces are set into motion to stop the 
Soviets with a blockade of offensive weapons to Cuba. This is where the 
political intrigues of high office are replaced by exciting action. When 
the first confrontation takes place between a US warship and a Soviet 
freighter, the tension is palpable. The most involving action sequence 
takes place late in the game as another U2 is sent up to shoot some snaps 
of the buildup and the fully prepared Soviet forces launch an anti-aircraft 
attack on the hapless pilot of the spy plane. This is a sweaty palm 
sequence to say the least, making you squirm in your seat as you try to 
help the pilot avoid those missiles. 
The ensemble cast places Greenwood as the first among equals with like 
weight given to all the principle players. Greenwood does not play act at 
being a caricature of JFK, foregoing the typical Kennedy Boston accent. 
Instead, he plays the man as a powerful figure who has to maintain the 
dignity of the office, directing his subordinates but giving them the 
latitude to make clear all of his options. Kennedy used this decision by 
committee method to good effect as his senior staff uncovers all the 
options available to the president. Costner, as Ken O'Donnell, is really a 
supporting cast member as a Kennedy crony brought on board as a personal 
political favor. Costner plays O'Donnell as if he crammed on old JFK 
speeches with a forced Kennedyesque twang to his speech. 
The rest of the players are first rate from start to finish with Steven 
Culp looking and sounding just like Robert Kennedy. The rest of the 
familiar players in this drama are uniformly well cast, too. Standing out 
are Michael Fairman as the beleaguered US Ambassador to the UN, Adlai 
Stevenson, who was forced to become the challenging voice of the United 
States in the United Nations and I remember the confrontation vividly. The 
filmmakers capture the accusations laid down by Stevenson with accuracy, 
using old style video footage to good effect. Dylan Baker has the look and 
feel of the intelligentsia as the brainy Secretary of Defense Robert 
McNamara. Kevin Conway gives his General LeMay the right "bomb them to 
hell" attitude. Also notable is Christopher Lawford as navy pilot William 
Ecker who, with his wingman, takes on the dangerous mission of a low-level 
photo recon into the heart of Cuba, bravely challenging Kenny O'Donnell's 
admonition, "Don' get shot." 
Tech credits are superb across the board with an admirable depiction of the 
US armed forces being placed on a war footing. It's an impressive 
production with the careful use of period aircraft and ships that gives the 
film a veracity fitting the event. Solid costuming by Isis Mussenden is 
subtle but has the look of the Kennedys. There is the usual array of 
vintage cars from the period to make things look right. The special F/X of 
the U2 sequences are a nice crafting of computer imaging. 
The Cuban Missile Crisis is probably the most intense two weeks that the 
United States has ever faced in its survival as a world leader. Helmer 
Donaldson and his fine crew and cast have given the depiction of this 
crucial event with the care and attention to details that make this one of 
the finest docudramas of the year. I give "Thirteen Days" an A-. 
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com 

Title
Review for Emperor's New Groove, The (2000)
18-year old Emperor Kuzco (David Spade) is an arrogant, egocentric and
selfish young ruler whose philosophy on the lives of his subjects is "don't
know, don't care." Kuzco is so interested in himself and his own pleasures
he doesn't have a clue that his new summer home, Kuzcotopia, will displace
a caring and kindly peasant, Pacha (John Goodman), and his family.
Meanwhile, wicked advisor Yzma (Eartha Kitt) has her own designs on the
throne and turns the unsuspecting monarch into a llama. It's up to Kuzco
and Pacha to restore him to his human form, return him to the throne and
thwart Yzma's plans in Disney's latest animated feature, "The Emperor's New
Groove."
The one word that jumped into my head after seeing the latest in Disney's
long, long line of animated films is "serviceable." The history behind the
creation of "The Emperor's New Groove" goes back to 1994 when the project
was called "Kingdom of the Sun," a dramatic story inspired by pre-Colombian
legend. As the development process moved along, the tone of the project
changed from the serious to the silly. With the original dramatic intent
taken away, the film became a light comedy with state-of-the-art animations
and an insubstantial story, though a cute one.
Emperor K is a spoiled brat whose own wants and needs are first and
foremost in his mind. He summons peasant Pacha to the palace to inquire
about the beautiful hilltop where Pacha and his family live. Pacha assures
his master that his hill is so special, it makes music. This sounds so
good, Kuzco decides that his newest palace, with pool, will be built there
and tells Pacha to move. The despondent, but loyal, peasant heads home to
break the bad news to his pregnant wife, Chicha (Wendie Malick), and five
daughters.
As Kuzco blithely makes his plans, his ancient and conniving advisor, Yzma,
has delusions of grandeur of her own. The wicked counselor has, for years,
used her exalted status to insinuate herself into a position of power. When
the self-centered Kuzco, putting his own selfish desires aside for a
moment, realizes that Yzma is usurping his throne, he fires her on the
spot. But, since only Kuzco, Yzma and her loyal henchman, Kronk (Patrick
Warburton), know about the dismissal, she decides the best course of action
is to poison the egotistical sovereign and take over his kingdom. The plans
go awry from the start when Kronk gives Kuzco extract of llama instead of a
poison cocktail.
Kuzco, now a talking llama, has no choice but to enlist the help of Pacha
in getting back to the palace and changing back to human form. Meanwhile,
Yzma, realizing that Kronk could not kill the llama king (Kronk is your
basic nice guy), heads out with her muscle-bound assistant to finish the
job herself. It becomes a race against time and nature as Kuzco and Pacha
must brave fierce crocodiles, deadly scorpions and startled bats in their
journey to the castle. It is also an odyssey of change for Kuzco as the
selfish boy-king learns the value of friendship and generosity and becomes
a good man and better emperor in the end.
As Disney animations go you can see the force of skilled animators at work
beneath the surface of the movie. Visually the characters are finely honed
caricatures as they represent simple human virtues and flaws. The emperor,
as voiced by Spade, is really a spoiled brat, used to getting what he wants
whenever he wants. Good or bad, this self-centered attitude lasts through
most of the film, changing only when the final climax looms. The
selfishness and smart-ass attitude given the character by Spade gets tired
after a while. Fortunately, his one-liners, peppered through the film, help
get you by the rotten little kid aspect of Kuzco.
John Goodman is one of the serviceable aspects of the film, as is Eartha
Kitt. Goodman's Pacha is a big-hearted, good-natured peasant who loves to
give to those around him. It's rather inevitable, with such a companion by
his side, that Kuzco is going to learn some valuable, life-affirming
lessons. Kitt gets a low-rent version of Cruella DeVil to play with and
does a decent job breathing life into the old crone that wants the throne.
Stealing the show, though, is Patrick Warburton as the lovable Kronk. The
amiable big guy (he's a size 66 long with a 31-inch waist) is more
interested in the quality of his cooking than in his henchman's duties.
He's particularly proud of his spinach puffs, truth be known. Warburton and
his animation team and writers create a funny, likeable character that is
supposed to be bad but can't be. After all, he was a Junior Chipmunk as a
kid and learned how to talk to squirrels, so how bad can he be. Beyond the
four leads, though, there is little background activity for minor
characters, giving the film a flat feel.
The animation processes used here are the epitome of the quality that we
expect to come out of Disney Studios. There isn't any breakthrough
development as was the case with the "deep canvas" process developed from
"Tarzan," but the creators of "The Emperor's New Groove" utilize every tool
at their disposal to create a fine visual work. The combination of the
animation and, again I say, the serviceable vocal and writing talents
involved help create a light bit of comedy entertainment that will please
all ages, but won't make a lasting impression.
Animation director Mark Dindal co-wrote the story with screenwriter David
Reynolds. They succeed in making a Disney-lite effort that is fast-talking
and very, very hip - mainly due to Spade's chatter and Kronk's likableness.
It fills the bill for the holidays and will keep the kids quiet and adults
entertained. In the end, "The Emperor's New Groove" is a popcorn movie. I
give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Title
Review for Proof of Life (2000)
Inspired by the 1998 Vanity Fair article "Adventures in the Ransom Trade,"
by William Prochnau, director Taylor Hackford tells the tale of American
engineer Peter Bowman who, while trying to build a dam in the remote wilds
of South America, is kidnapped by guerrillas and held for a $3 million
ransom. He is abandoned by his company, but his wife Alice (Meg Ryan) won't
give up on him as she seeks the help of K&R (kidnap and ransom) expert
Terry Thorne (Russell Crowe). But, things turn out to be far trickier than
expected as negotiations drag on for months and a romance develops between
Alice and Terry in "Proof of Life."
Helmer Taylor Hackford has always provided interesting, star studded films
from his romantic, Oscar-nominated "An Officer and a Gentlemen" through to
the satanically satiric "Devil's Advocate." With "Proof of Life," the
director/producer takes us into the secret world of kidnap and ransom. The
end of the Cold War, over a decade ago, resulted in the end of financial
backing by the Communist countries of various rebel groups worldwide.
Without that monetary help, the revolutionaries turned to kidnapping,
demanding huge ransoms from their victims, to cover their operating costs
and expand their power base. Kidnapping became such a popular means of
making lots of money that companies operating in high risk areas began
securing "K&R" insurance for their executives.
In "Proof of Life," Peter Bowman is in the South American country of Tecala
trying to get his vision built - a dam that will benefit the people of that
country. But, the engineer works for an oil company that is taking
advantage of the small country and its people by forcing an oil pipeline to
be built. Bowman becomes a pawn in the conflict when rebels from the
revolutionary group, ELT, put up a roadblock and take all the innocents
they stop as hostages. Of course, Peter is, as the most visible
representative of the capitalist oil corporation, a prime candidate for
huge ransom demands.
Bowman, forced to trek across the Andes with his captors, leaves behind his
wife, Alice, who turns to his company for help. K&R expert Terry Thorne
(Crowe) arrives on the scene and assures Alice that all will be well and
begins the delicate mission of securing Peter's freedom. But, corporate
skullduggery and greed soon prove to be more important and Alice is told
that there is no insurance, no company and no high level help to free her
husband. With Terry suddenly taken out of the picture, she and Peter's
sister, Janis (Pamela Reed), contact a local security firm to get Peter
released, only to find out that they just want her money.
A crisis of conscience forces Terry to return to Tecala to help Alice get
her husband back. The arduous ransom negotiations start to drag on
interminably, week after week after week, as Terry and his rebel contact,
Marco, barter over the life of the captive engineer. As the months go by,
Terry finds himself attracted to the pretty, vulnerable Alice as he works
to secure Peter's release. When negotiations fall apart, Thorne seeks the
assistance of an American K&R man, Dino (David Caruso), who is trying to
locate a kidnapped client of his own. Action replaces talk as Terry, Dino
and his team head into the jungle to extract their clients from the hands
of the rebels.
"Proof of Life" covers territory that has, until recently, remained in the
misted shroud of secrecy. The world of kidnap and ransom is populated by
former members of the CIA, FBI, Interpol, SAS and the military - men who
are used to "negotiating" with an opponent holding an AK-47 assault rifle
rather than a law book. The entire K&R industry was created by the social
and economic changes in the world, necessitating its birth as a hedge
against the lucrative abduction business. The story, provided by longtime
Hackford collaborator Tony Gilroy, opens our eyes to this, until now,
secret world that has changed the revolutionaries into drug dealers and
worshippers of the almighty dollar.
Gilroy's screenplay, while steeped in the unknown world of K&R, has the
feel of a re-creation of that greatest of American films, "Casablanca." The
parallels between that classic and "Proof of Life" are more than passing,
though the perspective is from a unique angle. Peter Bowman replaces Victor
Laszlo (Paul Henreid) as the leader of the cause that draws Terry Thorne
(filling in for Rick Blaine (Humphrey Bogart)) into the fray as Peter's
potential savior. Meg Ryan takes Ingrid Bergman's place as the loyal wife
and love interest for Terry, while David Caruso's Dino takes over for
Captain Louis Renault (Claude Raines) as the good friend to the hero.
(Actually, at one point, I half expected Crowe to recite the "Of all the
gin joints in all the towns in all the world?" line from the older flick.)
"Proof of Life," even with the "Casablanca" comparison, is still a routine
thriller that walks through its paces well enough, but does nothing to try
to get beyond the routine. The most intriguing part of the film is the
story that follows Peter's plight while in the hands of his captors.
Bowman, before the abduction, is totally committed to his mission to help
the people of Tecala, putting the problems of getting his construction
underway ahead of the needs of Alice. Their last time together was fraught
with tension, but after the abduction, Alice becomes Peter's sole raison
d'etre, keeping the man from falling into utter despair as his
incarceration drags on. The romance that buds between Alice and Terry
simply adds a bit more controversy to the film.
The production of "Proof of Life" was reportedly plagued by disaster and
political intrigue throughout its making. The director made the decision to
shoot the film on location in Ecuador and Hackford and crew found
themselves flanked by two active volcanoes, mud slides and the same threat
of kidnapping that the story, itself, is about. There was also the
unfortunate death of a stand-in for David Morse that devastated the
production team. This list of woes has its impact on the film as there is
not a great deal of energy in the perfs by the principles, with the
exception of Morse who does a fine job in what amounts to a one man show.
Isolated from his wife and the life he knows, Morse's Peter must maintain
his will to survive with only a tattered photo of Alice as a reminder of
what he had. It's a close to the chest performance that says volumes with
little dialogue.
The stars of "Proof of Life," Ryan and Crowe, give performances that say
"star" rather than "actor." Both give credible perfs, but there is little
of the chemistry that we've heard so much of about the couple's off-screen
amour. Because there is little spark on screen between them, I found myself
more interested in the plight of Peter than the interplay between Alice and
Terry.
Supporting cast is a plus with a number of small, but effective, roles that
help to flesh out the background of the film. Pamela Reed is solid as Janis
Goodman, Peter's sister, who comes to Alice's aid. Reed gives strength to
the role as her character provides the moral support that Alice needs
during such trying times. David Caruso provides the sharp cynicism and
humor to his Dino that brought the actor to our attention years ago. I hope
this signals a comeback for the talented actor who has made some bad career
decisions. Anthony Heald, as oil company honcho Ted Fellner, brings the
same oily sleaziness to his character as he gave to his doomed doctor in
"The Silence of the Lambs." Gottfried John is terrific in the little role
of captive missionary, Eric Kessler, who is instrumental in Peter's
continued survival and rescue.
The behind the camera work, as one expects from a Taylor Hackford film, is
uniformly first class. Veteran Polish cinematographer Slawomir Idziak,
whose credits include such works as Krysztof Kieslowski's "The Double Life
of Veronique" and "Blue," gives a sharp lushness to the mountainous prison
of Peter, while bathing his and Alice's luxurious home in a warm light that
contrasts the harshness of the mountain locale. Bruno Rubeo, who wowed us
with his production design in "Devil's Advocate," gives the same level of
attention and detail to the varied sets in "Proof of Life."
In the end, "Proof of Life" is an exciting travelogue into a whole new
world of international intrigue that makes you think twice about travelling
in the hot zones. The generic adventure doesn't knock my socks off, but the
film does rep the craftsmanship and attention to detail that can accompany
a big Hollywood budget. I give it a B-.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com
